Published by Disney • Hyperion Books, an imprint of Disney Book Group.
No part of this bookmay be reproduced or transmitted in any form or by any means, electronic or mechanical, including photocopying, recording, or by any informationstorage and retrieval system, without written permission from the publisher.
For information address Disney • Hyperion Books, 114 Fifth Avenue, NewYork, New York 10011-5690.
That wasn’t necessarily the rotten part.
He sat up and rubbed his eyes, trying to think.
They all looked around his age … fifteen? Sixteen?Okay, that was scary.
He didn’t know his own age.
Out the windows, desert rolled by under a bright blue sky.
Jason was pretty sure he didn’t live in the desert.
Hetried to think back … the last thing he remembered …The girl squeezed his hand.
“Jason, you okay?”She wore faded jeans, hiking boots, and a fleece snowboarding jacket.
Her chocolate brown hair was cut choppy and uneven, with thin strandsbraided down the sides.
She wore no makeup like she was trying not to draw attention to herself, but it didn’t work.
She was seriously pretty.
Her eyesseemed to change color like a kaleidoscope—brown, blue, and green.
“Um, I don’t—”In the front of the bus, a teacher shouted, “All right, cupcakes, listen up!”The guy was obviously a coach.
His baseball cap was pulled low over his hair, so you could just see his beady eyes.
He had a wispy goatee and asour face, like he’d eaten something moldy.
His buff arms and chest pushed against a bright orange polo shirt.
His nylon workout pants and Nikes werespotless white.
A whistle hung from his neck, and a megaphone was clipped to his belt.
He would’ve looked pretty scary if he hadn’t been five feet zero.
Then his eyes fixed on Jason, and his scowl deepened.
He was sure the coach knew he didn’t belong there.
He was going to call Jason out, demand to know what he wasdoing on the bus—and Jason wouldn’t have a clue what to say.
“We’ll arrive in five minutes! Stay with your partner.
Don’t lose your worksheet.
And if any ofyou precious little cupcakes causes any trouble on this trip, I will personally send you back to campus the hard way.
“Can he talk to us that way?”She shrugged.
“Always does.
This is the Wilderness School.
‘Where kids are the animals.
“I’m not supposed to be here.
“Yeah, right, Jason.
We’ve all been framed! I didn’t run away six times.
Piper didn’t steal a BMW.”The girl blushed.
“I didn’t steal that car, Leo!”“Oh, I forgot, Piper.
What was your story? You ‘talked’ the dealer into lending it to you?” He raised his eyebrows at Jason like, Can you believe her?Leo looked like a Latino Santa’s elf, with curly black hair, pointy ears, a cheerful, babyish face, and a mischievous smile that told you right away thisguy should not be trusted around matches or sharp objects.
His long, nimble fingers wouldn’t stop moving—drumming on the seat, sweeping his hairbehind his ears, fiddling with the buttons of his army fatigue jacket.
Either the kid was naturally hyper or he was hopped up on enough sugar and caffeineto give a heart attack to a water buffalo.
Why are you looking at me like that? Somebodydraw on my face again?”“I don’t know you,” Jason said.
“Sure.
I’m not your best friend.
I’m his evil clone.
“Problem back there?”Leo winked at Jason.
“Watch this.
“Sorry, Coach! I was having trouble hearing you.
Could you use your megaphone, please?”Coach Hedge grunted like he was pleased to have an excuse.
He unclipped the megaphone from his belt and continued giving directions, but hisvoice came out like Darth Vader’s.
The kids cracked up.
The coach tried again, but this time the megaphone blared: “The cow says moo!”The kids howled, and the coach slammed down the megaphone.
“Valdez!”Piper stifled a laugh.
“My god, Leo.
How did you do that?”Leo slipped a tiny Phillips head screwdriver from his sleeve.
“I’m a special boy.
“What am I doing here? Where are we going?”Piper knit her eyebrows.
“Jason, are you joking?”“No! I have no idea—”“Aw, yeah, he’s joking,” Leo said.
“He’s trying to get me back for that shaving cream on the Jell-O thing, aren’t you?”Jason stared at him blankly.
“I don’t—I can’t—”“That’s it!” Coach Hedge yelled from the front.
“The back row has just volunteered to clean up after lunch!”The rest of the kids cheered.
“Did you hit your head or something? You really don’t knowwho we are?”Jason shrugged helplessly.
“It’s worse than that.
I don’t know who I am.
Maybe that’s what it was: the NationalMuseum of Nowhere, Jason thought.
A cold wind blew across the desert.
Jason hadn’t paid much attention to what he was wearing, but it wasn’t nearlywarm enough: jeans and sneakers, a purple T-shirt, and a thin black windbreaker.
“We go to the ‘WildernessSchool’”—Leo made air quotes with his fingers.
“Which means we’re ‘bad kids.
Is it all coming back to you now?”“No.
None of them looked like hardened criminals, but hewondered what they’d all done to get sentenced to a school for delinquents, and he wondered why he belonged with them.
“You’re really gonna play this out, huh? Okay, so the three of us started here together this semester.
We’re totally tight.
You doeverything I say and give me your dessert and do my chores—”“Leo!” Piper snapped.
Ignore that last part.
But we are friends.
Well, Piper’s a little more than your friend, the last few weeks—”“Leo, stop it!” Piper’s face turned red.
Jason could feel his face burning too.
He thought he’d remember if he’d been going out with a girl like Piper.
“We’ve got to tell somebody.
“Who, Coach Hedge? He’d try to fix Jason by whacking him upside the head.
“He’s got a concussion or—”“Yo, Piper.
The new guy wedged himself betweenJason and Piper and knocked Leo down.
“Don’t talk to these bottom-feeders.
You’re my partner, remember?”The new guy had dark hair cut Superman style, a deep tan, and teeth so white they should’ve come with a warning label: do not stare directly atteeth.
permanent blindness may occur.
He wore a Dallas Cowboys jersey, Western jeans and boots, and he smiled like he was God’s gift to juveniledelinquent girls everywhere.
Jason hated him instantly.
“I didn’t ask to work with you.
This is your lucky day!” Dylan hooked his arm through hers and dragged her through the museum entrance.
Piper shot onelast look over her shoulder like, 911.
“I hate that guy.
“‘I’m Dylan.
I’m so cool, Iwant to date myself, but I can’t figure out how! You want to date me instead? You’re so lucky!’”“Leo,” Jason said, “you’re weird.
“But if you don’t remember me, that means I can reuse all my old jokes.
Come on!”Jason figured that if this was his best friend, his life must be pretty messed up; but he followed Leo into the museum.
Jason figured these girls were the popular clique.
They wore matching jeans andpink tops and enough makeup for a Halloween party.
Even Piper’s so-called partner Dylan suppressed a smile.
Piper’s snowboarding jacket sleeves hid her hands, but Jasongot the feeling she was clenching her fists.
“Not Hualapai.
’Course, you’d need a few brain cells to know the difference, Isabel.
“Oh, sorry! Was your mom in this tribe? Oh, that’sright.
You never knew your mom.
“That’s why she turned klepto.
He might not remember Piper, or even who he was, but he knew he hated meankids.
“Be cool.
Piper doesn’t like us fighting her battles.
Besides, if those girls found out the truth about her dad, they’d be all bowingdown to her and screaming, ‘We’re not worthy!’”“Why? What about her dad?”Leo laughed in disbelief.
“You’re not kidding? You really don’t remember that your girlfriend’s dad—”“Look, I wish I did, but I don’t even remember her, much less her dad.
“Whatever.
We have to talk when we get back to the dorm.
“You are about to see the Grand Canyon.
Try not to break it.
The skywalk can hold the weight ofseventy jumbo jets, so you featherweights should be safe out there.
If possible, try to avoid pushing each other over the edge, as that would cause meextra paperwork.
The Grand Canyon spread before them, live and in person.
Extending over the edge wasa horseshoe-shaped walkway made of glass, so you could see right through it.
“That’s pretty wicked.
Despite his amnesia and his feeling that he didn’t belong there, he couldn’t help being impressed.
They were up so high that birds circled below their feet.
Five hundredfeet down, a river snaked along the canyon floor.
Banks of storm clouds had moved overhead while they’d been inside, casting shadows like angry facesacross the cliffs.
As far as Jason could see in any direction, red and gray ravines cut through the desert like some crazy god had taken a knife to it.
Crazy gods .
Where had he come up with that idea? He felt like he’d gotten close to somethingimportant—something he should know about.
He also got the unmistakable feeling he was in danger.
“You’re not going to throw up over the side, are you? ’Cause I should’ve brought my camera.
He was shivering and sweaty, but it had nothing to do with heights.
He blinked, and the pain behind his eyes subsided.
“Just a headache.
A cold wind almost knocked him sideways.
“Storm’s right over us, but it’s clear all the way around.
Weird, huh?”Jason looked up and saw Leo was right.
A dark circle of clouds had parked itself over the skywalk, but the rest of the sky in every direction wasperfectly clear.
Jason had a bad feeling about that.
He frowned at the storm like it bothered him too.
“We may have to cut this short, so get to work!Remember, complete sentences!”The storm rumbled, and Jason’s head began to hurt again.
Not knowing why he did it, he reached into his jeans pocket and brought out a coin—acircle of gold the size of a half-dollar, but thicker and more uneven.
Stamped on one side was a picture of a battle-ax.
On the other was some guy’s facewreathed in laurels.
The inscription said something like ivlivs.
“You been holding out on me!”Jason put the coin away, wondering how he’d come to have it, and why he had the feeling he was going to need it soon.
“Just a coin.
Maybe his mind had to keep moving as much as his hands.
“Come on,” he said.
“Dare you to spit over the edge.
For one thing, Jason was too distracted by the storm and his own mixed-up feelings.
For another thing, hedidn’t have any idea how to “name three sedimentary strata you observe” or “describe two examples of erosion.
He was too busy building a helicopter out of pipe cleaners.
Jason figured it would plummet, but the pipe-cleaner blades actually spun.
The little copter made it halfwayacross the canyon before it lost momentum and spiraled into the void.
“Would’ve been cooler if I had some rubber bands.
“I don’t recall exactly.
I’m ADHD, man.
You can’t expect me to remember details.
I don’t remember anyone here.
What if—”“You’re right and everyone else is wrong?” Leo asked.
“You think you just appeared here this morning, and we’ve all got fake memories of you?”A little voice in Jason’s head said, That’s exactly what I think.
Everybody here took him for granted.
Everyone acted like he was a normal part of the class—except for Coach Hedge.
“I’ll be right back.
Maybe it was too early in the day for tourists, or maybe the weird weather had scared them off.
TheWilderness School kids had spread out in pairs across the skywalk.
Most were joking around or talking.
Some of the guys were dropping pennies overthe side.
About fifty feet away, Piper was trying to fill out her worksheet, but her stupid partner Dylan was hitting on her, putting his hand on her shoulderand giving her that blinding white smile.
She kept pushing him away, and when she saw Jason she gave him a look like, Throttle this guy for me.
He walked up to Coach Hedge, who was leaning on his baseball bat, studying the storm clouds.
“Do what?” It sounded like the coach had just asked if he’d made the thunderstorm.
“Don’t play games with me, kid.
What are you doing here, andwhy are you messing up my job?”“You mean.
“I’m not one of your students?”Hedge snorted.
“Never seen you before today.
At least he wasn’t going insane.
He was in the wrong place.
“Look, sir, I don’t know how I got here.
Ijust woke up on the school bus.
All I know is I’m not supposed to be here.
“You got a powerful way with the Mist, kid, if you can make allthese people think they know you; but you can’t fool me.
I’ve been smelling monster for days now.
I knew we had an infiltrator, but you don’t smell like amonster.
You smell like a half-blood.
So—who are you, and where’d you come from?”Most of what the coach said didn’t make sense, but Jason decided to answer honestly.
“I don’t know who I am.
I don’t have any memories.
You’vegot to help me.
“You’re being truthful.
Part of Jason wondered if the guy was just nuts.
But the other part knew better.
I just know what you are, and it means trouble.
Now I got to protect three of you rather than two.
The clouds were getting thicker and darker, hovering right over the skywalk.
They said an extraction team is on the way.
They’re coming to pick up a special package,but they wouldn’t give me details.
I thought to myself, Fine.
The two I’m watching are pretty powerful, older than most.
I know they’re being stalked.
I cansmell a monster in the group.
I figure that’s why the camp is suddenly frantic to pick them up.
But then you pop up out of nowhere.
So, are you the specialpackage?”The pain behind Jason’s eyes got worse than ever.
Half-bloods.
Camp.
Monsters.
He still didn’t know what Hedge was talking about, but the wordsgave him a massive brain freeze—like his mind was trying to access information that should’ve been there but wasn’t.
For a short guy, the coach had hands like steel.
“Whoa, there, cupcake.
You say you got no memories,huh? Fine.
I’ll just have to watch you, too, until the team gets here.
We’ll let the director figure things out.
“What camp?”“Just sit tight.
Reinforcements should be here soon.
Hopefully nothing happens before—”Lightning crackled overhead.
The wind picked up with a vengeance.
Worksheets flew into the Grand Canyon, and the entire bridge shuddered.
Kidsscreamed, stumbling and grabbing the rails.
He bellowed into his megaphone: “Everyone inside! The cow says moo! Off the skywalk!”“I thought you said this thing was stable!” Jason shouted over the wind.
Come on!”THE STORM CHURNED INTO A MINIATURE HURRICANE. Funnel clouds snaked toward the skywalk like the tendrils of a monster jellyfish.
The wind snatched away their notebooks, jackets, hats, and backpacks.
Jason skidded across the slickfloor.
Piper’s snowboarding jacket was flapping wildly, her dark hair all in herface.
Jason thought she must’ve been freezing, but she looked calm and confident—telling the others it would be okay, encouraging them to keepmoving.
The wind seemed to fight them, pushing them back.
They slammed shut, closing off the skywalk.
Inside, the kids pounded on the glass, but the doors seemed to be stuck.
“I’m done helping.
“This is my fight.
I should’ve known that was our monster.
A rogue worksheet slapped him in the face, but he swatted it away.
“What monster?”The coach’s cap blew off, and sticking up above his curly hair were two bumps—like the knots cartoon characters get when they’re bonked on thehead.
Coach Hedge lifted his baseball bat—but it wasn’t a regular bat anymore.
Somehow it had changed into a crudely shaped tree-branch club, withtwigs and leaves still attached.
“Oh, come on, Coach.
Let the boy attack me! After all, you’re getting too old for this.
Isn’t that why theyretired you to this stupid school? I’ve been on your team the entire season, and you didn’t even know.
You’re losing your nose, grandpa.
“That’s it, cupcake.
You’re going down.
“Good luck.
Leo flew off the skywalk like he’d been tossed.
Somehow he managed to twist inmidair, and slammed sideways into the canyon wall.
He skidded, clawing furiously for any handhold.
Finally he grabbed a thin ledge about fifty feet belowthe skywalk and hung there by his fingertips.
“Rope, please? Bungee cord? Something?”Coach Hedge cursed and tossed Jason his club.
“I don’t know who you are, kid, but I hope you’re good.
Keep that thing busy”—he stabbed a thumbat Dylan—“while I get Leo.
“You going to fly?”“Not fly.
Climb.
The coach didn’t have any feet.
He had hooves—goat’s hooves.
They were horns.
“Fauns are Roman.
But we’ll talk about that later.
He sailed toward the canyon wall and hit hooves first.
He bounded down the cliff with impossible agility, findingfootholds no bigger than postage stamps, dodging whirlwinds that tried to attack him as he picked his way toward Leo.
“Now it’s your turn, boy.
It seemed useless with the winds so strong, but the club flew right at Dylan, even curving when he tried to dodge, and smackedhim on the head so hard he fell to his knees.
Her fingers closed around the club when it rolled next to her, but before she could use it, Dylan rose.
Blood—golden blood—trickled from his forehead.
“But you’ll have to do better.
Hairline fractures appeared in the glass.
Inside the museum, kids stopped banging on the doors.
They backed away,watching in terror.
He had the same face, the same brilliant white smile, but his wholeform was suddenly composed of swirling black vapor, his eyes like electrical sparks in a living storm cloud.
He sprouted black smoky wings and roseabove the skywalk.
If angels could be evil, Jason decided, they would look exactly like this.
“A storm spirit.
“I’m glad I waited, demigod.
Leo and Piper I’ve known about for weeks.
Could’ve killed themat any time.
But my mistress said a third was coming—someone special.
She’ll reward me greatly for your death!”Two more funnel clouds touched down on either side of Dylan and turned into venti—ghostly young men with smoky wings and eyes that flickeredwith lightning.
Her face was pale, but she gave Jason a determined look, and heunderstood the message: Keep their attention.
I’ll brain them from behind.
Jason wished he remembered having her as a girlfriend.
His mouth tasted like burning aluminum foil.
He lifted his head and saw that his clothes were smoking.
His toes were black with soot.
The winds raged.
Piper was screaming defiantly, but it all sounded tinny and far away.
Piper was on her feet, desperately swinging the club tofend off the two extra storm spirits, but they were just toying with her.
The club went right through their bodies like they weren’t there.
And Dylan, a darkand winged tornado with eyes, loomed over Jason.
He rose unsteadily to his feet, and he wasn’t sure who was more surprised: him, or the storm spirits.
“That was enough lightning to kill twenty men!”“My turn,” Jason said.
He let his instincts take over, flipping the coin in the air like he’d done it a thousand times.
Hecaught it in his palm, and suddenly he was holding a sword—a wickedly sharp double-edged weapon.
The ridged grip fit his fingers perfectly, and thewhole thing was gold—hilt, handle, and blade.
He looked at his two comrades and yelled, “Well? Kill him!”The other storm spirits didn’t look happy with that order, but they flew at Jason, their fingers crackling with electricity.
His blade passed through it, and the creature’s smoky form disintegrated.
The second spirit let loose a bolt oflightning, but Jason’s blade absorbed the charge.
Jason stepped in—one quick thrust, and the second storm spirit dissolved into gold powder.
He looked down as if expecting his comrades to re-form, but their gold dust remains dispersed in the wind.
“Impossible!Who are you, half-blood?”Piper was so stunned she dropped her club.
“Jason, how … ?”Then Coach Hedge leaped back onto the skywalk and dumped Leo like a sack of flour.
Then he looked around and realized there was only Dylan.
“Didn’t you leave some for me? I like a challenge!”Leo got to his feet, breathing hard.
He looked completely humiliated, his hands bleeding from clawing at the rocks.
“Yo, Coach Supergoat, whateveryou are—I just fell down the freaking Grand Canyon! Stop asking for challenges!”Dylan hissed at them, but Jason could see fear in his eyes.
“You have no idea how many enemies you’ve awakened, half-bloods.
My mistress willdestroy all demigods.
This war you cannot win.
Cracks expanded in the skywalk.
Sheets of rain poured down, and Jason had to crouch tokeep his balance.
“And you, demigod, will come with me!”He lunged at Jason, but Piper tackled the monster from behind.
Even though he was made of smoke, Piper somehow managed to connect.
Both ofthem went sprawling.
Leo, Jason, and the coach surged forward to help, but the spirit screamed with rage.
He let loose a torrent that knocked them allbackward.
Jason and Coach Hedge landed on their butts.
Jason’s sword skidded across the glass.
Leo hit the back of his head and curled on his side,dazed and groaning.
Piper got the worst of it.
She was thrown off Dylan’s back and hit the railing, tumbling over the side until she was hanging by onehand over the abyss.
The storm spun faster, pulling them upward like a vacuum cleaner.
“Somebody!”Then she slipped, screaming as she fell.
“Save her!”The coach launched himself at the spirit with some serious goat fu—lashing out with his hooves, knocking Leo free from the spirit’s grasp.
Leodropped safely to the floor, but Dylan grappled the coach’s arms instead.
Hedge tried to head-butt him, then kicked him and called him a cupcake.
Theyrose into the air, gaining speed.
She’s gone!But again his instincts won.
He ran to the railing, thinking, I’m a lunatic, and jumped over the side.
He was scared of being smashed against the canyon floor five hundred feet below.
He figured he hadn’t accomplishedanything except for dying along with Piper, but he tucked in his arms and plummeted headfirst.
The sides of the canyon raced past like a film on fastforward.
He tackled her waist and closed his eyes, waiting for death.
Piper screamed.
Thewind whistled in Jason’s ears.
He wondered what dying would feel like.
He was thinking, probably not so good.
He wished somehow they could never hitbottom.
Piper’s scream turned into a strangled gasp.
Jason thought they must be dead, but he hadn’t felt any impact.
They weren’t falling.
They were floating in midair, a hundred feet above the river.
They were nose to nose.
Her heart beat so hard, Jason could feelit through her clothes.
She said, “How did you—”“I didn’t,” he said.
“I think I would know if I could fly…”But then he thought: I don’t even know who I am.
Piper yelped as they shot a few feet higher.
They weren’t exactly floating, Jason decided.
He could feel pressure under hisfeet like they were balancing at the top of a geyser.
The easiest thing would be to sink gently to the canyon floor.
Then he looked up.
The rain had stopped.
The storm clouds didn’tseem as bad, but they were still rumbling and flashing.
There was no guarantee the spirits were gone for good.
He had no idea what had happened toCoach Hedge.
And he’d left Leo up there, barely conscious.
“Can you—”“Let’s see.
As soon as they landed on theskywalk, they ran to Leo.
His army coat was soaked from the rain.
His curly hair glittered gold from rolling around in monster dust.
Butat least he wasn’t dead.
“Never came down.
Please tell me he didn’t actually save my life.
“What happened? The tornado guy, the gold sword … I hit my head.
That’s it, right? I’m hallucinating?”Jason had forgotten about the sword.
He walked over to where it was lying and picked it up.
The blade was well balanced.
On a hunch he flipped it.
“Definitely hallucinating.
“Jason, those things—”“Venti,” he said.
“Storm spirits.
You acted like … like you’d seen them before.
Who are you?”He shook his head.
“That’s what I’ve been trying to tell you.
I don’t know.
The other kids from the Wilderness School were staring out the glass doors in horror.
Security guards were working on thelocks now, but they didn’t seem to be having any luck.
“I think he meant us.
“God, I can’t believe it was hitting on me.
He called us.
what, demigods?”Leo lay on his back, staring at the sky.
He didn’t seem anxious to get up.
“Don’t know what demi means,” he said.
“But I’m not feeling too godly.
Youguys feeling godly?”There was a brittle sound like dry twigs snapping, and the cracks in the skywalk began to widen.
“Maybe if we—”“Ohhh-kay,” Leo interrupted.
“Look up there and tell me if those are flying horses.
Then he saw a dark shape descending from the east—too slow for a plane, too large for a bird.
And theywere pulling a brightly painted box with two wheels: a chariot.
“Hedge told me an extraction squad was coming for us.
“That sounds painful.
The flying horses tucked in their wings and cantered nervously across the glass,as if they sensed it was near breaking.
Two teenagers stood in the chariot—a tall blond girl maybe a little older than Jason, and a bulky dude with ashaved head and a face like a pile of bricks.
They both wore jeans and orange T-shirts, with shields tossed over their backs.
The girl leaped off beforethe chariot had even finished moving.
She pulled a knife and ran toward Jason’s group while the bulky dude was reining in the horses.
Her gray eyes were fierce and a little startling.
Then she turned to Leo and Piper.
“What about Gleeson? Where is your protector, Gleeson Hedge?”The coach’s first name was Gleeson? Jason might’ve laughed if the morning hadn’t been quite so weird and scary.
Gleeson Hedge: football coach,goat man, protector of demigods.
Sure.
Why not?Leo cleared his throat.
“He got taken by some … tornado things.
“Storm spirits.
“You mean anemoi thuellai? That’s the Greek term.
Who are you, and what happened?”Jason did his best to explain, though it was hard to meet those intense gray eyes.
About halfway through the story, the other guy from the chariotcame over.
He stood there glaring at them, his arms crossed.
He had a tattoo of a rainbow on his biceps, which seemed a little unusual.
“No, no, no! She told me he would be here.
She told me if I came here, I’d findthe answer.
“Check it out.
His bare foot felt okay, but itlooked like a lump of charcoal.
“He’s the answer.
“He can’t be.
I was tricked.
“What do you want from me?” she screamed.
“What have you done with him?”The skywalk shuddered, and the horses whinnied urgently.
Let’s get these three to camp and figure it out there.
Those storm spirits might come back.
“Fine.
“We’ll settle this later.
“What’s her problem? What’s going on?”“Seriously,” Leo agreed.
“I’ll explain on the way.
“She looks like she wants to kill me.
“Annabeth’s okay.
You gotta cut her some slack.
She had a vision telling her to come here, to find a guy with one shoe.
That wassupposed to be the answer to her problem.
“She’s going out of her mind with worry.
She hoped he’dbe here.
“A guy named Percy Jackson.
Instead, all she felt was dread.
Just like the dream said.
They rose over the Grand Canyon and headed east, icy wind ripping straight through Piper’s jacket.
Behind them, more storm cloudswere gathering.
It had no seat belts and the back was wide open, so Piper wondered if Jason would catch her again if she fell.
Finally she’d gotten the big dope to kiss her.
Thelast few weeks had been the best of her life.
And then, three nights ago, the dream had ruined everything—that horrible voice, giving her horrible news.
It was like someone had wiped his memory, and she was stuck in the worst “do over” of all time.
She wanted toscream.
Jason stood right next to her: those sky blue eyes, close-cropped blond hair, that cute little scar on his upper lip.
His face was kind and gentle,but always a little sad.
And he just stared at the horizon, not even noticing her.
“This is so cool!” He spit a pegasus feather out of his mouth.
“Where are we going?”“A safe place,” Annabeth said.
“The only safe place for kids like us.
Camp Half-Blood.
She hated that word.
She’d been called a half-blood too many times—half Cherokee, half white—and it was never a compliment.
“Is that some kind of bad joke?”“She means we’re demigods,” Jason said.
“Half god, half mortal.
“You seem to know a lot, Jason.
But, yes, demigods.
My mom is Athena, goddess of wisdom.
Butch here is the son of Iris,the rainbow goddess.
“Your mom is a rainbow goddess?”“Got a problem with that?” Butch said.
“Rainbows.
Very macho.
“He gets along great with the pegasi.
“You mean you think you’re … you think we’re—”Lightning flashed.
The chariot shuddered, and Jason yelled, “Left wheel’s on fire!”Piper stepped back.
Sure enough, the wheel was burning, white flames lapping up the side of the chariot.
Piper glanced behind them and saw dark shapes forming in the clouds, more storm spirits spiraling toward the chariot—exceptthese looked more like horses than angels.
“Sometimes human, sometimes stallions, depending on how chaotic they are.
Hold on.
This isgoing to get rough.
The pegasi put on a burst of speed, and the chariot blurred.
Piper’s stomach crawled into her throat.
Her vision went black,and when it came back to normal, they were in a totally different place.
Snow-covered fields, roads, and forests spread to the right.
Directly below them was a green valley, likean island of springtime, rimmed with snowy hills on three sides and water to the north.
Piper saw a cluster of buildings like ancient Greek temples, a bigblue mansion, ball courts, a lake, and a climbing wall that seemed to be on fire.
But before she could really process all she was seeing, their wheelscame off and the chariot dropped out of the sky.
The pegasi labored to hold the chariot in a flight pattern, but they seemed exhausted from their burst ofspeed, and bearing the chariot and the weight of five people was just too much.
“Aim for the lake!”Piper remembered something her dad had once told her, about hitting water from up high being as bad as hitting cement.
She was underwater, so disoriented that she didn’t know which way was up.
They smiled at her, grabbed her shoulders, and hauled her up.
Nearby, Butch stood in the lake, cutting the wrecked harnesses off the pegasi.
Fortunately,the horses looked okay, but they were flapping their wings and splashing water everywhere.
Jason, Leo, and Annabeth were already on shore,surrounded by kids giving them blankets and asking questions.
Somebody took Piper by the arms and helped her stand.
Apparently kids fell into the lakea lot, because a detail of campers ran up with big bronze leaf blower–looking things and blasted Piper with hot air; and in about two seconds her clotheswere dry.
Piper looked back at the water and saw those strange girls just below the surface, their hair floating in the current.
Theywaved like, toodle-oo, and disappeared into the depths.
A second later the wreckage of the chariot was tossed from the lake and landed nearby with awet crunch.
“I said you could borrow the chariot, not destroy it!”“Will, I’m sorry,” Annabeth sighed.
“I’ll get it fixed, I promise.
Then he sized up Piper, Leo, and Jason.
“These are the ones? Way older than thirteen.
Why haven’t they beenclaimed already?”“Claimed?” Leo asked.
Piper had no idea who this guy Percy was, but his disappearance seemed to be a big deal.
Somehow she managed to make jeans and anorange T-shirt look glamorous.
She glanced at Leo, fixed her eyes on Jason like he might be worthy of her attention, then curled her lip at Piper as if shewere a week-old burrito that had just been pulled out of a Dumpster.
Piper knew this girl’s type.
She’d dealt with a lot of girls like this at WildernessSchool and every other stupid school her father had sent her to.
Piper knew instantly they were going to be enemies.
“Gee, thanks.
What are we, your new pets?”“No kidding,” Jason said.
“How about some answers before you start judging us—like, what is this place, why are we here, how long do we have tostay?”Piper had the same questions, but a wave of anxiety washed over her.
Worth the trouble.
If they only knew about her dream.
They had no idea…“Jason,” Annabeth said, “I promise we’ll answer your questions.
And Drew”—she frowned at the glamour girl—“all demigods are worth saving.
But I’lladmit, the trip didn’t accomplish what I hoped.
“And nobody wants you, hon.
Does your hair always look like a dead badger?”Piper stepped forward, ready to smack her, but Annabeth said, “Piper, stop.
She wasn’t a bit scared of Drew, but Annabeth didn’t seem like somebody she wanted for an enemy.
“We’ll assign them each a guide, give them atour of camp.
Hopefully by the campfire tonight, they’ll be claimed.
The campers backed away.
At first Piper thought she’d done something wrong.
Then she realized their faceswere bathed in a strange red light, as if someone had lit a torch behind her.
She turned and almost forgot how to breathe.
Then he glanced up and yelped.
“Is my hair on fire?” He ducked, but the symbol followed him, bobbingand weaving so it looked like he was trying to write something in flames with his head.
“The curse—”“Butch, shut up,” Annabeth said.
“Leo, you’ve just been claimed—”“By a god,” Jason interrupted.
“That’s the symbol of Vulcan, isn’t it?”All eyes turned to him.
“I don’t even LIKE Star Trek .
What are you talking about?”“Vulcan is the Roman name for Hephaestus,” Annabeth said, “the god of blacksmiths and fire.
“The god of what? Who?”Annabeth turned to the guy with the bow.
“Will, would you take Leo, give him a tour? Introduce him to his bunk-mates in Cabin Nine.
“And I’m not a Vulcan!”“Come on, Mr.
Spock, I’ll explain everything.
Usually Piper didn’t like it when other girls checked out her boyfriend, but Annabeth didn’t seem to carethat he was a good-looking guy.
She studied him more like he was a complicated blueprint.
Finally she said, “Hold out your arm.
How hadPiper never noticed it before? She’d looked at Jason’s arms a million times.
The tattoo couldn’t have just appeared, but it was darkly etched, impossibleto miss: a dozen straight lines like a bar code, and over that an eagle with the letters spqr.
“Where did you get them?”Jason shook his head.
“I’m getting really tired of saying this, but I don’t know.
The marks seemed to bother them a lot—almost like a declaration of war.
Then he winced as if his head was aching.
“I mean … I think so.
I don’t remember.
It was clear the campers saw Annabeth as the leader.
They were waiting for her verdict.
“Drew, would you—”“Absolutely.
“This way, sweetie.
I’ll introduce you to our director.
He’s … an interesting guy.
“Is Jason in some kind of trouble?”Annabeth hesitated.
“Good question, Piper.
Come on, I’ll give you a tour.
We need to talk.
She pointed out the open-air dining pavilion that overlooked Long Island Sound.
(Yes, Long Island, New York;they’d traveled that far on the chariot.
She wondered if she’d have to stay full-time, or ifshe’d be any good at the activities.
Could you flunk out of monster fighting? A million questions bubbled in her head, but given Annabeth’s mood, shedecided to keep quiet.
Piper counted twenty cabins in all.
One glowedgolden, another silver.
One had grass on the roof.
Another was bright red with barbed wire trenches.
One cabin was black with fiery green torches outfront.
“As you can see, the weather is controlled, too.
Each cabin represents a Greek god—aplace for that god’s children to live.
“You’re taking this awfully calmly.
She couldn’t admit that this just confirmed some weird feelings she’d had for years, arguments she’d had with her fatherabout why there were no photos of Mom in the house, and why Dad would never tell her exactly how or why her mom had left them.
But mostly, the dreamhad warned her this was coming.
Soon they will find you, demigod, that voice had rumbled.
When they do, follow our directions.
Cooperate, and yourfather might live.
“I guess after this morning, it’s a little easier to believe.
So who’s my mom?”“We should know soon,” Annabeth said.
“You’re what—fifteen? Gods are supposed to claim you when you’re thirteen.
That was the deal.
Sometimes it takes a little longer, but you saw how fast Leo was claimed once he got here.
Should happen for you soon.
Tonight at thecampfire, I bet we’ll get a sign.
A flaming wombat, maybe.
“Why thirteen?”“The older you get,” Annabeth said, “the more monsters notice you, try to kill you.
’Round thirteen is usually when it starts.
That’s why we sendprotectors into the schools to find you guys, get you to camp before it’s too late.
“He’s—he was a satyr: half man, half goat.
Satyrs work for the camp, finding demigods, protecting them, bringing them in whenthe time is right.
She’d seen the guy eat.
She’d never liked the coach much, but she couldn’t believe he’dsacrificed himself to save them.
“When we went up into the clouds, did he … is he gone for good?”“Hard to say.
“Storm spirits … difficult to battle.
Even our best weapons, Celestial bronze, will pass right throughthem unless you can catch them by surprise.
If you hit a monster just right, you can dissolve them, send their essence back to Tartarus.
Kind of like a bottomless pit of evil.
Anyway, once monsters dissolve, itusually takes months, even years before they can re-form again.
But since this storm spirit Dylan got away—well, I don’t know why he’d keep Hedgealive.
Hedge was a protector, though.
He knew the risks.
Satyrs don’t have mortal souls.
He’ll be reincarnated as a tree or a flower or something.
That made her feel even worse.
Hedge had died to get her here safely.
Her mom’s cabin was down theresomewhere, which meant she had brothers and sisters, more people she’d have to betray.
Do what we tell you, the voice had said.
Or theconsequences will be painful.
She tucked her hands under her arms, trying to stop them from shaking.
“You have friends here.
We’ve all been through a lot of weird stuff.
We know what you’re going through.
“My dad’s running out of places to put me.
“Piper, we’ve all been labeled troublemakers.
I ran away from home when I was seven.
Most of us are diagnosed with attention deficit disorder or dyslexia, or both—”“Leo’s ADHD,” Piper said.
It’s because we’re hardwired for battle.
Restless, impulsive—we don’t fit in with regular kids.
You should hear how much trouble Percy—” Herface darkened.
“Anyway, demigods get a bad rep.
How’d you get in trouble?”Usually when someone asked that question, Piper started a fight, or changed the subject, or caused some kind of distraction.
But for some reasonshe found herself telling the truth.
“Well, not really steal …”“Is your family poor?”Piper laughed bitterly.
“Not even.
I did it … I don’t know why.
For attention, I guess.
My dad never had time for me unless I got in trouble.
“I can relate.
But you said you didn’t really steal? What do you mean?”“Well … nobody ever believes me.
The police, teachers—even the people I took stuff from: they’re so embarrassed, they’ll deny what happened.
Butthe truth is, I don’t steal anything.
I just ask people for things.
And they give me stuff.
Even a BMW convertible.
I just asked.
And the dealer said, ‘Sure.
Then the police came after me.
She was used to people calling her a liar, but when she looked up, Annabeth just nodded.
If your dad were the god, I’d say you’re a child of Hermes, god of thieves.
He can be pretty convincing.
But your dad is mortal…”“Very,” Piper agreed.
“I don’t know, then.
With luck, your mom will claim you tonight.
If her mom were a goddess, would she know about that dream? Would she know what Piper had beenasked to do? Piper wondered if Olympian gods ever blasted their kids with lightning for being evil, or grounded them in the Underworld.
Piper decided she was going to have to be careful what she said from now on.
Annabeth was obviously pretty smart.
Ifanyone could figure out Piper’s secret …“Come on,” Annabeth said at last.
“There’s something else I need to check.
Bones and old swords littered the ground.
Torches flanked the entrance,which was covered in a velvet curtain embroidered with snakes.
It looked like the set for some kind of twisted puppet show.
“Nothing, right now.
A friend’s place.
I’ve been expecting her for a few days,but so far, nothing.
“Actually, her family has a luxury condo in Queens, and she goes to a finishing school in Connecticut.
But whenshe’s here at camp, yeah, she lives in the cave.
She’s our oracle, tells the future.
I was hoping she could help me—”“Find Percy,” Piper guessed.
She sat down on a rock, and her expression wasso full of pain, Piper felt like a voyeur.
Her eyes drifted to the crest of the hill, where a single pine tree dominated the skyline.
Something glittered in itslowest branch—like a fuzzy gold bath mat.
It was a sheep’s fleece.
Greek camp.
They’ve got a replica of the Golden Fleece.
At first she thought it was wrapped in a pile of massive purple cables.
But the cables had reptilian scales,clawed feet, and a snakelike head with yellow eyes and smoking nostrils.
“That’s the actual Golden Fleece?”Annabeth nodded, but it was clear she wasn’t really listening.
Her shoulders drooped.
She rubbed her face and took a shaky breath.
“Sorry.
A littletired.
“How long have been searching for your boyfriend?”“Three days, six hours, and about twelve minutes.
“We were so excited because we both started winter break early.
We met up at camp on Tuesday, figured wehad three weeks together.
It was going to be great.
Then after the campfire, he—he kissed me good night, went back to his cabin, and in the morning, hewas gone.
We searched the whole camp.
We contacted his mom.
We’ve tried to reach him every way we know how.
Nothing.
He just disappeared.
The same night she’d had her dream.
“How long were you guys together?”“Since August,” Annabeth said.
“August eighteenth.
“But we’ve only been together a few weeks.
“Piper … about that.
Maybe you should sit down.
Panic started building inside her, like her lungs were filling with water.
“Look, I know Jason thought—he thought hejust appeared at our school today.
But that’s not true.
I’ve known him for four months.
“It’s the Mist.
It’s a kind of veil separating the mortal world from the magic world.
Mortal minds—they can’t process strange stuff like gods and monsters,so the Mist bends reality.
It makes mortals see things in a way they can understand —like their eyes might just skip over this valley completely, or theymight look at that dragon and see a pile of cables.
“No.
You said yourself I’m not a regular mortal.
I’m a demigod.
I’ve seen it lots of times.
Monsters infiltrate some place like a school, pass themselves off as human, andeveryone thinks they remember that person.
They believe he’s always been around.
The Mist can change memories, even create memories of thingsthat never happened—”“But Jason’s not a monster!” Piper insisted.
“He’s a human guy, or demigod, or whatever you want to call him.
My memories aren’t fake.
They’re soreal.
The time we set Coach Hedge’s pants on fire.
The time Jason and I watched a meteor shower on the dorm roof and I finally got the stupid guy tokiss me.
She’d liked Jason from the first week they’d met.
Hewas so nice to her, and so patient, he could even put up with hyperactive Leo and his stupid jokes.
He’d accepted her for herself and didn’t judge herbecause of the stupid things she’d done.
They’d spent hours talking, looking at the stars, and eventually—finally—holding hands.
All that couldn’t befake.
“Piper, your memories are a lot sharper than most.
I’ll admit that, and I don’t know why that is.
But if you know him sowell—”“I do!”“Then where is he from?”Piper felt like she’d been hit between the eyes.
“He must have told me, but—”“Did you ever notice his tattoo before today? Did he ever tell you anything about his parents, or his friends, or his last school?”“I—I don’t know, but—”“Piper, what’s his last name?”Her mind went blank.
She didn’t know Jason’s last name.
How could that be?She started to cry.
She felt like a total fool, but she sat down on the rock next to Annabeth and just fell to pieces.
It was too much.
Did everything thatwas good in her stupid, miserable life have to be taken away?Yes, the dream had told her.
Yes, unless you do exactly what we say.
“We’ll figure it out.
Jason’s here now.
Who knows? Maybe it’ll work out with you guys for real.
Not if the dream had told her the truth.
But she couldn’t say that.
“You brought me up here so no one would see me blubbering, huh?”Annabeth shrugged.
“I figured it would be hard for you.
I know what it’s like to lose your boyfriend.
And now it’s just gone, like he doesn’t even recognize me.
If he really did just show up today,then why? How’d he get there? Why can’t he remember anything?”“Good questions,” Annabeth said.
“Hopefully Chiron can figure that out.
But for now, we need to get you settled.
You ready to go back down?”Piper gazed at the crazy assortment of cabins in the valley.
Her new home, a family who supposedly understood her—but soon they’d be just anotherbunch of people she’d disappointed, just another place she’d been kicked out of.
You’ll betray them for us, the voice had warned.
Or you’ll loseeverything.
“I’m ready.
They were incredible shots.
Nothing bounced off the rim.
Three-pointers went inautomatically.
“Bunch of showoffs with missile weapons—arrows, basketballs.
“Isn’t that dangerous?”“That’s sort of the point,” Annabeth said.
“Uh, sorry.
Bad pun.
That’s my cabin over there.
Number Six.
Through the open doorway, Piper could see bookshelves, weapon displays, and one of those computerized SMART Boards they havein classrooms.
Two girls were drawing a map that looked like a battle diagram.
Annabeth unlocked it, and insidewere not gardening tools, unless you wanted to make war on your tomato plants.
The shed was lined with all sorts of weapons—from swords to spearsto clubs like Coach Hedge’s.
“Hephaestus makes the best, but we have a pretty good selection, too.
Athena’s all aboutstrategy—matching the right weapon to the right person.
Let’s see …”Piper didn’t feel much like shopping for deadly objects, but she knew Annabeth was trying to do something nice for her.
“Don’t worry.
It doesn’t hurt humans.
It’s modified to shoot Celestialbronze, so it only kills monsters.
“Too flashy.
“A knife?”Annabeth dug it out and blew the dust off the scabbard.
It looked like it hadn’t seen the light of day in centuries.
“I don’t think you want this one.
Swords are usually better.
“Well, take a look if you want.
Nothing fancy, nothing flashy.
The polished wood handle fit beautifully in Piper’s hand.
Whenshe unsheathed it, she found a triangular blade eighteen inches long—bronze gleaming like it had been polished yesterday.
The edges were deadlysharp.
Her reflection in the blade caught her by surprise.
She looked older, more serious, not as scared as she felt.
“That kind of blade is called a parazonium.
It was mostly ceremonial, carried by high-ranking officers in the Greekarmies.
It showed you were a person of power and wealth, but in a fight, it could protect you just fine.
“Why didn’t you think it was right?”Annabeth exhaled.
“That blade has a long story.
Most people would be afraid to claim it.
Its first owner … well, things didn’t turn out too well for her.
“Wait, you mean the Helen? Helen of Troy?”Annabeth nodded.
“And it’s just sitting in your toolshed?”“We’re surrounded by Ancient Greek stuff,” Annabeth said.
“This isn’t a museum.
Weapons like that—they’re meant to be used.
They’re our heritageas demigods.
That was a wedding present from Menelaus, Helen’s first husband.
She named the dagger Katoptris.
“Looking glass.
Probably because that’s the only thing Helen used it for.
I don’t think it’s ever seen battle.
For a moment, her own image stared up at her, but then the reflection changed.
She saw flames, and a grotesqueface like something carved from bedrock.
She heard the same laughter as in her dream.
She saw her dad in chains, tied to a post in front of a roaringbonfire.
I just …” She had to control herself.
With trembling fingers, she picked up the dagger.
“I just got overwhelmed.
So much happening today.
But… I want to keep the dagger, if that’s okay.
Then she waved off the Apollo kids.
“Okay, if you’re sure.
You turned really pale, there.
I thought you were having a seizure orsomething.
“Is there … um, a phone at camp? Can I call my dad?”Annabeth’s gray eyes were almost as unnerving as the dagger blade.
She seemed to be calculating a million possibilities, trying to read Piper’sthoughts.
“Most demigods, if they use a cell phone, it’s like sending up a signal, letting monsters know where you are.
“Kind of against the rules, but if it can be our secret …”Piper took it gratefully, trying not to let her hands shake.
She stepped away from Annabeth and turned to face the commons area.
Voice mail.
She’d been trying for three days, ever since the dream.
Her dad’s personal assistant answered immediately.
“Mr.
McLean’s office.
“Where’s my dad?”Jane was silent for a moment, probably wondering if she could get away with hanging up.
“Piper, I thought you weren’t supposed to call from school.
“Maybe I ran away to live among the woodland creatures.
“Well, I’ll tell him you called.
“When are you going to call the police, Jane? Hecould be in trouble.
I’m sure he’s fine.
He does take off occasionally.
He always comes back.
You don’t know—”“I have to go, Piper,” Jane snapped.
“Enjoy school.
Piper cursed.
She walked back to Annabeth and handed her the phone.
She didn’t trust herself not to start crying again.
“Your last name is McLean? Sorry, it’s not my business.
But that sounds really familiar.
What does your dad do?”“He’s got a degree in the arts,” Piper said automatically.
“He’s a Cherokee artist.
Not a lie, just not the whole truth.
Most people, when they heard that, figured her dad sold Indian souvenirs at a roadsidestand on a reservation.
Sitting Bull bobble-heads, wampum necklaces, Big Chief tablets—that kind of thing.
“You feeling okay? Want to keep going?”Piper fastened her new dagger to her belt and promised herself that later, when she was alone, she’d figure out how it worked.
“Sure,” she said.
“Iwant to see everything.
No burning signs—wombats or otherwise—appeared over her head.
“Oh, right.
But—you know, he does other stuff too.
Thankfully, Annabeth didn’t seem to make the connection.
But no campers.
Artemis was an eternal maiden, so shedoesn’t have any kids.
She’d always liked the stories of Artemis, and figured she would make a cool mom.
“They visit sometimes.
They’re not the children of Artemis, but they’re her handmaidens—this band of immortal teenage girls who adventure together and hunt monsters and stuff.
“That sounds cool.
They get to be immortal?”“Unless they die in combat, or break their vows.
Did I mention they have to swear off boys? No dating—ever.
For eternity.
“Never mind.
For a moment she looked almost happy, and Piper thought she’d be a cool friend to hang out with in better times.
You’re not going to make any friends here.
Not once they find out.
They walked by the doorway, and the smell of perfume almost made Piper gag.
“Aphrodite’s cabin.
Goddess of love.
Drew is the head counselor.
“The last head counselor we had was great.
“We should keep moving.
She wondered if she could be the daughter of Demeter, the farming goddess.
Athena was cool.
Or maybe Hecate, the magic goddess.
But it didn’t really matter.
Even here,where everyone was supposed to find a lost parent, she knew she would still end up the unwanted kid.
She was not looking forward to the campfiretonight.
“Male gods on the left, female on the right.
Then last year, we added a whole bunchof new cabins for the other gods who didn’t have thrones on Olympus—Hecate, Hades, Iris—”“What are the two big ones on the end?” Piper asked.
“Zeus and Hera.
King and queen of the gods.
The Zeus cabin reminded Piper of a bank.
It was white marblewith big columns out front and polished bronze doors emblazoned with lightning bolts.
“Zeus went a long time without having any children.
Well, mostly.
Zeus, Poseidon, and Hades, the eldest brothers among the gods—they’re called the Big Three.
Their kids are really powerful, really dangerous.
For the last seventy years or so, they tried to avoid having demigodchildren.
I’ve got a friend, Thalia Grace, who’s the daughter of Zeus.
But she gave up camp life and became a Hunter ofArtemis.
My boyfriend, Percy, he’s a son of Poseidon.
And there’s a kid who shows up sometimes, Nico—son of Hades.
Except for them, there are nodemigod children of the Big Three gods.
At least, not that we know of.
The cabin bothered her, though she wasn’t sure why.
“She doesn’t have kids with anyone but Zeus.
The cabin’s just honorary.
“I thought we’d made peace, but when Percy disappeared … I got this weird dream vision from her.
“But you thought Percy would be there.
“I’ve got nothing good to say about Hera right now.
“So who goes in here?”“No one.
The cabin is just honorary, like I said.
No one goes in.
On instinct, she pushed the doors and they swung open easily.
“Um, Piper, I don’t think we should—”“We’re supposed to do dangerous stuff, right?” And Piper walked inside.
It was as cold as a freezer, with a circle of white columns around a central statue of thegoddess, ten feet tall, seated on a throne in flowing golden robes.
Piper had always thought of Greek statues as white with blank eyes, but this one wasbrightly painted so it looked almost human—except huge.
Hera’s piercing eyes seemed to follow Piper.
Piper wondered who tended it if the cabin was always empty.
A stone hawk sat on Hera’sshoulder, and in her hand was a staff topped with a lotus flower.
The goddess’s hair was done in black plaits.
Her face smiled, but the eyes were coldand calculating, as if she were saying: Mother knows best.
Now don’t cross me or I will have to step on you.
For a goddessof home and marriage, Hera’s place reminded Piper of a tomb.
At least Piper was sure of that.
She hadn’t come in here because she felt a good connection, but because her sense ofdread was stronger here.
Her dream—that horrible ultimatum she’d been handed—had something to do with this cabin.
They weren’t alone.
Behind the statue, at a little altar in the back, stood a figure covered in a black shawl.
Only her hands were visible,palms up.
She seemed to be chanting something like a spell or a prayer.
“Rachel?”The other girl turned.
She dropped her shawl, revealing a mane of curly red hair and a freckled face that didn’t go with the seriousness of the cabinor the black shawl at all.
She looked about seventeen, a totally normal teen in a green blouse and tattered jeans covered with marker doodles.
Despitethe cold floor, she was barefoot.
“I’m so sorry! I came as fast as I could.
“Rachel, this is Piper, one of the half-bloods we rescued today.
Piper, this is Rachel Elizabeth Dare, ouroracle.
“That’s me.
“You can tell the future?”“More like the future mugs me from time to time,” Rachel said.
“I speak prophecies.
The oracle’s spirit kind of hijacks me every once in a while andspeaks important stuff that doesn’t make any sense to anybody.
But yeah, the prophecies tell the future.
“That’s cool.
“Don’t worry.
Everybody finds it a little creepy.
Even me.
But usually I’m harmless.
“Just mortal.
She glanced at Annabeth, then back at Piper.
“Just a hunch.
Something about this cabin and Percy’s disappearance.
They’reconnected somehow.
I’ve learned to follow my hunches, especially the last month, since the gods went silent.
“You haven’t told her yet?”“I was getting to that,” Annabeth said.
“Piper, for the last month … well, it’s normal for the gods not to talk to their children very much, but usually wecan count on some messages now and then.
Some of us can even visit Olympus.
I spent practically all semester at the Empire State Building.
“Sure, why not?”“Annabeth was redesigning Olympus after it was damaged in the Titan War,” Rachel explained.
“She’s an amazing architect.
You should see thesalad bar—”“Anyway,” Annabeth said, “starting about a month ago, Olympus fell silent.
The entrance closed, and no one could get in.
Nobody knows why.
It’s likethe gods have sealed themselves off.
Even my mom won’t answer my prayers, and our camp director, Dionysus, was recalled.
“Right.
Go on.
“Demigods still get claimed, but nothing else.
No messages.
No visits.
No sign the gods are even listening.
It’s likesomething has happened —something really bad.
Then Percy disappeared.
“With no memory.
“My friend.
But Annabeth, you said Hera sent you adream vision.
“The first communication from a god in a month, and it’s Hera, the least helpful goddess, and she contacts me, her leastfavorite demigod.
She tells me I’ll find out what happened to Percy if I go to the Grand Canyon skywalk and look for a guy with one shoe.
Instead, I findyou guys, and the guy with one shoe is Jason.
It doesn’t make sense.
She looked at Piper, and Piper felt an overwhelming desire to tell them about her dream, to confessthat she knew what was happening—at least part of the story.
And the bad stuff was only beginning.
“I—I need to—”Before she could continue, Rachel’s body stiffened.
Her eyes began to glow with a greenish light, and she grabbed Piper by the shoulders.
But it wasn’t Rachel’s voice.
It sounded like an older woman, speaking from somewhere far away, down a long, echoing pipe.
It must be by the solstice.
Annabeth tried to separate Piper from Rachel, but it was no use.
Green smoke enveloped them, and Piper was no longersure if she was awake or dreaming.
The giant statue of the goddess seemed to rise from its throne.
It leaned over Piper, its eyes boring into her.
Thestatue’s mouth opened, its breath like horribly thick perfume.
It spoke in the same echoing voice: Our enemies stir.
The fiery one is only the first.
Bow tohis will, and their king shall rise, dooming us all.
FREE ME!Piper’s knees buckled, and everything went black.
Everything he showed Leo was so amazing, it should’ve been illegal.
Real Greek warshipsmoored at the beach that sometimes had practice fights with flaming arrows and explosives? Sweet! Arts & crafts sessions where you could makesculptures with chain saws and blowtorches? Leo was like, Sign me up! The woods were stocked with dangerous monsters, and no one should ever goin there alone? Nice! And the camp was overflowing with fine-looking girls.
Leo didn’t quite understand the whole related-to-the-gods business, but hehoped that didn’t mean he was cousins with all these ladies.
That would suck.
At the very least, he wanted to check out those underwater girls in the lakeagain.
They were definitely worth drowning for.
“You’ll probably make your own, seeing as how you’re in Cabin Nine.
“The original names are Greek.
Your dad is Hephaestus.
“Sounds like the god of cowboys.
“God of blacksmiths and fire.
The god of fire … seriously? Considering what had happened to his mom, thatseemed like a sick joke.
“Good thing, or bad thing?”Will took a while to answer.
“You were claimed almost immediately.
That’s usually good.
Since Cabin Nine’s last head counselor died—”“Died? Like, painfully?”“I ought to let your bunkmates tell you about it.
You’ll see why.
“This just gets better and better.
And she was not the kind of person he expected to see at a demigod camp.
That’s what she’d called herself, but Leo hadn’t seen her since he was five years old.
She was just standing there, in theshadow of a big white cabin at the end of the green, watching him.
She wore her black linen widow’s dress, with a black shawl pulled over her hair.
Herface hadn’t changed—leathery skin, piercing dark eyes.
Her withered hands were like claws.
She looked ancient, but no different than Leo remembered.
“What’s she doing here?”Will tried to follow his gaze.
“What old lady?”“Dude, the old lady.
The one in black.
How many old ladies do you see over there?”Will frowned.
“I think you’ve had a long day, Leo.
The Mist could still be playing tricks on your mind.
How about we head straight to your cabin now?”Leo wanted to protest, but when he looked back toward the big white cabin, Tía Callida was gone.
He was sure she’d been there, almost as ifthinking about his mom had summoned Callida back from the past.
He couldn’t haveeverybody at camp thinking he was crazy.
At least, not crazier than he really was.
“I’m in the mood for a good curse.
The entrance was like a bank vaultdoor, circular and several feet thick.
It opened with lots of brass gears turning and hydraulic pistons blowing smoke.
“They got a steampunk theme going on, huh?”Inside, the cabin seemed deserted.
Steel bunks were folded against the walls like high-tech Murphy beds.
Each had a digital control panel, blinkingLED lights, glowing gems, and interlocking gears.
Leo figured each camper had his own combination lock to release his bed, and there was probably analcove behind it with storage, maybe some traps to keep out unwanted visitors.
At least, that’s the way Leo would’ve designed it.
A fire pole came downfrom the second floor, even though the cabin didn’t appear to have a second floor from the outside.
A circular staircase led down into some kind ofbasement.
The walls were lined with every kind of power tool Leo could imagine, plus a huge assortment of knives, swords, and other implements ofdestruction.
A large workbench overflowed with scrap metal—screws, bolts, washers, nails, rivets, and a million other machine parts.
Leo had a strongurge to shovel them all into his coat pockets.
He loved that kind of stuff.
But he’d need a hundred more coats to fit it all.
Not the weapons, maybe—but the tools, the piles of scrap, thesmell of grease and metal and hot engines.
She would’ve loved this place.
He didn’t like painful memories.
Keep moving—that was his motto.
Don’t dwell on things.
Don’t stay in one place toolong.
It was the only way to stay ahead of the sadness.
“A weed whacker? What’s the god of fire want with a weed whacker?”A voice in the shadows said, “You’d be surprised.
A curtain of dark camouflage material retracted, and Leo could see the guy who’dbeen invisible a second before.
It was hard to tell much about him because he was covered in a body cast.
His head was wrapped in gauze except forhis face, which was puffy and bruised.
He looked like the Pillsbury Doughboy after a beat-down.
“I’d shake your hand, but …”“Yeah,” Leo said.
“Don’t get up.
Leo wondered what had happened to him, but he was afraid to ask.
“Been almost a year since we had any new kids.
I’m head counselor for now.
“So where is everybody, Jake?”“Down at the forges,” Jake said wistfully.
“They’re working on … you know, that problem.
“So, you got a spare bed for Leo?”Jake studied Leo, sizing him up.
“You believe in curses, Leo? Or ghosts?”I just saw my evil babysitter Tía Callida, Leo thought.
She’s got to be dead after all these years.
And I can’t go a day without remembering my mom inthat machine shop fire.
Don’t talk to me about ghosts, doughboy.
Nah.
I’m cool.
A storm spirit chucked me down the Grand Canyon this morning, but you know, all in a day’s work,right?”Jake nodded.
“That’s good.
Because I’ll give you the best bed in the cabin—Beckendorf’s.
“You sure?”Jake called out: “Bunk 1-A, please.
A circular section of the floor spiraled open like a camera lens, and a full-size bed popped up.
The bronze frame had abuilt-in game station at the footboard, a stereo system in the headboard, a glass-door refrigerator mounted into the base, and a whole bunch of controlpanels running down the side.
“I can handle this.
“See y’all.
I’ll be down in the Leo Cave.
Which button do I press?”“Hold on,” Will Solace protested.
“You guys have private underground rooms?”Jake probably would’ve smiled if it didn’t hurt so much.
“We got lots of secrets, Will.
You Apollo guys can’t have all the fun.
Our campers have beenexcavating the tunnel system under Cabin Nine for almost a century.
We still haven’t found the end.
Anyway, Leo, if you don’t mind sleeping in a deadman’s bed, it’s yours.
He sat up, careful not to touch any of the buttons.
“The counselor who died—this was his bed?”“Yeah,” Jake said.
“Charles Beckendorf.
“He didn’t, like, die in this bed, did he?”“No,” Jake said.
“In the Titan War, last summer.
“The big powerful guys that ruled the world before the gods.
They tried to make a comeback lastsummer.
Their leader, Kronos, built a new palace on top of Mount Tam in California.
Their armies came to New York and almost destroyed MountOlympus.
A lot of demigods died trying to stop them.
“You didn’t hear about Mount St.
Helens erupting, or the freak storms across thecountry, or that building collapsing in St.
Louis?”Leo shrugged.
Last summer, he’d been on the run from another foster home.
Then a truancy officer caught him in New Mexico, and the courtsentenced him to the nearest correctional facility—the Wilderness School.
“Guess I was busy.
“You were lucky to miss it.
The thing is, Beckendorf was one of the first casualties, and ever since then—”“Your cabin’s been cursed,” Leo guessed.
Then again, the dude was in a body cast.
That was an answer.
Leo started noticing little things that he hadn’t seen before—anexplosion mark on the wall, a stain on the floor that might’ve been oil … or blood.
Broken swords and smashed machines kicked into the corners of theroom, maybe out of frustration.
The place did feel unlucky.
“Well, I should get some sleep.
I hope you like it here, Leo.
It used to be … really nice.
“I’ll take you to the forges.
“Explosion.
Beckendorf and Percy Jackson blew up a cruise ship full of monsters.
Beckendorf didn’t make it out.
That guy must’ve been into everything around here, Leo thought.
“I mean —before he blew up?”“He was awesome,” Will agreed.
“It was hard on the whole camp when he died.
Jake—he became head counselor in the middle of the war.
Sameas I did, actually.
Jake did his best, but he never wanted to be leader.
He just likes building stuff.
Then after the war, things started to go wrong.
CabinNine’s chariots blew up.
Their automatons went haywire.
Their inventions started to malfunction.
It was like a curse, and eventually people started callingit that—the Curse of Cabin Nine.
Then Jake had his accident—”“Which had something to do with the problem he mentioned,” Leo guessed.
“And here we are.
White marble columnslined the soot-stained walls.
Chimneys pumped smoke over an elaborate gable carved with a bunch of gods and monsters.
The building sat at the edgeof a stream, with several waterwheels turning a series of bronze gears.
Leo heard machinery grinding inside, fires roaring, and hammers ringing onanvils.
The noise died down to the roar ofthe forge and the click-click-click of gears and levers.
“This is your new brother, Leo—um, what’s your last name?”“Valdez.
Was he really related to all of them? His cousins came from some big families, but he’d alwaysjust had his mom—until she died.
Their names blurred together: Shane, Christopher, Nyssa, Harley (yeah, likethe motorcycle).
Leo knew he’d never keep everybody straight.
Too many of them.
Too overwhelming.
You’d never think, Hey, look, it’s the Hephaestus Bunch!But they all had powerful hands, rough with calluses and stained with engine grease.
Even little Harley, who couldn’t have been more than eight, lookedlike he could go six rounds with Chuck Norris without breaking a sweat.
Their shoulders slumped like life had beaten them down pretty hard.
Several looked like they’dbeen physically beaten up, too.
Leo counted two arm slings, one pair of crutches, an eye patch, six Ace bandages, and about seven thousand Band-Aids.
“I hear this is the party cabin!”Nobody laughed.
They all just stared at him.
“I’ll leave you guys to get acquainted.
Somebody show Leo to dinner when it’s time?”“I got it,” one of the girls said.
Nyssa, Leo remembered.
She wore camo pants, a tank top that showed off her buffarms, and a red bandanna over amop of dark hair.
Except for the smiley-face Band-Aid on her chin, she looked like one of those female action heroes, like any second she was going tograb a machine gun and start mowing down evil aliens.
“I always wanted a sister who could beat me up.
“Come on, joker boy.
I’ll show you around.
He’d grown up around grease monkeys and power tools.
His mom used to joke that his first pacifier was a lugwrench.
But he’d never seen any place like the camp forge.
He kept testing the blade on a slab of concrete.
Each time he swung, the ax cut into the slab like it was warmcheese, but the guy looked unsatisfied and went back to honing the edge.
“A battleship?”“You never know.
Even with Celestial bronze—”“That’s the metal?”She nodded.
“Mined from Mount Olympus itself.
Extremely rare.
Anyway, it usually disintegrates monsters on contact, but big powerful ones havenotoriously tough hides.
Drakons, for instances—”“You mean dragons?”“Similar species.
You’ll learn the difference in monster-fighting class.
Yeah, I already got my black belt in that.
Leo hoped she wasn’t this serious all the time.
His dad’s side of the family had to have some sense of humor, right?They passed a couple of guys making a bronze windup toy.
At least that’s what it looked like.
It was a six-inch-tall centaur—half man, half horse—armed with a miniature bow.
One of the campers cranked the centaur’s tail, and it whirred to life.
It galloped across the table, yelling, “Die, mosquito!Die, mosquito!” and shooting everything in sight.
Six needle-sized arrows embedded themselves in hisshirt before a camper grabbed a hammer and smashed the centaur to pieces.
“I just want a magic bug killer! Is that too much to ask?”“Ouch,” Leo said.
“Ah, you’re fine.
Let’s move on before they rebuild it.
“That sort of thing happen a lot?”“Lately,” Nyssa said, “everything we build turns to junk.
“I don’t believe in curses.
But something’s wrong.
And if we don’t figure out the dragon problem, it’s gonna get even worse.
The map showed the camp—a semicircle of land with Long Island Soundon the north shore, the woods to the west, the cabins to the east, and a ring of hills to the south.
“The woods are a better hiding place.
“You guys lost a dragon? A real full-size dragon?”“It’s a bronze dragon,” Nyssa said.
“But yes, it’s a life-size automaton.
Hephaestus cabin built it years ago.
Then it was lost in the woods until a fewsummers back, when Beckendorf found it in pieces and rebuilt it.
It’s been helping protect the camp, but, um, it’s a little unpredictable.
“Beckendorf was the only one who could control it.
Then he died, and the dragon just got worse and worse.
Finally it went berserkand ran off.
Occasionally it shows up, demolishes something, and runs away again.
Everyone expects us to find it and destroy it—”“Destroy it?” Leo was appalled.
“You’ve got a life-size bronze dragon, and you want to destroy it?”“It breathes fire,” Nyssa explained.
“It’s deadly and out of control.
Can’t you try talking to it, controlling it?”“We tried.
Jake Mason tried.
You saw how well that worked.
“Still—”“There’s no other option.
“Let’s try more traps in the woods—here, here, and here.
Bait them with thirty-weight motoroil.
“He used to like it with a little Tabasco sauce, right before bed.
If he springs a trap, we can come in with acidsprayers—should melt through his hide.
Then we get metal cutters and … and finish the job.
Leo realized they didn’t want to kill the dragon any more than he did.
“There has to be another way.
“The thing breathes fire.
We can’t even get close.
Oh, man, the things he could tell them about fire… But he had to be careful, even if these were his brothers and sisters.
Especiallyif he had to live with them.
“Hephaestus is the god of fire, right? So don’t any of you have like fire resistance or something?”Nobody acted as if it was a crazy question, which was a relief, but Nyssa shook her head gravely.
Demigod children of Hephaestus … we’re just good with our hands.
We’re builders, craftsmen, weaponsmiths—stufflike that.
“Oh.
“A long time ago some children of Hephaestus were born with power over fire.
But that ability was very, very rare.
No demigod like that has been born in centuries.
The last one …” She looked at one of the other kids for help.
“Guy named Thomas Faynor.
He started the Great Fire of London, destroyed most of the city.
“When a child of Hephaestus like that appears, it usually means something catastrophic is about to happen.
And we don’t needany more catastrophes.
“I guess I see your point.
Too bad, though.
If you could resist flames, youcould get close to the dragon.
“Or simply step on you.
No, we’ve got to destroy it.
Trust me, if anyone could figure outanother answer …”She didn’t finish, but Leo got the message.
This was the cabin’s big test.
If they could do something only Beckendorf could do, if they could subduethe dragon without killing it, then maybe their curse would be lifted.
But they were stumped for ideas.
Any camper who figured out how would be a hero.
Campers started putting up their tools and projects.
Leo hadn’t realized it was getting so late, but he lookedthrough the windows and saw the sun going down.
His ADHD did that to him sometimes.
If he was bored, a fifty-minute class seemed like six hours.
If hewas interested in something, like touring a demigod camp, hours slipped away and bam—the day was over.
“Come on, Leo.
“Can you … give me a second?”Nyssa hesitated.
Then her expression softened.
“Sure.
It’s a lot to process.
I remember my first day.
Come up when you’re ready.
Just don’t touchanything.
Almost every project in here can kill you if you’re not careful.
Soon Leo was alone with the sounds of the bellows, the waterwheels, and small machines clicking andwhirring.
It was wrong.
Plain wrong.
And always dangerous.
They were long and thin, not callused like the other Hephaestus campers’.
Leo had never been thebiggest or the strongest kid.
He’d survived in tough neighborhoods, tough schools, tough foster homes by using his wits.
He was the class clown, thecourt jester, because he’d learned early that if you cracked jokes and pretended you weren’t scared, you usually didn’t get beat up.
Even the baddestgangster kids would tolerate you, keep you around for laughs.
Plus, humor was a good way to hide the pain.
And if that didn’t work, there was alwaysPlan B. Run away.
Over and over.
Then flames flickered to life, curls of red-hot fire dancingacross his palm.
“The Big House, camp headquarters.
The wraparound porch had lounge chairs, a card table, and anempty wheelchair.
Wind chimes shaped like nymphs turned into trees as they spun.
Jason could imagine old people coming here for summer vacation,sitting on the porch and sipping prune juice while they watched the sunset.
Still, the windows seemed to glare down at him like angry eyes.
The wideopendoorway looked ready to swallow him.
On the highest gable, a bronze eagle weathervane spun in the wind and pointed straight in his direction, asif telling him to turn around.
“Oh, please.
You’re perfect here, sweetie.
Believe me, I’ve seen a lot of heroes.
Jason wondered if she always smelled like that, or if it was some kind ofspecial perfume for the holidays.
Her pink eyeliner was really distracting.
Every time she blinked, he felt compelled to look at her.
Maybe that was thepoint, to show off her warm brown eyes.
She was pretty.
No doubt about that.
But she made Jason feel uncomfortable.
“Look, I appreciate—”“Is it that girl?” Drew pouted.
“Oh, please, tell me you are not dating the Dumpster Queen.
He didn’t think he’d ever seen Piper before today, but he felt strangely guilty about it.
He knew he shouldn’t be inthis place.
He shouldn’t befriend these people, and certainly he shouldn’t date one of them.
Still … Piper had been holding his hand when he woke up onthat bus.
She believed she was his girlfriend.
She’d been brave on the skywalk, fighting those venti, and when Jason had caught her in midair and they’dheld each other face-to-face, he couldn’t pretend he wasn’t a little tempted to kiss her.
But that wasn’t right.
He didn’t even know his own story.
Hecouldn’t play with her emotions like that.
“Let me help you decide, sweetie.
You can do better.
A guy with your looks and obvious talent?”She wasn’t looking at him, though.
She was staring at a spot right above his head.
“Like what popped over Leo’s head.
I mean, from what I heard, you’re pretty powerful, right? You’re going to be important at camp, so I figure your parent willclaim you right away.
And I’d love to see that.
I wanna be with you every step of the way! So is your dad or mom the god? Please tell me it’s not yourmom.
I would hate it if you were an Aphrodite kid.
You can’t date somebody from your own cabin.
Yuck!”“But aren’t all the gods related?” Jason asked.
“So isn’t everyone here your cousin or something?”“Aren’t you cute! Sweetie, the godly side of your family doesn’t count except for your parent.
So anybody from another cabin—they’re fair game.
Sowho’s your godly parent—mom or dad?”As usual, Jason didn’t have an answer.
He looked up, but no glowing sign popped above his head.
At the top of the Big House, the weathervanewas still pointing his direction, that bronze eagle glaring as if to say, Turn around, kid, while you still can.
No—not footsteps—hooves.
“This is Jason.
He’s totally awesome!”Jason backed up so fast he almost tripped.
Rounding the corner of the porch was a man on horseback.
Except he wasn’t on horseback—he waspart of the horse.
From the waist up he was human, with curly brown hair and a well-trimmed beard.
He wore a T-shirt that said World’s Best Centaur,and had a quiver and bow strapped to his back.
His head was so high up he had to duck to avoid the porch lights, because from the waist down, he wasa white stallion.
Then the color drained from his face.
“You should be dead.
He told Drew to go back to her cabin, which Drew didn’tlook happy about.
He slipped off his quiver and bow and backed up to the chair, which opened like amagician’s box.
Chiron gingerly stepped into it with his back legs and began scrunching himself into a space that should’ve been much too small.
Jasonimagined a truck’s reversing noises—beep, beep, beep—as the centaur’s lower half disappeared and the chair folded up, popping out a set of fakehuman legs covered in a blanket, so Chiron appeared to be a regular mortal guy in a wheelchair.
“We have lemonade.
Grapevines curved up the walls and across the ceiling, which Jason found a littlestrange.
He didn’t think plants grew like that inside, especially in the winter, but these were leafy green and bursting with bunches of red grapes.
Wedged in one corner, an old-style Pac-Man arcade game beeped and blinked.
Grapevines grew through their mouths so they seemed to have leafy tongues.
Some had redgrapes bulging through their eyeholes.
It looked so real, its eyes seemed to follow Jason.
Then it snarled, andJason nearly leaped out of his skin.
“Jason is a friend.
Behave yourself.
He threw one to the leopard, who snapped itup and licked his lips.
“All this was a parting gift from our old director before he was recalled to Mount Olympus.
He thought itwould help us to remember him.
Mr.
D has a strange sense of humor.
D,” Jason said.
“Dionysus?”“Mmm hmm.
“As for Seymour, well, Mr.
D liberated him from a Long Islandgarage sale.
The leopard is Mr.
D’s sacred animal, you see, and Mr.
D was appalled that someone would stuff such a noble creature.
He decided togrant it life, on the assumption that life as a mounted head was better than no life at all.
I must say it’s a kinder fate than Seymour’s previous owner got.
“Please, sit.
Chiron sat back in his wheelchair and tried for a smile, but Jason could tell it wasforced.
The old man’s eyes were as deep and dark as wells.
He didn’t see any point in hiding thedetails, and Chiron was a good listener.
He didn’t react to the story, other than to nod encouragingly for more.
“And you must have questions for me.
“What did you mean when you said that I should be dead?”Chiron studied him with concern, as if he expected Jason to burst into flames.
“My boy, do you know what those marks on your arm mean? The colorof your shirt? Do you remember anything?”Jason looked at the tattoo on his forearm: SPQR, the eagle, twelve straight lines.
“Nothing.
“Do you understand what this place is, and who I am?”“You’re Chiron the centaur,” Jason said.
“I’m guessing you’re the same one from the old stories, who used to train the Greek heroes like Heracles.
“I mean, I don’t think we should worship them or sacrifice chickens to them or anything, but they’re still aroundbecause they’re a powerful part of civilization.
They move from country to country as the center of power shifts—like they moved from Ancient Greece toRome.
“So you already know the gods are real.
You have already beenclaimed, haven’t you?”“Maybe,” Jason answered.
“I’m not really sure.
The centaur had switched to another language and Jason had understood, automaticallyanswering in the same tongue.
“What was that?”“You know Latin,” Chiron observed.
“Most demigods recognize a few phrases, of course.
It’s in their blood, but not as much as Ancient Greek.
Nonecan speak Latin fluently without practice.
He still had the feeling that he shouldn’t behere.
It was wrong—and dangerous.
But at least Chiron wasn’t threatening.
In fact the centaur seemed concerned for him, afraid for his safety.
“I taught your namesake, you know, the original Jason.
He had a hard path.
I’ve seenmany heroes come and go.
Occasionally, they have happy endings.
Mostly, they don’t.
It breaks my heart, like losing a child each time one of my pupilsdies.
But you—you are not like any pupil I’ve ever taught.
Your presence here could be a disaster.
“You must be an inspiring teacher.
But it’s true.
I had hoped that after Percy’s success—”“Percy Jackson, you mean.
Annabeth’s boyfriend, the one who’s missing.
“I hoped that after he succeeded in the Titan War and saved Mount Olympus, we might have some peace.
I might be able to enjoyone final triumph, a happy ending, and perhaps retire quietly.
I should have known better.
The last chapter approaches, just as it did before.
The worst isyet to come.
“So—last chapter, happened before, worst yet to come.
Sounds fun, but can we go back to the part where I’m supposed tobe dead? I don’t like that part.
I swore on the River Styx and on all things sacred that I would never …” Chiron frowned.
“But you’re here, inviolation of the same oath.
That too, should not be possible.
I don’t understand.
Who would’ve done such a thing? Who—”Seymour the leopard howled.
His mouth froze, half open.
The arcade game stopped beeping.
The fire stopped crackling, its flames hardening likered glass.
The masks stared down silently at Jason with their grotesque grape eyes and leafy tongues.
“What’s going—”The old centaur had frozen, too.
Jason jumped off the couch, but Chiron kept staring at the same spot, his mouth open mid-sentence.
His eyes didn’tblink.
His chest didn’t move.
Then dark mist boiled out of Seymour’s mouth, and an even worse thought occurred toJason: storm spirits.
With a quick flip, it changed into a sword.
Her face was hooded, but her eyes glowed in the darkness.
Over her shoulders she wore agoatskin cloak.
Jason wasn’t sure how he knew it was goatskin, but he recognized it and knew it was important.
Her voice echoed in Jason’s head.
Lower your sword.
“How did you—”Our time is limited, Jason.
My prison grows stronger by the hour.
It took me a full month to gather enough energy to work even the smallestmagic through its bonds.
I’ve managed to bring you here, but now I have little time left, and even less power.
This may be the last time I can speak toyou.
“Look, I don’t know you, and you’re not my patron.
I have known you since your birth.
I don’t remember anything.
That also was necessary.
Long ago, your father gave me your life as a gift to placate my anger.
He named youJason, after my favorite mortal.
You belong to me.
“I don’t belong to anyone.
Find my prison.
Free me, or their king will rise from the earth, and I will be destroyed.
You will neverretrieve your memory.
Four short days.
Do not fail me.
Seymour’s howl turned into a cough like he’d sucked in a hair ball.
The fire crackled to life, the arcade machine beeped, and Chironsaid, “—would dare to bring you here?”“Probably the lady in the mist,” Jason offered.
“Weren’t you just sitting … why do you have a sword drawn?”“I hate to tell you this,” Jason said, “but I think your leopard just ate a goddess.
“That does explain a lot.
“Please.
The front door blew open, and Annabeth and another girl, a redhead,burst in, dragging Piper between them.
Piper’s head lolled like she was unconscious.
“What’s wrong with her?”“Hera’s cabin,” Annabeth gasped, like they’d run all the way.
“Vision.
Bad.
“I think I may have killed her.
Piper was stillbreathing, but she wouldn’t wake up.
She seemed to be in some kind of coma.
“There’s a way, right?”Seeing her so pale, barely breathing, Jason felt a surge of protectiveness.
Maybe he didn’t really know her.
Maybe she wasn’t his girlfriend.
Butthey’d survived the Grand Canyon together.
They’d come all this way.
He’d left her side for a little while, and this had happened.
“Her mind is in a fragile state.
Rachel, what happened?”“I wish I knew,” she said.
“As soon as I got to camp, I had a premonition about Hera’s cabin.
I went inside.
Annabeth and Piper came in while I wasthere.
We talked, and then—I just blanked out.
Annabeth said I spoke in a different voice.
The spirit of Delphi comes from within.
I know how that feels.
This was like long distance, a power trying to speak through me.
She knelt next to Piper.
“Chiron, what happened back there—I’ve never seen anything like it.
I’ve heardRachel’s prophecy voice.
This was different.
She sounded like an older woman.
She grabbed Piper’s shoulders and told her—”“To free her from a prison?” Jason guessed.
“How did you know that?”Chiron made a three-fingered gesture over his heart, like a ward against evil.
Annabeth, the medicine bag, please.
“Supernatural phone calls from convicts demanding you bust them out of jail?”“Your patron,” Annabeth said.
“Not your godly parent?”“No, she said patron.
She also said my dad had given her my life.
“I’ve never of heard anything like that before.
You said the storm spirit on the skywalk—he claimed to be working for somemistress who was giving him orders, right? Could it be this woman you saw, messing with your mind?”“I don’t think so,” Jason said.
“If she were my enemy, why would she be asking for my help? She’s imprisoned.
She’s worried about some enemygetting more powerful.
Something about a king rising from the earth on the solstice—”Annabeth turned to Chiron.
“Not Kronos.
Please tell me it’s not that.
He held Piper’s wrist, checking her pulse.
That threat is ended.
But …”“But what?” Annabeth asked.
“Piper needs rest.
We should discuss this later.
“Sir, Mr.
Chiron, you told me the greatest threat was coming.
The last chapter.
You can’t possibly mean something worse thanan army of Titans, right?”“Oh,” Rachel said in a small voice.
“Oh, dear.
The woman was Hera.
Of course.
Her cabin, her voice.
She showed herself to Jason at the samemoment.
“She took you over? She did this to Piper?”“I think Rachel’s right,” Jason said.
“The woman did seem like a goddess.
And she wore this—this goatskin cloak.
That’s a symbol of Juno, isn’t it?”“It is?” Annabeth scowled.
“I’ve never heard that.
“Of Juno, Hera’s Roman aspect, in her most warlike state.
The goatskin cloak was a symbol of the Roman soldier.
“Who could do that to the queen of the gods?”Annabeth crossed her arms.
“Well, whoever they are, maybe we should thank them.
If they can shut up Hera—”“Annabeth,” Chiron warned, “she is still one of the Olympians.
In many ways, she is the glue that holds the gods’ family together.
If she truly has beenimprisoned and is in danger of destruction, this could shake the foundations of the world.
It could unravel the stability of Olympus, which is never greateven in the best of times.
And if Hera has asked Jason for help—”“Fine,” Annabeth grumbled.
“Well, we know Titans can capture a god, right? Atlas captured Artemis a few years ago.
And in the old stories, the godscaptured each other in traps all the time.
But something worse than a Titan … ?”Jason looked at the leopard’s head.
Seymour was smacking his lips like the goddess had tasted much better than a Snausage.
“Hera said she’dbeen trying to break through her prison bonds for a month.
“So the gods must know something bad is going on.
“She wiped my memory, plopped me into the Wilderness School field trip, and sent you adream vision to come pick me up.
Why am I so important? Why not just send up an emergency flare to the other gods—let them know where she is sothey bust her out?”“The gods need heroes to do their will down here on earth,” Rachel said.
“That’s right, isn’t it? Their fates are always intertwined with demigods.
Why him? Why take his memory?”“And Piper’s involved somehow,” Rachel said.
“Hera sent her the same message—Free me.
And, Annabeth, this must have something to do withPercy’s disappearing.
“Why are you so quiet, Chiron? What is it we’re facing?”The old centaur’s face looked like it had aged ten years in a matter of minutes.
The lines around his eyes were deeply etched.
“My dear, in this, Icannot help you.
I am so sorry.
“You’ve never … you’ve never kept information from me.
Even the last great prophecy—”“I will be in my office.
“I need some time to think before dinner.
Rachel, will you watch the girl? Call Argus to bring her to theinfirmary, if you’d like.
And Annabeth, you should speak with Jason.
Tell him about—about the Greek and Roman gods.
Annabeth’s eyes turned stormy.
She muttered something in Greek, and Jason gotthe feeling it wasn’t complimentary toward centaurs.
“I think my being here—I don’t know.
I’ve messed things up coming to the camp, somehow.
Chiron said he’d sworn an oathand couldn’t talk about it.
“I’ve never seen him act this way.
And why would he tell me to talk to you about the gods.
Apparently she’d just noticed Jason’s sword sitting on the coffee table.
She touched the blade gingerly, like it might be hot.
“Do you remember where you got it?”“No,” Jason said.
“Like I said, I don’t remember anything.
“If Chiron won’t help, we’ll need to figure things out ourselves.
Which means… Cabin Fifteen.
Rachel, you’ll keep an eye on Piper?”“Sure,” Rachel promised.
“Good luck, you two.
“What’s in Cabin Fifteen?”Annabeth stood.
“Maybe a way to get your memory back.
Some were fancy, with glowing walls or blazing torches, but CabinFifteen was not so dramatic.
It looked like an old-fashioned prairie house with mud walls and a rush roof.
On the door hung a wreath of crimson flowers—red poppies, Jason thought, though he wasn’t sure how he knew.
“This is the cabin for Hypnos, the god of sleep.
“If there’s any god who can help us figure out memory loss, it’s Hypnos.
A warm fire crackled in the hearth.
Above themantel hung a tree branch, each twig dripping white liquid into a collection of tin bowls.
Jason was tempted to catch a drop on his finger just to see whatit was, but he held himself back.
The air smelled like fresh laundry.
The cabin was so cozy and peaceful that Jason’s eyelids started to feelheavy.
A nap sounded like a great idea.
He was exhausted.
There were plenty of empty beds, all with feather pillows and fresh sheets and fluffy quilts and—Annabeth nudged him.
“Snap out of it.
He realized his knees had been starting to buckle.
“If you ask me, this place is even more dangerous than the Ares cabin.
At least with Ares,you can learn where the land mines are.
“Clovis! Wake up!”The kid looked like a baby cow.
He had a blond tuft of hair on a wedge-shaped head, with thick features and a thick neck.
His body was stocky, buthe had spindly little arms like he’d never lifted anything heavier than a pillow.
He yawned hugely, and both Annabeth and Jason yawned too.
“We need your help.
“Give it back.
“Then sleep.
His breath smelled like warm milk.
“Fine.
What?”Annabeth explained about Jason’s problem.
Every once in a while she’d snap her fingers under Clovis’s nose to keep him awake.
He actually stood and stretched, then blinked at Jason.
“Feelings, like …”“Yes?” Clovis said.
At this camp.
I’m in danger.
Close your eyes.
His thoughts became murky, as if he were sinking into adark lake.
He was sitting in a chair by the fire.
Clovis and Annabeth knelt next to him.
“How long—”“Just a few minutes,” Annabeth said.
“But it was tense.
You almost dissolved.
They sink under the surface like dreams, and with a good sleep, I can bring them back.
“Not even Lethe.
“The River Lethe in the Underworld.
It dissolves your memories, wipesyour mind clean permanently.
That’s the branch of a poplar tree from the Underworld, dipped into the Lethe.
It’s the symbol of my father, Hypnos.
Lethe isnot a place you want to go swimming.
“Percy went there once.
He told me it was powerful enough to wipe the mind of a Titan.
“But … that’s not my problem?”“No,” Clovis agreed.
“Your mind wasn’t wiped, and your memories weren’t buried.
They’ve been stolen.
Drops of Lethe water plinked into the tin cups on the mantel.
One of the other Hypnos campers muttered in his sleep—somethingabout a duck.
“How?”“A god,” Clovis said.
“Only a god would have that kind of power.
“It was Juno.
But how did she do it, and why?”Clovis scratched his neck.
“Juno?”“He means Hera,” Annabeth said.
“For some reason, Jason likes the Roman names.
“Does that mean something?”“Hmm,” Clovis said again, and this time Jason realized he was snoring.
“We were talking about pillows, right? No, gods.
I remember.
Greek and Roman.
Sure, could be important.
“Just different names.
“What do you mean, not exactly?”“Well …” Clovis yawned.
“Some gods are only Roman.
Like Janus, or Pompona.
But even the major Greek gods—it’s not just their names thatchanged when they moved to Rome.
Their appearances changed.
Their attributes changed.
They even had slightly different personalities.
“Okay, so maybe people saw them differently through the centuries.
That doesn’t change who they are.
“I mean … Yeah, I’m awake.
So, um, personalities.
The gods change to reflect their host cultures.
You know that,Annabeth.
I mean, these days, Zeus likes tailored suits, reality television, and that Chinese food place on East Twenty-eighth Street, right? It was thesame in Roman times, and the gods were Roman almost as long as they were Greek.
It was a big empire, lasted for centuries.
So of course theirRoman aspects are still a big part of their character.
“But how do you know all this, Clovis?”“Oh, I spend a lot of time dreaming.
I see the gods there all the time—always shifting forms.
Dreams are fluid, you know.
You can be in differentplaces at once, always changing identities.
It’s a lot like being a god, actually.
Like recently, I dreamed I was watching a Michael Jackson concert, andthen I was onstage with Michael Jackson, and we were singing this duet, and I could not remember the words for ‘The Girl Is Mine.
“Back to Rome?”“Right, Rome,” Clovis said.
“So we call the gods by their Greek names because that’s their original form.
But saying their Roman aspects areexactly the same—that’s not true.
In Rome, they became more warlike.
They didn’t mingle with mortals as much.
They were harsher, more powerful—thegods of an empire.
“They stood for discipline, honor, strength—”“Good things, then,” Jason said.
For some reason, he felt the need to speak up for the Roman gods, though wasn’t sure why it mattered to him.
“Imean, discipline is important, right? That’s what made Rome last so long.
“That’s true.
But the Roman gods weren’t very friendly.
For instance, my dad, Hypnos … he didn’t do much exceptsleep in Greek times.
In Roman times, they called him Somnus.
He liked killing people who didn’t stay alert at their jobs.
If they nodded offat the wrongtime, boom—they never woke up.
He killed the helmsman of Aeneas when they were sailing from Troy.
“But I still don’t understand what it has to do with Jason.
“But if Hera took your memory, only she can give it back.
And if I had to meet the queen of the gods, I’d hope she wasmore in a Hera mood than a Juno mood.
Can I go back to sleep now?”Annabeth stared at the branch above the fire, dripping Lethe water into the cups.
She looked so worried, Jason wondered if she was considering adrink to forget her troubles.
Then she stood and tossed Clovis his pillow.
“Thanks, Clovis.
We’ll see you at dinner.
“I feel like … zzzz …” He collapsed with his butt in the air and his face buried inpillow.
“But I’m beginning to think that you are in serious trouble.
The morning had been so perfect, Piper knew something had to go wrong soon—a rabid horde of paparazzi, or maybe a great white shark attack.
No way her luck could hold.
Dad had found this out-of-the-way spot,rented a beachfront villa and the properties on either side, and somehow managed to keep it secret.
If he stayed there too long, Piper knew thephotographers would find him.
They always did.
(Seriously, Piper thought, get a life.
“You’re getting better at hanging ten.
She still spent most of her time wiping out.
It took special talent to run overyourself with a surfboard.
Her dad was the natural surfer—which made no sense since he’d been raised a poor kid in Oklahoma, hundreds of miles fromthe ocean—but he was amazing on the curls.
Piper would’ve given up surfing a long time ago except it let her spend time with him.
There weren’t manyways she could do that.
“Let’s see: turkey pesto, crabcake wasabi—ah, a Piper special.
Peanutbutter and jelly.
She always asked for PB&J. Piper was vegetarian, for one thing.
She had beenever since they’d driven past that slaughterhouse in Chino and the smell had made her insides want to come outside.
But it was more than that.
PB&Jwas simple food, like a regular kid would have for lunch.
Sometimes she pretended her dad had actually made it for her, not a personal chef from Francewho liked to wrap the sandwich in gold leaf paper with a light-up sparkler instead of a toothpick.
She cuther own hair with a pair of plastic Garfield safety scissors, deliberately making it uneven.
She preferred to wear beat-up running shoes, jeans, a T-shirt,and her old Polartec jacket from the time they went snowboarding.
She kept getting herself kicked out.
He kept finding more schools.
She had to pull a bigger stunt each time, becauseit took more and more to get Dad’s attention.
Dad didn’t know yet.
Then he’d surprised her with this trip, and she couldn’t ruin it.
It was the first time they’d had a day together inwhat—three months?“What’s wrong?” He passed her a soda.
That’s a serious face.
Ready for Any Three Questions?”They’d been playing that game for years—her dad’s way of staying connected in the shortest possible amount of time.
They could ask each otherany three questions.
Nothing off-limits, and you had to answer honestly.
The rest of the time, Dad promised to stay out of her business—which was easy,since he was never around.
But she looked forward to it.
It was like surfing—not easy, but away to feel like she actually had a father.
“Mom.
That was always one of her topics.
“What do you want to know, Piper? I’ve already told you—she disappeared.
I don’t know why, or where she went.
I never heard from her again.
Dad was allowed to say he didn’t know.
But she wanted to hear how he’d answer.
He said a long time ago, you could bring the dead back; but then mankind messed up.
Well, it’s a long story.
“It was in the west, too.
And Orpheus—he tried to bring his wife back.
A year before, he’d had his biggest role as an Ancient Greek king.
Piper had helped him research the myths—all those old storiesabout people getting turned to stone and boiled in lakes of lava.
They’d had a fun time reading together, and it made Piper’s life seem not so bad.
For awhile she’d felt closer to her dad, but like everything, it didn’t last.
“Wonder what your grandpa would think if he saw us now, sitting at the end of thewestern land.
He’d probably think we’re ghosts.
She figured that’s why women were so attracted to him.
On the surface, he seemedconfident and rugged, but his eyes held so much sadness.
Women wanted to find out why.
They wanted to comfort him, and they never could.
Dad toldPiper it was a Cherokee thing—they all had that darkness inside them from generations of pain and suffering.
But Piper thought it was more than that.
“They’re fun to tell, but if I really believed in Ghost Country, or animal spirits, or Greek gods … I don’t think I couldsleep at night.
I’d always be looking for somebody to blame.
For Mom—the onlywoman he’d ever loved —abandoning him without even a good-bye note, leaving him with a newborn girl he wasn’t ready to care for.
For his being sosuccessful, and yet still not happy.
“But I do think she might as well be in Ghost Country, Piper.
There’s no getting her back.
If I believed otherwise… I don’t think I could stand that, either.
Piper turned, and her heart sank.
Jane was marching toward them in her business suit, wobbling over the sand inher high heels, her PDA in hand.
The look on her face was partly annoyed, partly triumphant, and Piper knew she’d been in touch with the police.
If there’s any animal spirit or Greek god that can help, make Jane take a header.
I’m not asking for permanentdamage, just knock her out for the rest of the day, please?But Jane kept advancing.
“Something happened yesterday…”But he’d seen Jane, too.
He was already reconstructing his business face.
Jane wouldn’t be here if it wasn’t serious.
A studio head called—a projectfell through—or Piper had messed up again.
“I’d better see what Jane wants.
You know how she is.
Dad trudged across the sand to meet her.
Piper couldn’t hear them talking, but she didn’t need to.
She was good at readingfaces.
Jane gave him the facts about the stolen car, occasionally pointing at Piper like she was a disgusting pet that had whizzed on the carpet.
He gestured for Jane to wait.
Then he walked back to Piper.
She couldn’t stand that look in his eyes—like she’d betrayed his trust.
I can’t do it.
I wanted to tell you about the BMW, but—”“They’ve expelled you,” he said.
“A car, Piper? You’re sixteen next year.
I would buy you any car you want.
How could you—”“You mean Jane would buy me a car?” Piper demanded.
She couldn’t help it.
The anger just welled up and spilled out of her.
“Dad, just listen foronce.
Don’t make me wait for you to ask your stupid three questions.
I want to go to regular school.
I want you to take me to parents’ night, not Jane.
Orhomeschool me! I learned so much when we read about Greece together.
We could do that all the time! We could—”“Don’t make this about me,” her dad said.
“I do the best I can, Piper.
We’ve had this conversation.
You’ve cut off this conversation.
For years.
“Jane’s talked to the police, brokered a deal.
The dealership won’t press charges, but you have to agree to go to a boarding schoolin Nevada.
They specialize in problems … in kids with tough issues.
“A problem.
You let me down.
I don’t know what else to do.
“But do it yourself! Don’t let Jane handle it for you.
You can’t just send me away.
His sandwich sat uneaten on a piece of gold leaf paper.
They’d planned for a whole afternoon in the surf.
Not this time.
Not on something as huge as boarding school.
“She’s got the details.
Piper promised herself she wouldn’t cry.
She headed up thebeach toward Jane, who smiled coldly and held up a plane ticket.
As usual, she’d already arranged everything.
Piper was just another problem of the daythat Jane could now check off her list.
In front of her, a bonfire blazed.
Purplish flames seemed to cast more shadowsthan light, but the heat was so intense, her clothes steamed.
Piper had heard that voice before in her dreams.
She’d tried toconvince herself it wasn’t as scary as she remembered, but it was worse.
It seemed to float above the flames, but Piper knew it must be connected to anenormous body.
The crude features might’ve been chiseled out of rock.
The face hardly seemed alive except for its piercing white eyes, like rawdiamonds, and its horrible frame of dreadlocks, braided with human bones.
It smiled, and Piper shivered.
“You’ll go on the quest.
Do our bidding, and you may walk away alive.
Otherwise—”He gestured to one side of the fire.
Piper’s father was hanging unconscious, tied to a stake.
She wanted to call to her dad, and demand the giant let him go, but her voice wouldn’t work.
“Serve me, and you both live.
You have the word of Enceladus.
Fail me … well, I’ve slept for millennia, youngdemigod.
I am very hungry.
Fail, and I’ll eat well.
The earth trembled.
A crevice opened at Piper’s feet, and she tumbled into darkness.
Her chest hurt, and she could barely breathe.
She reached down andclosed her hand around the hilt of the dagger Annabeth had given her—Katoptris, Helen of Troy’s weapon.
She was lying in a bed with a white curtain on one side, like in a nurse’s office.
That redheaded girl, Rachel Dare, sat next to her.
The caption read:Don’t let sickness get your goat!“Where—” Piper’s voice died when she saw the guy at the door.
But he had hundreds of blue eyes all overhis body—along his arms, down his legs, and all over his face.
Even his feet had eyes, peering up at her from between the straps of his sandals.
He’s just keeping an eye on things … so to speak.
The eye on his chin winked.
“Camp offices.
We brought you here when you collapsed.
“Hera’s voice—”“I’m so sorry about that,” Rachel said.
“Believe me, it was not my idea to get possessed.
Chiron healed you with some nectar—”“Nectar?”“The drink of the gods.
In small amounts, it heals demigods, if it doesn’t—ah—burn you to ashes.
Fun.
“Do you remember your vision?”Piper had a moment of dread, thinking she meant the dream about the giant.
Then she realized Rachel was talking about what happened in Hera’scabin.
“She told me to free her, like she’s trapped.
She mentioned the earth swallowing us, and a fieryone, and something about the solstice.
His eyes all fluttered at once.
“He’s actually very sensitive when it comes to her safety.
We’re trying to keep him from crying, because lasttime that happened …well, it caused quite a flood.
He grabbed a fistful of Kleenex from the bedside table and started dabbing eyes all over his body.
“What’s happened to Hera?”“We’re not sure,” Rachel said.
“Annabeth and Jason were here for you, by the way.
Jason didn’t want to leave you, but Annabeth had an idea—something that might restore his memories.
But if he got his memories back, would that be a good thing? She was stillholding out hope that they really did know each other.
She didn’t want their relationship to be just a trick of the Mist.
If she was going to save her dad, it didn’t matter whether Jason liked her or not.
He would hate her eventually.
Annabeth had said it was a sign of power and status, but not normally used inbattle.
All show and no substance.
A fake, just like Piper.
And its name was Katoptris, looking glass.
She didn’t dare unsheathe it again, because shecouldn’t bear to see her own reflection.
“Jason seems like a good guy.
He had a vision too, a lot like yours.
Whatever’s happening with Hera—Ithink you two are meant to work together.
She’d thought that this quest—whatever it was—would involvenameless people.
Now Rachel was basically telling her: Good news! Not only is your dad being held ransom by a cannibal giant, you also get tobetray the guy you like! How awesome is that?“Hey,” Rachel said.
“No need to cry.
You’ll figure it out.
This wasn’t like her.
She was supposed to be tough—a hardened car thief, the scourge of L.A.private schools.
Here she was, crying like a baby.
“How can you know what I’m facing?”Rachel shrugged.
“I know it’s a hard choice, and your options aren’t great.
Like I said, I get hunches sometimes.
I’m almost sure.
When you know who your godly parent is, things might be clearer.
Not necessarily better.
Her forehead ached like someone had driven a spike between her eyes.
There’s no getting your mother back, her dad had toldher.
But apparently, tonight, her mom might claim her.
For the first time, Piper wasn’t sure she wanted that.
Truthfully? I think Annabeth is hoping that too.
You guys are a lot alike.
“Another hunch? You don’t know anything about me.
“Don’t be giving away my secrets, Piper.
And don’t worry.
Things will work out—just maybe not the way you plan.
Argus grumbled and opened the door.
“Time for the campfire.
Let’s go find out who you are.
The amphitheater steps were carved into the side of a hill, facing a stone-lined fire pit.
Leo was nearby, sitting with a bunch of burly-looking campers under a steel gray banneremblazoned with a hammer.
Standing in front of the fire, half a dozen campers with guitars and strange, old-fashioned harps—lyres?—were jumpingaround, leading a song about pieces of armor, something about how their grandma got dressed for war.
Everybody was singing with them and makinggestures for the pieces of armor and joking around.
It was quite possibly the weirdest thing Piper had ever seen—one of those campfire songs thatwould’ve been completely embarrassing in daylight; but in the dark, with everybody participating, it was kind of corny and fun.
As the energy level gothigher, the flames did too, turning from red to orange to gold.
A guy on a horse trotted up.
At least in the flickering light, Piper thought it was a guy on a horse.
He brandished aspear impaled with toasted marshmallows.
“Very nice! And a special welcome to our new arrivals.
I am Chiron, camp activities director, and I’m happyyou have all arrived here alive and with most of your limbs attached.
In a moment, I promise we’ll get to the s’mores, but first—”“What about capture the flag?” somebody yelled.
Grumbling broke out among some kids in armor, sitting under a red banner with the emblem of aboar’s head.
“I know the Ares cabin is anxious to return to the woods for our regular games.
Cabin Nine, anything to report on that?”He turned to Leo’s group.
Leo winked at Piper and shot her with a finger gun.
The girl next to him stood uncomfortably.
She wore an army jacket a lotlike Leo’s, with her hair covered in a red bandanna.
“We’re working on it.
Chiron stamped his hoof against the fire pit stones—bang, bang, bang—and the campers fell silent.
“In the meantime, we have more pressing matters to discuss.
The fire dimmed even further, but Piper didn’t need the mood flames to sense the crowd’s anxiety.
She took a deep breath and stood.
Her voice caught a little when she said his name.
“He wasn’t at the Grand Canyon like I thought.
But we’re notgiving up.
We’ve got teams everywhere.
Grover, Tyson, Nico, the Hunters of Artemis —everyone’s out looking.
We will find him.
Chiron’s talking aboutsomething different.
A new quest.
The voice had come from a group in back, sitting under a rose-colored banner with a dove emblem.
They’d been chatting amongthemselves and not paying much attention until their leader stood up: Drew.
Apparently Drew didn’t address the crowd very often.
“What do you mean?”“Well, come on.
“Olympus is closed.
Percy’s disappeared.
Hera sends you a vision and youcome back with three new demigods in one day.
I mean, something weird is going on.
The Great Prophecy has started, right?”Piper whispered to Rachel, “What’s she talking about—the Great Prophecy?”Then she realized everyone else was looking at Rachel, too.
“You’re the oracle.
Has it started or not?”Rachel’s eyes looked scary in the firelight.
Piper was afraid she might clench up and start channeling a freaky peacock goddess again, but shestepped forward calmly and addressed the camp.
“The Great Prophecy has begun.
He mouthed, You all right? She nodded and managed a smile, but then looked away.
It was too painful seeing him andnot being with him.
It arrived in August.
It goes like this:“Seven half-bloods shall answer the call.
To storm or fire the world must fall—”Jason shot to his feet.
His eyes looked wild, like he’d just been tasered.
“J-Jason?” she said.
“What’s—”“Ut cum spiritu postrema sacramentum dejuremus,” he chanted.
“Et hostes ornamenta addent ad ianuam necem.
Piper could see from their faces that several of them were trying to translate the lines.
She could tell it wasLatin, but she wasn’t sure why her hopefully future boyfriend was suddenly chanting like a Catholic priest.
“—An oath to keep with a final breath/And foes bear arms to the Doors of Death.
How didyou—”“I know those lines.
“I don’t know how, but I know that prophecy.
“Handsome and smart.
God, what a bunch of losers, Piper thought.
But it didn’t do much to break the tension.
Thecampfire was burning a chaotic, nervous shade of green.
Piper felt a pang of jealousy.
Itshould have been her next to him, comforting him.
She glanced back at Chiron for guidance, but the centaur stood grim and silent, as if he were watching aplay he couldn’t interrupt—a tragedy that ended with a lot of people dead onstage.
“So, yeah, that’s the Great Prophecy.
We hoped it might not happen for years, but I fear it’sstarting now.
I can’t give you proof.
It’s just a feeling.
And like Drew said, some weird stuff is happening.
The seven demigods, whoever they are, have notbeen gathered yet.
I get the feeling some are here tonight.
Some are not here.
We don’t know what challenge the demigods will face, but since thefirst Great Prophecy predicted the Titan War, we can guess the second Great Prophecy will predict something at least that bad.
The campfire immediately turned dark purple, the same color as Piper’s dream.
A major problem has arisen, and we need a quest to solve it.
Hera, the queen ofthe gods, has been taken.
Then fifty demigods started talking at once.
They apparently served some great mistress who would destroy all demigods.
Piper tried to keep a calm expression, even when she noticed Drew in the back row,pantomiming a faint, and her friends giggling.
Finally Rachel told them about Jason’s vision in the living room of the Big House.
The message Hera haddelivered there was so similar that Piper got a chill.
The only difference: Hera had warned Piper not to betray her: Bow to his will, and their king shallrise, dooming us all.
Hera knew about the giant’s threat.
But if that was true, why hadn’t she warned Jason, and exposed Piper as an enemy agent?“Jason,” Rachel said.
“Um … do you remember your last name?”He looked self-conscious, but he shook his head.
“It’s clear Hera herself has issued you a quest.
Everyone’s eyes were on him; there was so much pressure, Piper thought shewould’ve buckled in his position.
Yet he looked brave and determined.
He set his jaw and nodded.
“I agree.
“Some sort of king from rising.
For reasons we don’t yet understand, it must happenby the winter solstice, only four days from now.
“If the gods don’t already know Hera’s gone, they will definitely notice her absence by then.
That’s what they usually do.
The gods gather that day, as mortals always have, because there isstrength in numbers.
The solstice is a day when evil magic is strong.
Ancient magic, older than the gods.
It is a day when things … stir.
“Thank you, Captain Sunshine.
Whatever’s going on, I agree with Rachel.
Jason has been chosen tolead this quest, so—”“Why hasn’t he been claimed?” somebody yelled from the Ares cabin.
“If he’s so important—”“He has been claimed,” Chiron announced.
“Long ago.
Jason, give them a demonstration.
He stepped forward nervously, but Piper couldn’t help thinking how amazing he looked with his blond hairglowing in the firelight, his regal features like a Roman statue’s.
He glanced at Piper, and she nodded encouragingly.
She mimicked flipping a coin.
His coin flashed in the air, and when he caught it in his hand, he was holding a lance—a rod of gold about seven feetlong, with a spear tip at one end.
Rachel and Annabeth stepped back to avoid the point, which looked sharp as an ice pick.
“I thought you had a sword.
“Same coin, long-range weapon form.
“Back away.
Jason raised his javelin, and thunder broke open the sky.
Every hair on Piper’s arms stood straight up.
Cinders rained down everywhere.
A burning log had impaled itself a few inches from the sleeping kid Clovis, who hadn’teven stirred.
“Um … sorry.
He grimaced as if his worst fears had been confirmed.
“A little overkill, perhaps, but you’vemade your point.
And I believe we know who your father is.
“I mean Zeus.
Lord of the Sky.
It made perfect sense.
The most powerful god, the father of all the greatest heroes in the ancient myths—no one elsecould possibly be Jason’s dad.
Everything broke into chaos, with dozens of people asking questions until Annabeth raised herarms.
“How can he be the son of Zeus? The Big Three … their pact not to have mortal kids … how could we not have known about himsooner?”Chiron didn’t answer, but Piper got the feeling he knew.
And the truth was not good.
He has a quest to fulfill, which means he will need his own prophecy.
Two campers rushed forward and caught her.
A third ran to the side of the amphitheater and grabbed a bronzethree-legged stool, like they’d been trained for this duty.
They eased Rachel onto the stool in front of the ruined hearth.
Without the fire, the night wasdark, but green mist started swirling around Rachel’s feet.
When she opened her eyes, they were glowing.
Emerald smoke issued from her mouth.
Thevoice that came out was raspy and ancient—the sound a snake would make if it could talk:“Child of lightning, beware the earth, The giants’ revenge the seven shall birth, The forge and dove shall break the cage, And death unleashthrough Hera’s rage.
They carried her away from the hearth and laid her in the corner to rest.
Then she realized she’d spoken into the silence, and everyone was looking at her.
“I mean… does she spew greensmoke a lot?”“Gods, you’re dense!” Drew sneered.
“She just issued a prophecy—Jason’s prophecy to save Hera! Why don’t you just—”“Drew,” Annabeth snapped.
“Piper asked a fair question.
Something about that prophecy definitely isn’t normal.
If breaking Hera’s cage unleashesher rage and causes a bunch of death … why would we free her? It might be a trap, or—or maybe Hera will turn on her rescuers.
She’s never been kindto heroes.
“I don’t have much choice.
Hera took my memory.
I need it back.
Besides, we can’t just not help the queen of the heavens if she’s introuble.
“Maybe.
But you should listen to Annabeth.
Hera can be vengeful.
“Anyway, we’ve also got to think —why beware the earth? And what’s the giants’ revenge? What are we dealing with herethat’s powerful enough to kidnap the queen of the heavens?”No one answered, but Piper noticed Annabeth and Chiron having a silent exchange.
Piper thought it went something like:Annabeth: The giants’ revenge … no, it can’t be.
Don’t scare them.
If you told them everything, they would be too terrified to proceed.
But she was absolutely positive sheunderstood them, and it scared the jujubes out of her.
“It’s Jason’s quest,” she announced, “so it’s Jason’s choice.
Obviously, he’s the child of lightning.
According totradition, he may choose any two companions.
You’ve got the most experience.
“First off, I’m not helping Hera.
Every time I’ve tried, she’s deceived me, or it’s come back to bite me later.
Forget it.
Noway.
Secondly, I’m leaving first thing in the morning to find Percy.
“You know that’s true, don’t you? This whole business, your boyfriend’sdisappearance—it’s all connected.
“If you’re so smart, how?”Piper tried to form an answer, but she couldn’t.
“You may be right, Piper.
If this is connected, I’ll find out from the other end—by searching for Percy.
As I said, I’m not about torush off to rescue Hera, even if her disappearance sets the rest of the Olympians fighting again.
But there’s another reason I can’t go.
The prophecy saysotherwise.
“The forge and dove shall break the cage.
The forge is the symbol of Vul—Hephaestus.
“If you have to beware the earth,” shesaid, “you should avoid traveling overland.
You’ll need air transport.
But then she thought better of it.
That was for Jason to tell them, and he wasn’t volunteering theinformation.
Maybe he figured he’d freaked them out enough for one night.
But maybe Hephaestus cabin can help figureout something else to help.
With Jake incapacitated, I’m senior camper.
I can volunteer for the quest.
He’d been so quiet, Piper had almost forgotten he was there, which was totally not like Leo.
Several tried to pull him back to his seat, but Leo resisted.
I know it is.
I’ve got an idea for the transportation problem.
Let me try.
I can fix this!”Jason studied him for a moment.
Piper was sure he was going to tell Leo no.
Then he smiled.
“We started this together, Leo.
Seems only right youcome along.
You find us a ride, you’re in.
“Hardship, monsters, terrible suffering.
Possibly none of you will come back alive.
Then he remembered everyone was watching.
“I mean … Oh, cool! Suffering? I love suffering! Let’s dothis.
“Then, Jason, you only need to choose the third quest member.
The dove—”“Oh, absolutely!” Drew was on her feet and flashing Jason a smile.
“The dove is Aphrodite.
Everybody knows that.
I am totally yours.
She stepped forward.
“No.
“Oh, please, Dumpster girl.
Back off.
I have to do this.
I have to do this.
“You were just at the right place at the right time.
“Look, fighting is all fine, I suppose.
“Well, I suppose someone has to get their hands dirty.
But you need charm on your side.
Ican be very persuasive.
I could help a lot.
Piper could see Drew winning them over.
Even Chiron was scratching hisbeard, like Drew’s participation suddenly made sense to him.
“Given the wording of the prophecy—”“No!” Piper’s own voice sounded strange in her ears—more insistent, richer in tone.
“I’m supposed to go.
Everyone started nodding, muttering that hmm, Piper’s point of view made sense too.
Drew looked around,incredulous.
Even some of her own campers were nodding.
“What can Piper do?”Piper tried to respond, but her confidence started to wane.
What could she offer? She wasn’t a fighter, or a planner, or a fixer.
She had no skillsexcept getting into trouble and occasionally convincing people to do stupid things.
She needed to go on this quest for reasons that went way beyond Jason—and if she did go, she’d end up betraying everyonethere.
She heard that voice from the dream: Do our bidding, and you may walk away alive.
How could she make a choice like that—between helpingher father and helping Jason?“Well,” Drew said smugly, “I guess that settles it.
Everyone stared at Piper like she’d just exploded.
She wondered what she’d done wrong.
Then she realizedthere was a reddish glow around her.
Then she looked down and yelped.
She didn’t own a dress.
But now she was adorned in a beautiful whitesleeveless gown that went down to her ankles, with a V-neck so low it was totally embarrassing.
Delicate gold armbands circled her biceps.
An intricatenecklace of amber, coral, and gold flowers glittered on her chest, and her hair …“Oh, god,” she said.
“What’s happened?”A stunned Annabeth pointed at Piper’s dagger, which was now oiled and gleaming, hanging at her side on a golden cord.
Piper didn’t want to drawit.
She was afraid of what she would see.
But her curiosity won out.
She unsheathed Katoptris and stared at her reflection in the polished metal blade.
She even wore makeup,better than Piper would ever know how to do herself—subtle touches that made her lips cherry red and brought out all the different colors in her eyes.
“Piper, you … you’re a knockout.
But now everyone was staring at her like she was a freak.
Drew’sface was full of horror and revulsion.
“No!” she cried.
“Not possible!”“This isn’t me,” Piper protested.
“I—don’t understand.
“Daughter of Aphrodite, lady of the doves, goddess of love.
Sure, it was amazing and all—She’s got makeup! It’s a miracle! —but Leo had problems to deal with.
Tía Callida was Hera.
His evil babysitter was the queen of the gods.
Stuff like that could really deep-fry your brain.
But he couldn’thelp it.
Tía Callida was looking after him while his mother was at the machine shop.
Shewasn’t really his aunt, of course—just one of the old women in the community, a generic tía who helped watch the kids.
She smelled like a honey-bakedham, and always wore a widow’s dress with a black shawl.
“Let’s see if you are my brave little hero, eh?”Leo was sleepy.
She nestled him into his blankets in a warm mound of red and yellow—pillows? The bed was like a cubbyhole in the wall, made ofblackened bricks, with a metal slot over his head and a square hole far above, where he could see the stars.
He remembered resting comfortably,grabbing at sparks like fireflies.
He dozed, and dreamed of a boat made of fire, sailing through the cinders.
He imagined himself on board, navigatingthe sky.
Somewhere nearby, Tía Callida sat in her rocking chair—creak, creak, creak—and sang a lullaby.
Even at two, Leo knew the difference betweenEnglish and Spanish, and he remembered being puzzled because Tía Callida was singing in a language that was neither.
She screamed and raced over to snatch him up, yelling at Tía Callida, “How could you?” But the oldlady had disappeared.
Only years later had he realized he’d been sleepingin a blazing fireplace.
She appeared again several times over the next few years.
“You must learn your blades early,” she insisted, “if you are to be my hero someday.
She gave him a stick and encouraged him to poke the animal.
“Whereis your bravery, little hero? Show me the Fates were right to choose you.
He couldn’t bring himself to poke the snake.
It didn’t seem fair.
Apparently the snake felt the same way about biting a little kid.
Leocould’ve sworn it looked at Tía Callida like, Are you nuts, lady? Then it disappeared into the tall grass.
She brought him a pack of crayons and a pad of paper.
They sat together at the picnic table in back ofthe apartment complex, under an old pecan tree.
While Tía Callida sang her strange songs, Leo drew a picture of the boat he’d seen in the flames, withcolorful sails and rows of oars, a curved stern, and an awesome masthead.
When he was almost done, about to sign his name the way he’d learned inkindergarten, a wind snatched the picture away.
It flew into the sky and disappeared.
He’d spent so much time on that picture—but Tía Callida just clucked with disappointment.
Someday, you’ll have your quest.
You’ll find your destiny, and your hard journey will finally make sense.
But first you mustface many sorrows.
I regret that, but heroes cannot be shaped any other way.
Now, make me a fire, eh? Warm these old bones.
Tía Callida was gone, but Leo sat in the middle of a smoking fire.
The pad ofpaper was reduced to ashes.
Crayons had melted into a bubbling puddle of multicolored goo, and Leo’s hands were ablaze, slowly burning through thepicnic table.
For years afterward, people in the apartment complex would wonder how someone had seared the impressions of a five-year-old’s handsan inch deep into solid wood.
That made her, what—his godly grandmother? His family was evenmore messed up than he realized.
Leo remembered after that last visit, his mom took him inside and had a long talk with him, but heonly understood some of it.
The lines around her eyes were deeply etched.
Her hands were callused.
She was the first person from their family to graduate from college.
Shehad a degree in mechanical engineering and could design anything, fix anything, build anything.
No company would take her seriously, so she ended up in the machine shop, trying to make enough money to support the twoof them.
She always smelled of machine oil, and when she talked with Leo, she switched from Spanish to English constantly—using them likecomplementary tools.
It took Leo years to realize that not everyone spoke that way.
She’d even taught him Morse code as a kind of game, so they couldtap messages to each other when they were in different rooms: I love you.
You okay? Simple things like that.
“I don’t care about destiny and the Fates.
You’re too young for that.
You’re still my baby.
“Leo, listen to me.
Fire is a tool, like anything else, but it’s moredangerous than most.
You don’t know your limits.
Please, promise me—no more fire until you meet your father.
Someday, mijo, you will meet him.
He’llexplain everything.
Someday he would meet his dad.
His mom wouldn’t answer any questions about him.
Leo had nevermet him, never even seen pictures, but she talked like he’d just gone to the store for some milk and he’d be back any minute.
Leo tried to believe her.
Leo almost forgot about Tía Callida.
He still dreamed of the flying boat, but the other strange eventsseemed like a dream too.
By then, he was spending every free hour at the shop with his mom.
He knew how to use the machines.
He couldmeasure and do math better than most adults.
He’d learned to think three-dimensionally, solving mechanical problems in his head the way his mom did.
If she could sell the prototype, it might change theirlives.
She’d finally get a break.
He loved it when he could make her laugh.
She’dsmile and say, “Your father would be proud of you, mijo.
You’ll meet him soon, I’m sure.
It was kind of creepy at night, because they were the only ones there.
Every sound echoedthrough the dark warehouse, but Leo didn’t mind as long as he was with his mom.
If he did wander the shop, they could always keep in touch with Morsecode taps.
Whenever they were ready to leave, they had to walk through the entire shop, through the break room, and out to the parking lot, locking thedoors behind them.
“I know I had them.
Wait here, mijo.
I’ll only be a minute.
Then the exterior door locked itself.
Something heavy crashed inside the warehouse.
He ran to the door, but no matter how hard he pulled or kicked, itwouldn’t open.
“Mom!” Frantically, he tapped a message on the wall: You okay?“She can’t hear you,” a voice said.
At first he thought it was Tía Callida.
She was wrapped in black robes, with a veil coveringher face.
“I am not your guardian.
Merely a family resemblance.
How nice.
But you see, I have children too … and I understand you will fight them someday.
When they try to wake me,you will prevent them.
I cannot allow that.
I don’t want to fight anybody.
Behind the veil, her eyes were closed.
But even stranger: her clothes were not made ofcloth.
They were made of earth—dry black dirt, churning and shifting around her.
Her pale, sleeping face was barely visible behind a curtain of dust, andhe had the horrible sense that she’d had just risen from the grave.
If the woman was asleep, Leo wanted her to stay that way.
He knew that fully awake,she would be even more terrible.
“The Fates will not allow it.
But they not do protect your mother, and they cannot stop me frombreaking your spirit.
Remember this night, little hero, when they ask you to oppose me.
She moved more like an avalanche than a person, a dark wall ofearth shifting toward him.
He was the only thing between her and his mother.
Leo screamed with desperation.
His vision turned red.
Flames washedover the earthen woman, the walls, the locked doors.
And Leo lost consciousness.
She told him the warehouse had burned down.
His mother hadn’t made it out.
The paramedic said she was sorry,but Leo felt hollow.
He’d lost control, just like his mother had warned.
Her death was his fault.
The fire had started in the break room, they said, right where Leo was standing.
He’dsurvived by some miracle, but what kind of child locked the doors of his mother’s workplace, knowing she was inside, and started a fire?Later, his neighbors at the apartment complex told the police what a strange boy he was.
They talked about the burned handprints on the picnictable.
They’d always known something was wrong with Esperanza Valdez’s son.
His Aunt Rosa called him a diablo and shouted at the social workers to take him away.
So Leo went to his firstfoster home.
A few days later, he ran away.
Some foster homes lasted longer than others.
He would joke around, make a few friends, pretend that nothingbothered him, but he always ended up running sooner or later.
It was the only thing that made the pain better—feeling like he was moving, getting fartherand farther away from the ashes of that machine shop.
He hadn’t thought about Tía Callida, or the sleeping woman wrapped in earthen robes,for a long time.
Our enemy wakes.
It’s time to stop running.
Hera had been watching him his entire life.
Somehow, she’d known that one day she would need him.
Leo wasn’t sure.
But he knew he was meant to go on this quest.
Jason’s prophecy warned themto beware the earth, and Leo knew it had something to do with that sleeping woman in the shop, wrapped in robes of shifting dirt.
He might meet his father, or even get to avenge his mother’s death.
He’d promised Jason a flying ride.
There wasn’t time to build something that complicated.
He needed a quicker solution.
He needed a dragon.
Owls hooted, and something far away hissed like a chorus of snakes.
Leo had nothing—no sword, noflashlight, no help.
He could turn around now and tell everyone he’d been joking.
Psych! Nyssa could go on the questinstead.
He could stay at camp and learn to be part of the Hephaestus cabin, but he wondered how long it would be before he looked like his bunkmates—sad, dejected, convinced of his own bad luck.
Remember this night, little hero, when they ask you to oppose me.
And whoever you are, I’m gonna face-plant you hard, Leo-style.
Leo had been raised in a north Houston apartment complex.
The wildest things he’d ever seen werethat rattlesnake in the cow pasture and his Aunt Rosa in her nightgown, until he was sent to Wilderness School.
No trees with gnarled roots to trip over.
No streams to fall into.
No branches casting dark, creepyshadows and owls looking down at him with their big reflective eyes.
This was the Twilight Zone.
Then he summoned fire.
Flames danced along his fingertips,casting enough light to see.
He hadn’t tried to keep a sustained burn going since he was five, at that picnic table.
Since his mom’s death, he’d been tooafraid to try anything.
Even this tiny fire made him feel guilty.
Something that big couldn’t exactly sneakaround, right? But he saw nada.
Once he glimpsed a large, furry shape like a wolf or a bear, but it stayed away from his fire, which was fine by Leo.
In the center of the depression, a metal vat the size of a hot tub had been filled with bubbly dark liquid—Tabasco sauce and motor oil.
On a pedestal suspended over the vat, an electric fan rotated in a circle, spreading the fumes across the forest.
Couldmetal dragons smell?The vat seemed to be unguarded.
But Leo looked closely, and in the dim light of the stars and his handheld fire, he could see the glint of metalbeneath the dirt and leaves—a bronze net lining the entire crater.
Or maybe see wasn’t the right word—he could sense it there, as if the mechanism wasemitting heat, revealing itself to him.
Six large strips of bronze stretched out from the vat like the spokes of a wheel.
They would be pressure sensitive,Leo guessed.
As soon as the dragon stepped on one, the net would spring closed, and voilà—one gift-wrapped monster.
He put his foot on the nearest trigger strip.
As he expected, nothing happened.
They had to have set the net for something reallyheavy.
Otherwise they could catch an animal, human, smaller monster, whatever.
He doubted there was anything else as heavy as a metal dragon inthese woods.
At least, he hoped there wasn’t.
The fumes were almost overpowering, and his eyes started watering.
He remembered atime when Tía Callida (Hera, whatever) had made him chop jalapeños in the kitchen and he’d gotten the juice in his eyes.
Serious pain.
But of courseshe’d been like, “Endure it, little hero.
The Aztecs of your mother’s homeland used to punish bad children by holding them over a fire filled with chilipeppers.
They raised many heroes that way.
Leo was so glad he was on a quest to rescue her.
Leo looked for a trigger—something that would disable the net.
Nyssa had said there were several traps like this in the woods, and they were planning more.
What if the dragon hadalready stepped into another one? How could Leo possibly find them all?He continued to search, but he didn’t see any release mechanism.
No large button labeled off.
It occurred to him that there might not be one.
Hestarted to despair—and then he heard the sound.
It gave him the jitters, but he didn’t look around for thesource.
He just kept examining the trap, thinking, Must be a long way off.
It’s pounding its way through the woods.
I gotta hurry.
He turned slowly.
At the edge of the pit, fifty feet away, two glowing red eyes were staring at him.
The creature gleamed in themoonlight, and Leo couldn’t believe something that huge had sneaked up on him so fast.
Too late, he realized its gaze was fixed on the fire in his hand,and he extinguished the flames.
It was about sixty feet long, snout to tail, its body made of interlocking bronze plates.
Its claws were the size ofbutcher knives, and its mouth was lined with hundreds of dagger-sharp metal teeth.
Steam came out of its nostrils.
It snarled like a chain saw cuttingthrough a tree.
It could’ve bitten Leo in half, easy, or stomped him flat.
It was the most beautiful thing he’d ever seen, except for one problem thatcompletely ruined Leo’s plan.
It tilted its head as if to say, Why aren’t you running away in terror?“Hey, no offense,” Leo said.
“You’re amazing! Good god, who made you? Are you hydraulic or nuclear-powered or what? But if it was me, I would’veput wings on you.
What kind of dragon doesn’t have wings? I guess maybe you’re too heavy to fly? I should’ve thought of that.
It was supposed to trample Leo.
This conversation thing wasn’t part of the plan.
It took a step forward, andLeo shouted, “No!”The dragon snarled again.
“They’re trying to catch you.
A column of white-hot flames billowed over Leo, more than he’d ever tried to endure before.
He felt as ifhe were being hosed down with a powerful, very hot fire hose.
It stung a little, but he stood his ground.
When the flames died, he was perfectly fine.
Evenhis clothes were okay, which Leo didn’t understand, but for which he was grateful.
He liked his army jacket, and having his pants seared off would’vebeen pretty embarrassing.
Its face didn’t actually change, being made of metal and all, but Leo thought he could read its expression: Why no crispycritter? A spark flew out of its neck like it was about to short-circuit.
He’d never had a dog before, but he talked to the dragon the way he thought you’d talkto a dog.
“Stay, boy.
Don’t come any closer.
I don’t want you to get caught.
See, they think you’re broken and have to be scrapped.
But I don’t believethat.
I can fix you if you’ll let me—”The dragon creaked, roared, and charged.
The trap sprang.
The floor of the crater erupted with a sound like a thousand trash can lids bangingtogether.
Dirt and leaves flew, metal net flashing.
Leo was knocked off his feet, turned upside down, and doused in Tabasco sauce and oil.
He foundhimself sandwiched between the vat and the dragon as it thrashed, trying to free itself from the net that had wrapped around them both.
Oil and sauce burned all over them.
It didn’t hurt Leo, but it lefta nasty taste in his mouth.
Leo realized he would get crushed if he didn’t move.
It wasn’t easy, but he managed to wriggle out from between thedragon and the vat.
He squirmed his way through the net.
Fortunately the holes were plenty big enough for a skinny kid.
It tried to snap at him, but its teeth were tangled in the mesh.
It blew fire again, but seemed to be running out of energy.
They sputtered before they even reached Leo’s face.
Then they’ll come and break out the acid and the metal cutters.
Is that whatyou want?”The dragon’s jaw made a creaking sound, like it was trying to talk.
“You’ll have to trust me.
It was right behind the dragon’s head, which made sense.
He’d elected to keep the dragon in the net,because it was easier to work with the dragon constrained, but the dragon didn’t like it.
He was distracted by a sound in the woods, but when he looked up it was just a tree spirit—adryad, Leo thought they were called—putting out the flames in her branches.
Fortunately, the dragon hadn’t started an all-out forest fire, but still the dryadwasn’t too pleased.
The girl’s dress was smoking.
She smothered the flames with a silky blanket, and when she saw Leo looking at her, she made agesture that was probably very rude in Dryad.
Then she disappeared in a green poof of mist.
It was ingenious, definitely, and it made sense to him.
This was the motor control relay.
This processedsensory input from the eyes.
This disk …“Ha,” he said.
“Well, no wonder.
Probably regulates your higher reasoning circuits, right? Rusty brain, man.
No wonder you’re a little …confused.
“I wish I had a replacement disk, but …this is a complicated piece of circuitry.
I’m gonna have totake it out and clean it.
Only be a minute.
The glow died in its eyes.
Leo slid off its back andbegan polishing the disk.
He mopped up some oil and Tabasco sauce with his sleeve, which helped cut through the grime, but the more he cleaned, themore concerned he got.
Some of the circuits were beyond repair.
He could make it better, but not perfect.
For that, he’d need a completely new disk, andhe had no idea how to build one.
He wasn’t sure how long the dragon’s control disk could be off without damaging it—maybe forever—but he didn’t want totake chances.
Once he’d done the best he could, he climbed back up to the dragon’s head and started cleaning the wiring and gearboxes, gettinghimself filthy in the process.
By the time he was through, his hands were black with grease andhis clothes looked like he’d just lost a mud-wrestling contest, but the mechanisms looked a lot better.
He slipped in the disk, connected the last wire, andsparks flew.
The dragon shuddered.
Its eyes began to glow.
It opened its mouth and all its teeth rotated.
Hold on, I’ll free you.
Itroared triumphantly and shot fire at the sky.
“Could you not show off?”Creak? the dragon asked.
“I’m calling you Festus.
At least Leo hoped it was a grin.
“But we still have a problem, because you don’t have wings.
Then he lowered his back in an unmistakable gesture.
He wanted Leo to climb on.
He climbed onto the dragon’s back, and Festus bounded off into the woods.
It seemed impossible the woods could be so deep and wild, but the dragon traveled until the trees werelike skyscrapers and the canopy of leaves completely blotted out the stars.
Even the fire in Leo’s hand couldn’t have lit the way, but the dragon’s glowingred eyes acted like headlights.
He walked up to the cliff—nothing but solid rock.
The dragon kept pointing.
Leo put his hand on the cliff.
Suddenly his fingers smoldered.
Lines of firespread from his fingertips like ignited gunpowder, sizzling across the limestone.
The burning lines raced across the cliff face until they had outlined aglowing red door five times as tall as Leo.
He backed up and the door swung open, disturbingly silently for such a big slab of rock.
“That’s some first-rate engineering.
He had a moment of panic, remembering that night in the machine shop long ago, when he’dbeen locked in.
What if he got stuck in here? But then lights flickered on—a combination of electric fluorescents and wall-mounted torches.
When Leosaw the cavern, he forgot about leaving.
“What is this place?”The dragon stomped to the center of the room, leaving tracks in the thick dust, and curled up on a large circular platform.
Equipment was everywhere—hydraulic lifts, welding torches, hazard suits, air-spades,forklifts, plus something that looked suspiciously like a nuclear reaction chamber.
Bulletin boards were covered with tattered, faded blueprints.
Andweapons, armor, shields—war supplies all over the place, a lot of them only partially finished.
The letters were Greek, but Leosomehow knew what they said: bunker 9.
It had probably been built on that pad.
Clearly, this place had been abandoned for decades.
Cobwebs and dust coveredeverything.
The floor revealed no footprints except for his, and the huge paw prints of the dragon.
He was the first one in this bunker since … since a longtime ago.
Bunker 9 had been abandoned with a lot of projects half finished on the tables.
Locked up and forgotten, but why?Leo looked at a map on the wall—a battle map of camp, but the paper was as cracked and yellow as onionskin.
A date at the bottom read, 1864.
He ran to the worktable and stared up at awhite-line drawing almost faded beyond recognition: a Greek ship from several different angles.
Faintly scrawled words underneath it read: prophecy?unclear.
flight?It was the ship he’d seen in his dreams—the flying ship.
Someone had tried to build it here, or at least sketched out the idea.
Then it was left,forgotten … a prophecy yet to come.
And weirdest of all, the ship’s masthead was exactly like the one Leo had drawn when he was five—the head of adragon.
“Looks like you, Festus,” he murmured.
“That’s creepy.
He touched the blueprint,hoping he could take it down to study, but the paper crackled at his touch, so he left it alone.
He looked around for other clues.
No boats.
No pieces thatlooked like parts of this project, but there were so many doors and storerooms to explore.
It was true.
Leo figured it would be morning in a fewhours, and he’d gotten completely sidetracked.
He’d saved the dragon, but it wasn’t going to help him on the quest.
He needed something that would fly.
Then the dragon switched on his glowingred eye beams and turned them toward the ceiling.
Leo looked up to where the spotlights were pointing, and yelped when he recognized the shapeshanging above them in the darkness.
“We’ve got work to do.
In front of him rose the ruins of a stone mansion.
Low gray clouds blended with the groundfog, and cold rain hung in the air.
A pack of large gray beasts milled around him, brushing against his legs, snarling and baring their teeth.
They gentlynudged him toward the ruins.
Stone spires of chimneys, no longer attached to anything, rose up like totem poles.
The housemust’ve been enormous once, multi-storied with massive log walls and a soaring gabled roof, but now nothing remained but its stone skeleton.
Jasonpassed under a crumbling doorway and found himself in a kind of courtyard.
Jason couldn’t tell how deep it was, because the bottom was filled with mist.
A dirtpath led all the way around, and the house’s uneven walls rose on either side.
Wolves paced under the archways of rough red volcanic stone.
Her eyes glowed silver in the fog, and her coat was the same color asthe rocks—warm chocolaty red.
She didn’t exactly speak, but Jason could understand her.
The movements of her ears and whiskers, the flash of her eyes,the way she curled her lips—all of these were part of her language.
You began your journey here as a pup.
Now you must find your way back.
A new quest, a new start.
But as soon as he spoke, he knew there was no point complaining to the she-wolf.
They never expected fairness.
The wolf said: Conquer or die.
This is always our way.
But he knew this wolf.
Her namewas simply Lupa, the Mother Wolf, the greatest of her kind.
Long ago she’d found him in this place, protected him, nurtured him, chosen him, but if Jasonshowed weakness, she would tear him to shreds.
Rather than being her pup, he would become her dinner.
In the wolf pack, weakness was not an option.
At opposite ends of the pool, two dark spires had erupted from the cement floor like the drill bits ofsome massive tunneling machines boring through the surface.
Jason couldn’t tell if the spires were made of rock or petrified vines, but they were formedof thick tendrils that came together in a point at the top.
Each spire was about five feet tall, but they weren’t identical.
The one closest to Jason wasdarker and seemed like a solid mass, its tendrils fused together.
As he watched, it pushed a little farther out of the earth and expanded a little wider.
Inside, Jason could vaguely see a misty figurestruggling, shifting within its confines.
The other wolves circled the pool, their fur standing up on their backs as they snarled at the spires.
Our sacred place, where demigods are claimed—the place of death or life.
The burned house.
The house of the wolf.
It is an abomination.
You must stop her.
“You mean, Hera?”The she-wolf gnashed her teeth impatiently.
Use your senses, pup.
I care nothing for Juno, but if she falls, our enemy wakes.
And that will be theend for all of us.
You know this place.
You can find it again.
Cleanse our house.
Stop this before it is too late.
Jason sensed that if it ever opened, it would release something he did notwant to meet.
“At least tell me that.
The she-wolf curled her lip, as if she had just made a clever joke.
Do not fail, son of Jupiter.
It was always thundering in Cabin One.
The cloud tiles shifted across the ceiling, changingfrom white to black.
Thunder rumbled through the room, and gold tiles flashed like veins of lightning.
As far as Jason couldtell, it didn’t even have a bathroom.
The walls were carved with alcoves, each holding a bronze brazier or a golden eagle statue on a marble pedestal.
Inthe center of the room, a twenty-foot-tall, full-color statue of Zeus in classic Greek robes stood with a shield at his side and a lightning bolt raised, readyto smite somebody.
Black hair? Nope.
Grumbly expression? Well, maybe.
In his robes and sandals, Zeus looked like a really buff, really angry hippie.
A big honor, the other campers had told him.
Sure, if you liked sleeping in a cold temple by yourself with Hippie Zeus frowningdown at you all night.
His whole body was stifffrom bad sleep and summoning lightning.
That little trick last night hadn’t been as easyas he had let on.
It had almost made him pass out.
He definitely needed a change of clothes,but looking down at his tattered purple shirt, he was reluctant to change.
It felt wrong somehow, putting on the camp shirt.
He still couldn’t believe hebelonged here, despite everything they’d told him.
He knew he’d beenthere before.
The wolf was real.
But his head ached when he tried to remember.
The marks on his forearm seemed to burn.
Whatever was growing inside that rock spire, Jason had to stop it.
“You’re welcome to help.
His face looked watery and strange in the metal, like he was dissolving in a pool ofgold.
Definitely he didn’t look as good as Piper had last night after she’d suddenly been transformed.
He’d acted like an idiot, announcing in front of everyone that she was a knockout.
Not like there’d beenanything wrong with her before.
Sure, she looked great after Aphrodite zapped her, but she also didn’t look like herself, not comfortable with the attention.
Maybe that was crazy, considering she’d just been claimed by a goddess and turned into the most gorgeous girl at camp.
New dress, new makeup, glowing pink aura, and boom: suddenly people liked her.
Jason felt like heunderstood that.
He was pretty sure he’d been dealing with thatfor a long time—people looking at him in awe just because he was the son of Zeus, treating him special, but it didn’t have anything to do with him.
“Mugged by my own mom.
“We’ll get you a new jacket,” he promised.
He wanted to wrap his arms around her, but he restrained himself.
He didn’t want her to think he was as shallow as everyoneelse—trying to make a move on her because she’d turned all beautiful.
Jason had tried to act brave at the campfire, but it was just that—an act.
The idea of going upagainst an evil force powerful enough to kidnap Hera scared him witless, especially since he didn’t even know his own past.
He’d need help, and it feltright: Piper should be with him.
But things were already complicated without figuring out how much he liked her, and why.
He’d already messed with herhead enough.
Then he spotted something he hadn’t noticed the night before.
A brazier hadbeen moved out of one of the alcoves to create a sleeping niche, with a bedroll, a backpack, even some pictures taped to the wall.
Whoever had slept there, it had been a long time ago.
The bedroll smelled musty.
The backpack was covered with a thin film ofdust.
Some of the photos once taped to the wall had lost their stickiness and fallen to the floor.
She stood next to a sandy-haired guy about fourteen or fifteen, with a mischievous smile and raggedleather armor over a T-shirt.
He was pointing to an alley behind them, like he was telling the photographer, Let’s go meet things in a dark alley and killthem! A second photo showed Annabeth and the same guy sitting at a campfire, laughing hysterically.
It was a strip of pictures like you’d take in a do-it-yourself photo booth: Annabeth and thesandy-haired guy, but with another girl between them.
She was maybe fifteen, with black hair—choppy like Piper’s—a black leather jacket, and silverjewelry, so she looked kind of goth; but she was caught mid-laugh, and it was clear she was with her two best friends.
Her expression was sad, like the picture bought back hard memories.
“She’s the other child of Zeus wholived here—but not for long.
Sorry, I should’ve knocked.
“Not like I think of this place as home.
“You got a good team already.
I’m off to look for Percy.
He would’ve appreciated having somebody on the trip who knew what they were doing, so he wouldn’t feel like hewas leading Piper and Leo off a cliff.
“Something tells me this isn’t your first quest.
Everyone seemed to think he was so brave and confident, butthey didn’t see how lost he really felt.
How could they trust him when he didn’t even know who he was?He looked at the pictures of Annabeth smiling.
He wondered how long it had been since she’d smiled.
She must really like this Percy guy to searchfor him so hard, and that made Jason a little envious.
Was anyone searching for him right now? What if somebody cared for him that much and wasgoing out of her mind with worry, and he couldn’t even remember his old life?“You know who I am,” he guessed.
“Don’t you?”Annabeth gripped the hilt of her dagger.
She looked for a chair to sit on, but of course there weren’t any.
“Honestly, Jason … I’m not sure.
My bestguess, you’re a loner.
It happens sometimes.
For one reason or another, the camp never found you, but you survived anyway by constantly movingaround.
Trained yourself to fight.
Handled the monsters on your own.
You beat the odds.
“Most demigods would never make it on their own.
And a child of Zeus—I mean, it doesn’t get any moredangerous than that.
The chances of your reaching age fifteen without finding Camp Half-Blood or dying—microscopic.
But like I said, it does happen.
She survived on her own for years.
Even took care of me for a while.
So maybe you were a loner too.
“And these marks?”Annabeth glanced at the tattoos.
Clearly, they bothered her.
“Well, the eagle is the symbol of Zeus, so that makes sense.
The twelve lines—maybethey stand for years, if you’d been making them since you were three years old.
SPQR—that’s the motto of the old Roman Empire: Senatus PopulusqueRomanus, the Senate and the People of Rome.
Though why you would burn that on your own arm, I don’t know.
Unless you had a really harsh Latinteacher …”Jason was pretty sure that wasn’t the reason.
It also didn’t seem possible he’d been on his own his whole life.
But what else made sense? Annabethhad been pretty clear—Camp Half-Blood was the only safe place in the world for demigods.
It seemed like a stupid thing to confide, but Annabeth didn’t look surprised.
“What did you see?”He told her about the wolves and the ruined house and the two rock spires.
As he talked, Annabeth started pacing, looking more and more agitated.
“But I’m sure I’ve been there before.
“Could be northern California.
And the she-wolf … I’ve studied goddesses, spirits, and monsters my whole life.
I’ve neverheard of Lupa.
And that thing rising out of the earth—” Annabeth’s expression darkened.
“You’ve got to stopit.
“Or at least, you’ve got a guess.
I saw your face last night at the campfire.
You looked at Chiron like it wassuddenly dawning on you, but you didn’t want to scare us.
“Jason, the thing about prophecies …the more you know, the more you try to change them, and that can be disastrous.
Chironbelieves it’s better that you find your own path, find out things in your own time.
If he’d told me everything he knew before my first quest with Percy… I’vegot to admit, I’m not sure I would’ve been able to go through with it.
For your quest, it’s even more important.
At least … I hope not.
Where am I supposed to go?”“Follow the monsters,” Annabeth suggested.
The storm spirit who’d attacked him at the Grand Canyon had said he was being recalled to his boss.
If Jason could trackthe storm spirits, he might be able to find the person controlling them.
And maybe that would lead him to Hera’s prison.
“How do I find storm winds?”“Personally, I’d ask a wind god,” Annabeth said.
“Aeolus is the master of all the winds, but he’s a little … unpredictable.
No one finds him unless hewants to be found.
I’d try one of the four seasonal wind gods that work for Aeolus.
The nearest one, the one who has the most dealings with heroes, isBoreas, the North Wind.
“He settled in North America like all the other gods.
So of course he picked the oldest northernsettlement, about as far north as you can go.
What was farther north than Maine? The oldest northern settlement …“Canada,” he decided.
“Quebec.
“I hope you speak French.
Quebec—at least now he had a goal.
Find the North Wind, track down the storm spirits, find out who theyworked for and where that ruined house was.
Free Hera.
All in four days.
Cake.
“So, um … you said it was dangerous being a child of Zeus.
What everhappened to Thalia?”“Oh, she’s fine,” Annabeth said.
“She became a Hunter of Artemis—one of the handmaidens of the goddess.
They roam around the country killingmonsters.
We don’t see them at camp very often.
He understood why Thalia had slept in this alcove.
It was the only place in the cabin not in HippieZeus’s line of sight.
And even that hadn’t been enough.
She’d chosen to follow Artemis and be part of a group rather than stay in this cold drafty templealone with her twenty-foot-tall dad—Jason’s dad—glowering down at her.
Eat voltage! Jason didn’t have any trouble understanding Thalia’s feelings.
Hewondered if there was a Hunters group for guys.
“The sandy-haired guy.
Touchy subject.
“He’s dead now.
He kept thinking this photo of her was important.
He was missing something.
But another voice inside him, an insistent whisper, said: Dangerous.
Stay away.
She was a tree for a while.
Now she’s immortal.
“Don’t worry.
It’s not something all children of Zeus go through.
It’s a longstory, but … well, she was out of commission for a long time.
If she’d aged regularly, she’d be in her twenties now, but she still looks the same as in thatpicture, like she’s about … well, about your age.
Fifteen or sixteen?”Something the she-wolf had said in his dream nagged at Jason.
He found himself asking, “What’s her last name?”Annabeth looked uneasy.
“She didn’t use a last name, really.
If she had to, she’d use her mom’s, but they didn’t get along.
Thalia ran away when shewas pretty young.
“Thalia Grace.
The picture fluttered to the floor.
Or maybe she’d left it there on purpose—just enough for him toremember that name, and know that digging up his past was terribly, terribly dangerous.
It wasn’t a comment about Jason beating the odds as a loner.
Chiron knew something specific—somethingabout Jason’s family.
He could imagine Lupa growling a wolfish laugh.
It would kill him, and he had to get Annabeth’s help.
If she knew Thalia, maybe she could advise him.
“Until I figure out what’s going on, what this all means—” He rubbed the burned tattoos on his forearm.
“You have to keep asecret.
“All right.
Until you tell me it’s okay, I won’t share what you say with anyone else.
I swear on the RiverStyx.
You are our saving Grace, the wolf had snarled.
Jason picked up the photo from the floor.
“This is my sister.
Jason could see her wrestling with dismay, disbelief, anger.
She thought hewas lying.
His claim was impossible.
And part of him felt the same way, but as soon as he spoke the words, he knew they were true.
Half a dozen campers spilled in, led by the bald guy from Iris, Butch.
“Hurry!” he said, and Jason couldn’t tellif his expression was excitement or fear.
“The dragon is back.
There were plenty of those in the Aphrodite cabin.
She sat on her bunk, looked at her reflection andgroaned.
She messed up her hair, washed the makeup off her face, cried to make her eyes red.
Nothingworked.
Her hair popped back to perfection.
The magic makeup reapplied itself.
Her eyes refused to get puffy or bloodshot.
The other Aphrodite campers offered her some (laughing behind her back, shewas sure), but each outfit was even more fashionable and ridiculous than what she had on.
Piper normally looked like a zombie in the morning, but her hair was styled like a supermodel’sand her skin was perfect.
Even that horrible zit at the base of her nose, which she’d had for so many days she’d started to call it Bob, had disappeared.
No use.
The do just popped back into place.
She looked like Cherokee Barbie.
“Mom’s blessing will last at least anotherday.
Maybe a week if you’re lucky.
“A week?”The other Aphrodite kids—about dozen girls and five guys—smirked and snickered at her discomfort.
Piper knew she should play cool, not let themget under her skin.
She’d dealt with shallow, popular kids plenty of times.
But this was different.
These were her brothers and sisters, even if she hadnothing in common with them, and how Aphrodite had managed to have so many kids so close in age … Never mind.
She didn’t want to know.
“You’re thinking you don’t belong here? We couldn’t agree more.
Isn’t that right, Mitchell ?”One of the guys flinched.
“Um, yeah.
Sure.
Everyone else watched, not daring to speak.
“So anyways, people, fifteenminutes until breakfast.
The cabin’s not going to clean itself! And Mitchell, I think you’ve learned your lesson.
Right, sweetie? So you’re on garbage patroljust for today, mm-kay? Show Piper how it’s done, ’cause I have a feeling she’ll have that job soon—i f she survives her quest.
Now, get to work,everybody! It’s my bathroom time!”Everybody started rushing around, making beds and folding clothes, while Drew scooped up her makeup kit, hair dryer, and brush and marched intothe bathroom.
A couple of older campers comforted her and wiped the bubbles out of her hair.
“You let Drew treat you like this?”A few kids shot Piper nervous looks, like they might actually agree, but they said nothing.
It was a life-size dollhouse, with pink walls and whitewindow trim.
The lace curtains were pastel blue and green, which of course matched the sheets and feather comforters on all the beds.
Something wasdefinitely unnatural about that.
Every camper had a wooden camp chest at the foot of their bunk with their name painted on it, and Piper guessed thatthe clothes in each chest were neatly folded and color coordinated.
The only bit of individualism was how the campers decorated their private bunkspaces.
Each had slightly different pictures tacked up of whatever celebrities they thought were hot.
A few had personal photos, too, but most wereactors or singers or whatever.
It had been almost a year since the movie, and she thought by now surely everyone had torn down thoseold tattered advertisements and tacked up something newer.
But no such luck.
She spotted one on the wall by the storage closet, in the middle of acollage of famous heartthrobs.
Under that, the poster showed the leading man—a three-quarters shot of bare-chested bronze flesh, withripped pectorals and six-pack abs.
He was clad in only a Greek war kilt and a purple cape, sword in hand.
He looked like he’d just been rubbed in oil,his short black hair gleaming and rivulets of sweat pouring off his rugged face, those dark sad eyes facing the camera as if to say, I will kill your menand steal your women! Ha-ha!It was the most ridiculous poster of all time.
Piper and her dad had had a good laugh over it the first time they saw it.
Then the movie made a bajilliondollars.
The poster graphic popped up everywhere.
Piper couldn’t get away from it at school, walking down the street, even online.
It became ThePoster, the most embarrassing thing in her life.
And yeah, it was a picture of her dad.
Maybe when everyone went to breakfast she could tear it down and they wouldn’tnotice.
She straightened her bed, then realized the top blanket was the one Jason hadwrapped around her shoulders last night.
She picked it up and pressed it to her face.
It smelled of wood smoke, but unfortunately not of Jason.
He wasthe only person who’d been genuinely nice to her after the claiming, like he cared about how she felt, not just about her stupid new clothes.
God, she’dwanted to kiss him, but he’d seemed so uncomfortable, almost scared of her.
She couldn’t really blame him.
She’d been glowing pink.
The garbage patrol guy, Mitchell, was crawling around on all fours, picking up chocolate wrappers andcrumpled notes from under the bunk beds.
Apparently the Aphrodite kids weren’t one hundred percent neat freaks after all.
“What’d you do to make Drew mad?”He glanced over at the bathroom door to make sure it was still closed.
“Last night, after you were claimed, I said you might not be so bad.
An Aphrodite kid had actually stood up for her?“Thanks,” she said.
“Yeah, well.
See where it got me.
But for what it’s worth, welcome to Cabin Ten.
She looked around furtively like she was delivering nuclear materials.
“You can change clothes.
The blessing won’t stop you.
This is just, you know, a backpack, some rations, ambrosia andnectar for emergencies, some jeans, a few extra shirts, and a warm jacket.
The boots might be a little snug.
But—well—we took up a collection.
Goodluck on your quest!”Lacy dumped the things on the bed and started to hurry away, but Piper caught her arm.
“Hold on.
At least let me thank you! Why are you rushing off?”Lacy looked like she might shake apart from nervousness.
“Oh, well—”“Drew might find out,” Mitchell explained.
Displayed on it were a hideous pair of orthopedicnurse’s shoes, bright white with thick soles.
“They don’t go with anything!”“And there’re worse punishments,” Mitchell warned.
“Drew can charmspeak, see? Not many Aphrodite kids have that power; but if she tries hardenough, she can get you to do some pretty embarrassing things.
Piper, you’re the first person I’ve seen in a long time who is able to resist her.
Or … giving you things.
Like a car?”“Oh, don’t give Drew any ideas!” Lacy gasped.
“She could do that.
“She convinced you all?”Mitchell picked a nasty wad of gum from under Piper’s bed.
“Nah, she inherited the post when Silena Beauregard died in the war.
Drew was secondoldest.
Oldest camper automatically gets the post, unless somebody with more years or more completed quests wants to challenge, in which casethere’s a duel, but that hardly ever happens.
Anyway, we’ve been stuck with Drew in charge since August.
She decided to make some, ah, changes inthe way the cabin is run.
Lacy squeaked like a guinea pig and tried to run, but Drew put an arm out to stopher.
She looked down at Mitchell.
“I think you missed some trash, sweetie.
You’d better make another pass.
He glared at Drew like he was about to attack (which Piper would’ve paid money to see), but finally he snapped,“Fine.
“See, Piper, hon, we’re a good cabin here.
A good family! Silena Beauregard, though … you could take a warning from her.
She wassecretly passing information to Kronos in the Titan War, helping the enemy.
She looked like any popularteenage girl from any high school.
But her eyes were as cold as steel.
Piper got the feeling Drew was looking straight into her soul, pulling out hersecrets.
“They act like Silena Beauregard was a hero.
“She was a hero.
“Another day on garbage patrol, Mitchell.
But anyways, Silena lost track of what this cabin is about.
We match up cutecouples at camp! Then we break them apart and start over! It’s the best fun ever.
We don’t have any business getting involved in other stuff like wars andquests.
I certainly haven’t been on any quests.
They’re a waste of time!”Lacy raised her hand nervously.
“But last night you said you wanted to go on a—”Drew glared at her, and Lacy’s voice died.
There was no way Drew could know about her dreams or her dad’s kidnapping, was there?“It’s too bad you won’t be around,” Drew sighed.
“But if you survive your little quest, don’t worry, I’ll find somebodyto match up with you.
Maybe one ofthose gross Hephaestus guys.
Or Clovis? He’s pretty repulsive.
“Honestly, I didn’t think it waspossible for Aphrodite to have an ugly child, but … who was your father? Was he some sort of mutant, or—”“Tristan McLean,” Piper snapped.
She never, ever played the “famous dad” card.
But Drew had driven her over the edge.
“My dad’s TristanMcLean.
Everybody turned and looked at The Poster, her dad flexinghis muscles for the whole world to see.
“The dude with the sword who killed that other dude in that movie?”“He is so hot for an old guy,” a girl said, and then she blushed.
“I mean I’m sorry.
I know he’s your dad.
That’s so weird!”“It’s weird, all right,” Piper agreed.
She couldn’t say, If my dad survives .
“Rite of what?” she asked.
“You get someone to fall in love with you.
Then you break their heart.
Dump them.
Onceyou do that, you’ve proven yourself worthy of Aphrodite.
“Break someone’s heart on purpose? That’s terrible!”The others looked confused.
“I bet Aphrodite broke your dad’s heart! I bet he never loved anyone again, did he? That’s so romantic! When you have yourrite of passage, you can be just like Mom!”“Forget it!” Piper yelled, a little louder than she’d intended.
The other kids backed away.
“I’m not breaking somebody’s heart just for a stupid rite ofpassage!”Which of course gave Drew a chance to take back control.
“Well, there you go!” she cut in.
“Silena said the same thing.
She broke the tradition, fellin love with that Beckendorf boy, and stayed in love.
If you ask me, that’s why things ended tragically for her.
And this nonsense about your dad being TristanMcLean—that’s so begging for attention.
“Please.
Now, it’s time for breakfast, people, and Piper here has to start that little quest.
So let’s get her packed and get herout of here!”Drew broke up the crowd and got everyone moving.
She called them “hon” and “dear,” but her tone made it clear she expected to be obeyed.
They even guarded the bathroom while Piper went in and changed into a better traveling outfit.
The hand-medownsweren’t fancy—thank god—just well-worn jeans, a T-shirt, a comfortable winter coat, and hiking boots that fit perfectly.
She strapped her dagger,Katoptris, to her belt.
The other campers were standing at their bunks while Drew came around and inspected.
Piperturned to Mitchell and Lacy and mouthed, Thank you.
Mitchell nodded grimly.
Lacy flashed a full-braces smile.
Piper doubted Drew had ever thankedthem for anything.
She also noticed that the King of Sparta poster had been wadded up and thrown in the trash.
Drew’s orders, no doubt.
Even thoughPiper had wanted to take the poster down herself, now she was totally steamed.
“Very nice! Our little quest girl all dressed in Dumpster clothes again.
Now, off you go! Noneed to eat breakfast with us.
Good luck with … whatever.
Bye!”Piper shouldered her bag.
She could feel everyone else’s eyes on her as she walked to the door.
She could just leave and forget about it.
Thatwould’ve been the easy thing.
What did she care about this cabin, these shallow kids?Except that some of them had tried to help her.
Some of them had even stood up to Drew for her.
“You know, you all don’t have to follow Drew’s orders.
Several glanced at Drew, but she looked too stunned to respond.
“You can think for yourselves.
There’s got to be more to Aphrodite than this.
“Don’t be stupid! She’s charm-speaking you.
“I’m just telling the truth.
She didn’t understand exactly how this charmspeaking business worked, but she didn’t feel like she wasputting any special power into her words.
She didn’t want to win an argument by tricking people.
That would make her no better than Drew.
Piper simplymeant what she said.
Besides, even if she tried charmspeaking, she had a feeling it wouldn’t work very well on another charmspeaker like Drew.
“You may have a little power, Miss Movie Star.
But you don’t know the first thing about Aphrodite.
You have such great ideas?What do you think this cabin is about, then? Tell them.
Then maybe I’ll tell them a few things about you, huh?”Piper wanted to make a withering retort, but her anger turned to panic.
She was a spy for the enemy, just like Silena Beauregard.
An Aphroditetraitor.
Did Drew know about that, or was she bluffing? Under Drew’s glare, her confidence began to crumble.
“Aphrodite is not about this.
“Not this? Hear that, people? She doesn’t have a clue!”Piper promised herself she would never ever go back to that cabin.
She blinked away her tears and stormed across the green, not sure where shewas going—until she saw the dragon swooping down from the sky.
Even before he landed, the camp alarm went up.
Aconch horn blew.
All the satyrs started screaming, “Don’t kill me!” Half the camp ran outside in a mixture of pajamas and armor.
The dragon set downright in the middle of the green, and Leo yelled, “It’s cool! Don’t shoot!”Hesitantly, the archers lowered their bows.
The warriors backed away, keeping their spears and swords ready.
They made a loose wide ring aroundthe metal monster.
Other demigods hid behind their cabin doors or peeped out the windows.
Nobody seemed anxious to get close.
The dragon was huge.
It glistened in the morning sun like a living penny sculpture —different shades of copper andbronze—a sixty-foot-long serpent with steel talons and drill-bit teeth and glowing ruby eyes.
It had bat-shaped wings twice its length that unfurled likemetallic sails, making a sound like coins cascading out of a slot machine every time they flapped.
The other demigods stared at her like she was insane.
Campers scrambled away and hefted their weapons, but Leo slid calmly off thedragon’s back.
He held up his hands like he was surrendering, except he still had that crazy grin on his face.
He looked like he’d been rolling around in the campfire.
His army coat and his face were smearedwith soot.
His hands were grease-stained, and he wore a new tool belt around his waist.
His eyes were bloodshot.
His curly hair was so oily it stuck up inporcupine quills, and he smelled strangely of Tabasco sauce.
But he looked absolutely delighted.
“Festus is just saying hello!”“That thing is dangerous!” an Ares girl shouted, brandishing her spear.
“Kill it now!”“Stand down!” someone ordered.
He pushed through the crowd, flanked by Annabeth and that girl from the Hephaestus cabin, Nyssa.
“Leo, what have you done?”“Found a ride!” Leo beamed.
“You said I could go on the quest if I got you a ride.
Well, I got you a class-A metallic flying bad boy! Festus can take usanywhere!”“It—has wings,” Nyssa stammered.
Her jaw looked like it might drop off her face.
“I found them and reattached them.
Where did you find them?”Leo hesitated, and Piper could tell he was hiding something.
“Repaired his circuits, too, mostly, so no more problems with him going haywire.
It tilted to one side and a stream of black liquid—maybe oil, hopefully just oil—poured out of its ear, all over Leo.
“I mean, the fire breath …”“I’m quick,” Leo said.
“And lucky.
Now, am I on this quest, or what?”Jason scratched his head.
“You named him Festus? You know that in Latin, ‘festus’ means ‘happy’? You want us to ride off to save the world onHappy the Dragon?”The dragon twitched and shuddered and flapped his wings.
“Now, um, I’d really suggest we get going, guys.
I already picked up some supplies in the—um, in the woods.
And allthese people with weapons are making Festus nervous.
“But we haven’t planned anything yet.
We can’t just—”“Go,” Annabeth said.
She was the only one who didn’t look nervous at all.
Her expression was sad and wistful, like this reminded her of better times.
This is certainly a good omen.
Go!”Jason nodded.
Then he smiled at Piper.
“You ready, partner?”Piper looked at the bronze dragon wings shining against the sky, and those talons that could’ve shredded her to pieces.
Talk aboutseat warmers! And the grooves in the dragon’s back were designed like high-tech saddles, so they weren’t uncomfortable at all.
Leo showed them howto hook their feet in the chinks of the armor, like in stirrups, and use the leather safety harnesses cleverly concealed under the exterior plating.
They satsingle file: Leo in front, then Piper, then Jason, and Piper was very aware of Jason right behind her.
She wished he would hold on to her, maybe wrap hisarms around her waist; but sadly, he didn’t.
The metal wings worked perfectly, and soon the coast of LongIsland was just a hazy line behind them.
They shot over Connecticut and climbed into the gray winter clouds.
“Cool, right?”“What if we get spotted?” Piper asked.
“It keeps mortals from seeing magic things.
If they spot us, they’ll probably mistake us for a small plane or something.
“You sure about that?”“No,” he admitted.
Then Piper saw he was clutching a photo in his hand—a picture of a girl with dark hair.
“We’re making good time.
Probably get there by tonight.
Hadhe remembered something about his life before? Was that a photo of his real girlfriend?Stop it, she thought.
You’ll just torture yourself.
“Where are we heading?”“To find the god of the North Wind,” Jason said.
“And chase some storm spirits.
He hadn’t blowtorched a single cabin or eaten any satyrs, even if he did dribble a little oil from his ear.
Okay, a lot ofoil.
Leo could work on that later.
He needed some time to think about all that.
Hecould tell them when he came back.
He’d scored a sweet magic tool belt from the bunker, plus a lot of cool supplies now safely stowed in his backpack.
Besides,he had a fire-breathing, only slightly leaky dragon on his side.
What could go wrong?Well, the control disk could bust, the bad part of him suggested.
Festus could eat you.
He’d worked all night attaching those wings, but he hadn’t found an extra dragonbrain anywhere in the bunker.
Hey, they were under a time limit! Three days until the solstice.
They had to get going.
Besides, Leo had cleaned the diskpretty well.
Most of the circuits were still good.
It would just have to hold together.
“Long night.
I think I’m hallucinating.
It’s cool.
“So what’s the plan, bro? You said something about catching wind, or breakingwind, or something?”As they flew over New England, Jason laid out the game plan: First, find some guy named Boreas and grill him for information—“His name is Boreas?” Leo had to ask.
“What is he, the God of Boring?”Second, Jason continued, they had to find those venti that had attacked them at the Grand Canyon—“Can we just call them storm spirits?” Leo asked.
“Venti makes them sound like evil espresso drinks.
“The guy who threw me off the skywalk and sucked Coach Hedge intothe clouds.
“Well … there may be a wolf involved, too.
But I think she’s friendly.
She probably won’t eat us, unless we showweakness.
“But you don’t know where this place is.
“The prophecy said the giants’ revenge .
“Giants—like more than one? Why can’t it be just one giant who wants revenge?”“I don’t think so,” Piper said.
“I remember in some of the old Greek stories, there was something about an army of giants.
“Of course, with our luck, it’s an army.
So you know anything else about these giants? Didn’t you do a bunch of myth researchfor that movie with your dad?”“Your dad’s an actor?” Jason asked.
“I keep forgetting about your amnesia.
Heh.
Forgetting about amnesia.
That’s funny.
But yeah, her dad’s Tristan McLean.
“The giants—well, there were lots of giants in Greek mythology.
But if I’m thinking of the right ones, they werebad news.
Huge, almost impossible to kill.
They could throw mountains and stuff.
I think they were related to the Titans.
They rose from the earth afterKronos lost the war—I mean the first Titan war, thousands of years ago—and they tried to destroy Olympus.
If we’re talking about the same giants—”“Chiron said it was happening again,” Jason remembered.
“The last chapter.
That’s what he meant.
No wonder he didn’t want us to know all thedetails.
“So … giants who can throw mountains.
Friendly wolves that will eat us if we show weakness.
Evil espresso drinks.
Gotcha.
Maybethis isn’t the time to bring up my psycho babysitter.
He didn’t tell them about his fire abilities.
That wasstill a touchy subject, especially after Nyssa had told him fire demigods tended to destroy cities and stuff.
Besides, then Leo would have to get into howhe’d caused his mom’s death, and … No.
He wasn’t ready to go there.
He did manage to tell about the night she died, not mentioning the fire, just sayingthe machine shop collapsed.
It was easier without having to look at his friends, just keeping his eyes straight ahead as they flew.
“Thing is, everybody says don’t trust Hera.
She hates demigods.
And the prophecy said we’d cause death if weunleash her rage.
So I’m wondering … why are we doing this?”“She chose us,” Jason said.
“All three of us.
We’re the first of the seven who have to gather for the Great Prophecy.
This quest is the beginning ofsomething much bigger.
It did feel like this was the start of something huge.
He just wished thatif there were four more demigods destined to help them, they’d show up quick.
Leo didn’t want to hog all the terrifying life-threatening adventures.
And that dark spire in my dream seemed to be feeding onHera’s energy.
If that thing unleashes a king of the giants by destroying Hera—”“Not a good trade-off,” Piper agreed.
“At least Hera is on our side—mostly.
Losing her would throw the gods into chaos.
She’s the main one whokeeps peace in the family.
And a war with the giants could be even more destructive than the Titan War.
“Chiron also talked about worse forces stirring on the solstice, with it being a good time for dark magic, and all—something thatcould awaken if Hera were sacrificed on that day.
And this mistress who’s controlling the storm spirits, the one who wants to kill all the demigods—”“Might be that weird sleeping lady,” Leo finished.
“Dirt Woman fully awake? Not something I want to see.
“And what does she have to do with giants?”Good questions, but none of them had answers.
They flew in silence while Leo wondered if he’d done the right thing, sharing so much.
He’d nevertold anyone about that night at the warehouse.
Even if he hadn’t give them the whole story, it still felt strange, like he’d opened up his chest and taken outall the gears that made him tick.
His body was shaking, and not from the cold.
He hoped Piper, sitting behind him, couldn’t tell.
Wasn’t that the prophecy line? That meant Piper and he would have to figure out how to break into thatmagic rock prison, assuming they could find it.
Then they’d unleash Hera’s rage, causing a lot of death.
Well, that sounded fun! Leo had seen Tía Callidain action; she liked knives, snakes, and putting babies in roaring fires.
Yeah, definitely let’s unleash her rage.
Great idea.
The wind got colder, and below them snowy forests seemed to go on forever.
Leo didn’t know exactly where Quebec was.
He’dtold Festus to take them to the palace of Boreas, and Festus kept going north.
Hopefully, the dragon knew the way, and they wouldn’t end up at the NorthPole.
“You were up all night.
“You won’t let me fall off?”Piper patted his shoulder.
“Trust me, Valdez.
Beautiful people never lie.
He leaned forward against the warm bronze of the dragon’s neck, and closed his eyes.
Below them, a city sat on a cliff overlooking a river.
The plains around it were dusted with snow, but the cityitself glowed warmly in the winter sunset.
Buildings crowded together inside high walls like a medieval town, way older than any place Leo had seenbefore.
In the center was an actual castle—at least Leo assumed it was a castle—with massive red brick walls and a square tower with a peaked, greengabled roof.
“One of the oldest cities in North America.
Founded around sixteen hundred or so?”Leo raised an eyebrow.
“Your dad do a movie about that too?”She made a face at him, which Leo was used to, but it didn’t quite work with her new glamorous makeup.
“I read sometimes, okay? Just becauseAphrodite claimed me, doesn’t mean I have to be an airhead.
“So you know so much, what’s that castle?”“A hotel, I think.
“No way.
The grand entrance was bustling with doormen, valets, and porters taking bags.
Sleek black luxurycars idled in the drive.
People in elegant suits and winter cloaks hurried to get out of the cold.
“That can’t be—”“Heads up, guys,” Jason interrupted.
“We got company!”Leo looked below and saw what Jason meant.
Rising from the top of the tower were two winged figures—angry angels, with nasty-looking swords.
He swooped to a halt in midair, wings beating and talons bared, and made a rumbling sound in his throat that Leorecognized.
He was getting ready to blow fire.
Something told him the angels would not take kindly to getting torched.
“They look like storm spirits.
They looked like regular teenagersexcept for their icy white hair and feathery purple wings.
Their bronze swords were jagged, like icicles.
Their faces looked similar enough that theymight’ve been brothers, but they definitely weren’t twins.
The guy clearly had been in too many fights,because both his eyes were black, and when he bared his teeth, several of them were missing.
His ice-white hair was long and feathered into a mullet.
He wore pointy-toed leather shoes, designer pants that were way too tight, and a godawfulsilk shirt with the top three buttons open.
Maybe he thought he looked like a groovy love god, but the guy couldn’t have weighed more than ninetypounds, and he had a bad case of acne.
“No clearance.
On top of his other problems, he had a French accent so bad Leo was sure it wasfake.
“This is restricted airspace.
Jason summoned his golden sword, but Leo cried, “Hold on!Let’s have some manners here, boys.
Can I at least find out who has the honor of destroying me?”“I am Cal!” the ox grunted.
He looked very proud of himself, like he’d taken a long time to memorize that sentence.
“Sadly, my brother cannot say words with more than two syllables—”“Pizza! Hockey! Destroy!” Cal offered.
“And this is Zethes! My brother!”“Wow,” Leo said.
“That was almost three sentences, man! Way to go.
“They make fun of you.
But no matter.
I am Zethes, which is short for Zethes.
And the lady there—” He winkedat Piper, but the wink was more like a facial seizure.
“She can call me anything she likes.
Perhaps she would like to have dinner with a famous demigodbefore we must destroy you?”Piper made a sound like gagging on a cough drop.
“That’s … a truly horrifying offer.
“We are a very romantic people, we Boreads.
“Do you mean, like, the sons of Boreas?”“Ah, so you’ve heard of us!” Zethes looked pleased.
“We are our father’s gatekeepers.
So you understand, we cannot have unauthorized peopleflying in his airspace on creaky dragons, scaring the silly mortal peoples.
Several were pointing up—not with alarm, yet—more with confusionand annoyance, like the dragon was a traffic helicopter flying too low.
“This is an emergency landing.
“How does the pretty girl decide this is an emergency, then?”“We have to see Boreas.
It’s totally urgent! Please?” She forced a smile, which Leo figured must’ve been killing her; but she still had that blessing ofAphrodite thing going on, and she looked great.
Something about her voice, too—Leo found himself believing every word.
Jason was nodding, lookingabsolutely convinced.
“Well … I hate to disappoint a lovely lady, but you see, my sister,she would have an avalanche if we allowed you—”“And our dragon is malfunctioning!” Piper added.
“It could crash any minute!”Festus shuddered helpfully, then turned his head and spilled gunk out of his ear, splattering a black Mercedes in the parking lot below.
Then he gave Piper another spasmodic wink.
“Well, you are pretty.
I mean, you’re right.
A malfunctioning dragon—thiscould be an emergency.
“Father has not been kind to visitors lately.
But, yes.
Come, faulty dragon people.
Follow us.
Then the Boreadsswitched them on, and Leo realized they were flashlights with orange cones, like the ones traffic controller guys use on a runway.
Cal and Zethes turnedand swooped toward the hotel’s tower.
“I love these guys.
Follow them?”Jason and Piper didn’t look eager.
“We’re here now.
But I wonder why Boreas hasn’t been kind to visitors.
“Festus, after those flashlights!”As they got closer, Leo worried they’d crash into the tower.
The Boreads made right for the green gabled peak and didn’t slow down.
Then a section ofthe slanted roof slid open, revealing an entrance easily wide enough for Festus.
The top and bottom were lined with icicles like jagged teeth.
The entry hall had vaulted ceilings forty feethigh, huge draped windows, and lush oriental carpets.
A staircase at the back of the room led up to another equally massive hall, and more corridorsbranched off to the left and right.
But the ice made the room’s beauty a little frightening.
When Leo slid off the dragon, the carpet crunched under his feet.
The curtains didn’t budge because they were frozen solid, and the ice-coated windows let in weird watery lightfrom the sunset.
Even the ceiling was furry with icicles.
As for the stairs, Leo was sure he’d slip and break his neck if he tried to climb them.
“Something feels wrong.
Something up there …”Festus shuddered and snorted flames.
Frost started to form on his scales.
“The dragon must be deactivated.
Wecan’t have fire in here.
The heat ruins my hair.
“The dragon’s a little touchy about the whole deactivation concept.
But I’ve got a better solution.
You gotta stop with the destroy talk.
Just wait.
When I was repairing Festus last night, I found all kinds of buttons.
Some, you do not want to know what they do.
Butothers … Ah, here we go.
He pulled a switch, and the dragon shuddered from head to toe.
Everyone backed away asFestus folded like origami.
His bronze plating stacked together.
His neck and tail contracted into his body.
His wings collapsed and his trunk compacteduntil he was a rectangular metal wedge the size of a suitcase.
“Um … yeah.
Hold on.
I think—aha.
A handle flipped up on the top, and wheels clicked out on the bottom.
“The world’s heaviest carry-on bag!”“That’s impossible,” Jason said.
“Something that big couldn’t—”“Stop!” Zethes ordered.
He and Cal both drew their swords and glared at Leo.
“Okay … what’d I do? Stay calm, guys.
If it bothers you that much, I don’t have to take the dragon as carry-on—”“Who are you?” Zethes shoved the point of his sword against Leo’s chest.
“A child of the South Wind, spying on us?”“What? No!” Leo said.
“Son of Hephaestus.
Friendly blacksmith, no harm to anyone!”Cal growled.
He put his face up to Leo’s, and he definitely wasn’t any prettier at point-blank, with his bruised eyes and bashed-in mouth.
“Smell fire,”he said.
“Fire is bad.
“Yeah, well … my clothes are kind of singed, and I’ve been working with oil, and—”“No!” Zethes pushed Leo back at sword point.
“We can smell fire, demigod.
We assumed it was from the creaky dragon, but now the dragon is asuitcase.
And I still smell fire … on you.
“Hey … look … I don’t know—” He glanced at his friendsdesperately.
“Guys, a little help?”Jason already had his gold coin in his hand.
He stepped forward, his eyes on Zethes.
“Look, there’s been a mistake.
Leo isn’t a fire guy.
Tell them,Leo.
Tell them you’re not a fire guy.
“We’re all friends here.
Put down yourswords and let’s talk.
He needed some backup.
But it would’ve taken several minutes, even if he could reach the button, with twopurple-winged crazy guys in his path.
“Sadly, I think—”“No,” Jason insisted.
He sounded calm enough, but Leo figured he was about two seconds away from flipping that coin and going into full gladiatormode.
“Leo’s just a son of Hephaestus.
He’s no threat.
Piper here is a daughter of Aphrodite.
I’m the son of Zeus.
We’re on a peaceful …”Jason’s voice faltered, because both Boreads had suddenly turned on him.
“You are the son of Zeus?”“Um … yeah,” Jason said.
“That’s a good thing, right? My name is Jason.
“Can’t be Jason,” he said.
“Doesn’t look the same.
“No, he is not our Jason.
Our Jason was more stylish.
Not as much as me—but stylish.
“Your Jason … you mean the original Jason? The Golden Fleece guy?”“Of course,” Zethes said.
“We were his crewmates aboard his ship, the Argo, in the old times, when we were mortal demigods.
Then we acceptedimmortality to serve our father, so I could look this good for all time, and my silly brother could enjoy pizza and hockey.
“You can’t be him.
Clearly the conversation was giving his two brain cells a serious workout.
“If he is a son of Zeus, he could be the one we’ve been watching for.
“You mean like in a good way: you’ll shower him with fabulous prizes? Or watching for like in a bad way: he’s in trouble?”A girl’s voice said, “That depends on my father’s will.
His heart nearly stopped.
At the top stood a girl in a white silk dress.
Her skin was unnaturally pale, the color of snow,but her hair was a lush mane of black, and her eyes were coffee brown.
She focused on Leo with no expression, no smile, no friendliness.
But it didn’tmatter.
Leo was in love.
She was the most dazzling girl he’d ever seen.
“Zethes, bring our guests.
He wasn’t sure how he’d lug it up the stairs, but he had to get next to that girl and ask hersome important questions—like her e-mail address and phone number.
Not literally froze, but she might as well have.
“Fire and ice—it would not be wise.
“He will not be harmed, Jason Grace, unless you make trouble.
Calais,keep Leo Valdez here.
Guard him, but do not kill him.
“Just a little?”“No,” the girl insisted.
“And take care of his interesting suitcase, until Father passes judgment.
They were ready to fight for him.
They wouldn’t leave him alone with the hockey ox.
Part of him wanted to go for it, bustout his new tool belt and see what he could do, maybe even summon a fireball or two and warm this place up.
But the Boread guys scared him.
And thatgorgeous girl scared him more, even if he still wanted her number.
“No sense causing trouble if we don’t have to.
You go ahead.
“Leo Valdez will be perfectly safe.
I wish I could say the same for you, son of Zeus.
Now come, King Boreasis waiting.
The guy might’ve looked like a disco-era reject, but there wasnothing funny about his sword.
Jason figured one hit from that thing would probably turn him into a Popsicle.
Every once in a while she’d turn and give Jason a smile, but there was no warmth in her expression.
She regardedJason like he was an especially interesting science specimen—one she couldn’t wait to dissect.
Annabeth had told him Boreas was the friendliest of the wind gods.
If things went bad, he wasn’t sure he could get them out alive.
Without thinking about it, he tookPiper’s hand for reassurance.
“Just a talk, right?”At the top of the stairs, the ice princess looked back and noticed them holding hands.
Her smile faded.
Suddenly Jason’s hand in Piper’s turned icecold—burning cold.
He let go, and his fingers were smoking with frost.
So were Piper’s.
Please, this way.
Zethes poked him in the back with his icicle sword, and they followed the princess down a massive hallway decked infrosty tapestries.
He’d had a lot of time to think while they rode the dragon north, buthe felt as confused as ever.
Her image had burned itself into his mind.
It was bad enough notremembering his past, but to know he had a sister out there somewhere who might have answers and to have no way of finding her—that just drove himup the wall.
They both had blue eyes, but that was it.
Her hair was black.
Her complexion was more Mediterranean.
Hera had left him just enough memory that he could be certain Thalia was his sister.
But Annabeth had actedcompletely surprised when he’d told her, like she’d never heard of Thalia’s having a brother.
Did Thalia even know about him? How had they beenseparated?Hera had taken those memories.
She’d stolen everything from Jason’s past, plopped him into a new life, and now she expected him to save herfrom some prison just so he could get back what she’d taken.
It made Jason so angry, he wanted to walk away, let Hera rot in that cage: but he couldn’t.
He had to know more, and that made him even more resentful.
“You still with me?”“Yeah … yeah, sorry.
He needed a friend, and he was glad she’d started losing the Aphrodite blessing.
The makeup was fading.
Her hair wasslowly going back to its old choppy style with the little braids down the sides.
It made her look more real, and as far as Jason was concerned, morebeautiful.
Their relationship was just a trick of the Mist in Piper’s mind.
But thelonger he spent with her, the more he wished it had been real.
It wasn’t fair to Piper, thinking that way.
Jason had no idea what was waiting for him back in his old life—or who might bewaiting.
But he was pretty sure his past wouldn’t mix with Camp Half-Blood.
After this quest, who knew what would happen? Assuming they evensurvived.
In each corner was a man’s beardedface, blowing wind.
Jason was pretty sure he’d seen maps like this before.
But in this version, all the wind guys were Winter, blowing ice and snow fromevery corner of the world.
Her brown eyes glittered, and Jason felt like he was a Christmas present she was hoping to open.
“Be on your best behavior, Jason Grace.
My father can be … chilly.
I will translate for you, and try to encouragehim to hear you out.
I do hope he spares you.
We could have such fun.
“But really, we’re just here for a little talk.
We’ll be leaving right afterward.
“I love heroes.
So blissfully ignorant.
“Well, how about you enlighten us? You say you’re going to translate for us, and we don’t even know who youare.
What’s your name?”The girl sniffed with distaste.
“I suppose I shouldn’t be surprised you don’t recognize me.
Even in the ancient times the Greeks did not know me well.
I am Khione, daughter of Boreas, goddess of snow.
The oaken doors blew open, and cold blue light spilled out of the room.
“Hopefully you will survive your little talk.
Jason shivered, and his breath steamed.
Along the walls, purple tapestries showed scenes of snowy forests, barren mountains,and glaciers.
High above, ribbons of colored light—the aurora borealis—pulsed along the ceiling.
A layer of snow covered the floor, so Jason had to stepcarefully.
All around the room stood life-size ice sculpture warriors—some in Greek armor, some medieval, some in modern camouflage—all frozen invarious attack positions, swords raised, guns locked and loaded.
Then he tried to step between two Greek spearmen, and they moved with surprising speed, their jointscracking and spraying ice crystals as they crossed their javelins to block Jason’s path.
The room was so long and misty, Jason couldn’t see theother end; but whatever the man said, the ice guards uncrossed their javelins.
“My father has ordered them not to kill you just yet.
“Keep moving, Jason Junior.
Later, perhaps, I can lend hersomething from my wide assortment of hair products.
He was sturdily built, dressed in a stylish white suit that seemed woven fromsnow, with dark purple wings that spread out to either side.
His long hair and shaggy beard were encrusted with icicles, so Jason couldn’t tell if his hairwas gray or just white with frost.
His arched eyebrows made him look angry, but his eyes twinkled more warmly than his daughter’s—as if he might havea sense of humor buried somewhere under that permafrost.
Jason hoped so.
“Je suis Boreas le Roi.
Et vous?”Khione the snow goddess was about to speak, but Piper stepped forward and curtsied.
Et c ’est Jason, fils de Zeus.
“Vous parlez français? Très bien!”“Piper, you speak French?” Jason asked.
Piper frowned.
“No.
Why?” “You just spoke French.
“I did?” The king said something else,and Piper nodded.
“Oui,Votre Majesté.
He said a few more sentences then swept his hand toward his daughter as if shooingher away.
“The king says—”“He says I’m a daughter of Aphrodite,” Piper interrupted, “so naturally I can speak French, which is the language of love.
I had no idea.
His Majestysays Khione won’t have to translate now.
She bowed stiffly to her father and took a step back.
“Your Majesty, I’m Jason Grace.
Thank you for, um, not killing us.
May Iask … why does a Greek god speak French?”Piper had another exchange with the king.
“He says all gods do this.
Most Greek gods speak English, as they now reside in theUnited States, but Boreas was never welcomed in their realm.
His domain was always far to the north.
These days he likes Quebec, so he speaksFrench.
“He says—”“Oh, allow me,” Khione said.
“My father says he has orders to kill you.
Did I not mention that earlier?”Jason tensed.
The king was still smiling amiably, like he’d just delivered great news.
“Why?”“Because,” the king said, in heavily accented English, “my lord Aeolus has commanded it.
He stepped down from his throne and furled his wings against his back.
As he approached, Khione and Zethes bowed.
Jason andPiper followed their example.
Toujours, I have had a fondness for the children ofAphrodite.
As for you, Jason Grace, my master Aeolus would not expect me to kill a son of Lord Zeus … without first hearing you out.
If he were forced to fight, he didn’t like his chances.
Two seconds at least to summon hisblade.
Then he’d be facing a god, two of his children, and an army of freeze-dried warriors.
“Why would he want us dead?”“You are demigods,” Boreas said, as if this explained everything.
“Aeolus’s job is to contain the winds, and demigods have always caused him manyheadaches.
They ask him for favors.
They unleash winds and cause chaos.
But the final insult was the battle with Typhon last summer…”Boreas waved his hand, and a sheet of ice like a flat-screen TV appeared in the air.
Images of a battle flickered across the surface—a giantwrapped in storm clouds, wading across a river toward the Manhattan skyline.
Tiny, glowing figures—the gods, Jason guessed—swarmed around himlike angry wasps, pounding the monster with lightning and fire.
Finally the river erupted in a massive whirlpool, and the smoky form sank beneath thewaves and disappeared.
“The first time the gods defeated him, eons ago, he did not die quietly.
His death released a host ofstorm spirits—wild winds that answered to no one.
It was Aeolus’s job to track them all down and imprison them in his fortress.
The other gods—they didnot help.
They did not even apologize for the inconvenience.
It took Aeolus centuries to track down all the storm spirits, and naturally this irritated him.
“Which made Aeolus even angrier.
He was going to destroy Olympus! Besides, why punish demigods forthat?” The king shrugged.
“Aeolus cannot take out his anger on the gods.
They are his bosses, and very powerful.
So he gets even with the demigods whohelped them in the war.
He issued orders to us: demigods who come to us for aid are no longer to be tolerated.
We are to crush your little mortal faces.
“But you’re not going to crush our faces yet, right? You’re going to listen to us first, ’cause once you hearabout our quest—”“Yes, yes,” the king agreed.
“You see, Aeolus also said that a son of Zeus might seek my aid, and if this happened, I should listen to you beforedestroying you, as you might—how did he put it?—make all our lives very interesting.
I am only obligated to listen, however.
After that, I am free to passjudgment as I see fit.
But I will listen first.
Khione wishes this also.
It may be that we will not kill you.
“Great.
Thanks.
“There are many ways you could make our lives interesting.
Sometimes we keep demigods for our amusement,as you can see.
“You mean—they’re all demigods? Frozen demigods? They’re alive?”“An interesting question,” Boreas conceded, as if it had never occurred to him before.
“They do not move unless they are obeying my orders.
Therest of the time, they are merely frozen.
Unless they were to melt, I suppose, which would be very messy.
“My father gives me such lovely presents,” she murmured in his ear.
“Join ourcourt.
Perhaps I’ll let your friends go.
“If Khione gets this one, then I deserve the girl.
Khione always gets more presents!”“Now, children,” Boreas said sternly.
“Our guests will think you are spoiled! Besides, you moved too fast.
We have not even heard the demigod’sstory yet.
Then we will decide what to do with them.
Please, Jason Grace, entertain us.
He didn’t look at Piper for fear he’d completely lose it.
He’d gotten them into this, and now they were going die—or worse, they’d be amusements for Boreas’s children and end up frozen forever in this throne room, slowly corroding from freezer burn.
Jason didn’t plan it, but electricity sparked along his skin.
There was loud pop, and Khione flew backward,skidding across the floor.
“That is good! I’m glad you did that, even though I have to kill you now.
Then the air around her began to swirl with a micro-blizzard.
“You dare—”“Stop,” Jason ordered, with as much force as he could muster.
“You’re not going to kill us.
And you’re not going to keep us.
We’re on a quest for thequeen of the gods herself, so unless you want Hera busting down your doors, you’re going to let us go.
Khione’s blizzard swirled to a stop.
Zethes lowered his sword.
They bothlooked uncertainly at their father.
His eyes twinkled, but Jason couldn’t tell if it was with anger or amusement.
“A son of Zeus, favored by Hera? This is definitelya first.
Tell us your story.
He hadn’t been expecting to get the chance to talk, and now that he could, his voice abandoned him.
“Your Majesty.
She told Boreas the whole story, fromthe Grand Canyon to the prophecy, much better and faster than Jason could have.
“These storm spirits attacked us, and they’re working for some evil mistress.
If we find them, maybewe can find Hera.
Out the windows, night had fallen, and the only light came from the aurora borealis overhead, washingeverything in red and blue.
“I know where they are kept, and of the prisoner they took.
“He’s alive?”Boreas waved aside the question.
“For now.
But the one who controls these storm winds … It would be madness to oppose her.
You would be betterstaying here as frozen statues.
“In three days she’s going to be—I don’t know—consumed, destroyed, something.
And a giant is going to rise.
Was it Jason’s imagination, or did he shoot Khione an angry look? “Many horrible things are waking.
Even my children do nottell me all the news they should.
The Great Stirring of monsters that began with Kronos—your father Zeus foolishly believed it would end when the Titanswere defeated.
But just as it was before, so it is now.
The final battle is yet to come, and the one who will wake is more terrible than any Titan.
Stormspirits—these are only beginning.
The earth has many more horrors to yield up.
When monsters no longer stay in Tartarus, and souls are no longerconfined to Hades … Olympus has good reason to fear.
“I did not say that.
She had to be scared out of her mind, but she looked beautiful and confident—and it had nothing to do with theblessing of Aphrodite.
She looked herself again, in day-old traveling clothes with choppy hair and no makeup.
But she almost glowed with warmth in thatcold throne room.
“If you tell us where the storm spirits are, we can capture them and bring them to Aeolus.
You’d look good in front of your boss.
Aeolusmight pardon us and the other demigods.
We could even rescue Gleeson Hedge.
Everyone wins.
“I mean, she’s right.
“She’s a child of Aphrodite.
She dares to charmspeak a god? Freeze her now!”Boreas considered this.
Jason slipped his hand in his pocket and got ready to bring out the gold coin.
If things went wrong, he’d have to move fast.
“What is that on your forearm, demigod?”Jason hadn’t realized his coat sleeve had gotten pushed up, revealing the edge of his tattoo.
Reluctantly, he showed Boreas his marks.
Khione actually hissed and stepped away.
He laughed so loudly, an icicle cracked from the ceiling and crashed next to his throne.
The god’s formbegan to flicker.
His beard disappeared.
He grew taller and thinner, and his clothes changed into a Roman toga, lined with purple.
His head wascrowned with a frosty laurel wreath, and a gladius—a Roman sword like Jason’s—hung at his side.
“You recognize me better in this form, yes? And yet you said you came from Camp Half-Blood?”Jason shifted his feet.
“Uh … yes, Your Majesty.
“I understand now.
Oh, she plays a dangerous game.
Bold, but dangerous! Nowonder Olympus is closed.
They must be trembling at the gamble she has taken.
What’s going on?”“It’s his Roman form,” Jason said.
“But what’s going on—I don’t know.
“No, I’m sure you don’t.
This should be very interesting to watch.
If Hera’s plan fails, which I think it will, you will tear each other apart.
Aeolus will neverhave to worry about demigods again.
That sense ofwrongness which had bothered Jason since he got to Camp Half-Blood, and Chiron’s comment about his arrival being disastrous—Boreas knew whatthey meant.
No wonder she took your memory.
“You know, I have a reputation as a helpful wind god.
Unlike my brethren, I’ve been known to fall inlove with mortals.
Why, my sons Zethes and Calais started as demigods—”“Which explains why they are idiots,” Khione growled.
“Just because you were born a full goddess—”“Both of you, freeze,” Boreas ordered.
Apparently, that word carried a lot of weight in the household, because the two siblings went absolutely still.
I sit here in my palace, at the edgeof civilization, and so rarely have amusements.
Why, even that fool Notus, the South Wind, gets spring break in Cancún.
What do I get? A winter festivalwith naked Québécois rolling around in the snow!”“I like the winter festival,” Zethes muttered.
Oh, yes, I will let you go on this quest.
You will find your storm spirits in thewindy city, of course.
Chicago—”“Father!” Khione protested.
“If you can capture the winds, you may be able to gain safe entrance to the court of Aeolus.
If by some miracle yousucceed, be sure to tell him you captured the winds on my orders.
“So Chicago is where we’ll find this lady who’s controlling the winds? She’s the one who’s trapped Hera?”“Ah.
“Those are two different questions, son of Jupiter.
Before, he called me son of Zeus.
But she is only a servant—a servant who is very likely todestroy you.
If you succeed against her and take the winds, then you may go to Aeolus.
Only he has knowledge of all the winds on the earth.
All secretscome to his fortress eventually.
If anyone can tell you where Hera is imprisoned, it is Aeolus.
As for who you will meet when you finally find Hera’s cage—truly, if I told you that, you would beg me to freeze you.
“I am still master here, am I not?”The way Boreas glared at his daughter, it was obvious they had some ongoing argument.
Khione’s eyes flashed with anger, but she clenched herteeth.
“As you wish, Father.
Zethes, escort them out safely.
Leo looked cold but unharmed.
He’d even gotten cleaned up, and his clothes looked newlywashed, like he’d used the hotel’s valet service.
Festus the dragon was back in normal form, snorting fire over his scales to keep himself defrosted.
Leo started combing his hair back with his hands.
Uh-oh, Jasonthought.
He made a mental note to warn Leo about the snow goddess later.
She was not someone to get a crush on.
“You have fooled my father, girl.
But you have not fooled me.
We are not done.
And you, Jason Grace, Iwill see you as a statue in the throne room soon enough.
“You’re a spoiled kid.
See you around, ice princess.
For once, she seemed at a loss for words.
She stormed back up the stairs—literally.
Halfway up, she turned into ablizzard and disappeared.
“She never forgets an insult.
“Bad sister.
“What’s she going to do, throw snowballs at us?” But as he said it, Jason had a feeling Khione could do awhole lot worse.
“What happened up there? You made her mad? Is she mad at me too? Guys, that was my prom date!”“We’ll explain later,” Piper promised, but when she glanced at Jason, he realized she expected him to explain.
Boreas had turned into Aquilon, his Roman form, as if Jason’s presence caused him to goschizophrenic.
Cruelexcitement had danced in his eyes, as if he’d just placed a bet on a dogfight.
Aeolus will never have to worry about demigods again.
“Yeah,” he agreed, “we’ll explain later.
“The winds between here and Chicago are bad-tempered.
Many other evil things are stirring.
I am sorry you willnot be staying.
You would make a lovely ice statue, in which I could check my reflection.
“But I’d sooner play hockey with Cal.
“And the storm winds aren’t our worst problem, are they?”“Oh, no,” Zethes agreed.
“Something else.
Something worse.
The purple-winged Boreads shook their heads in unison.
The hangar doors opened onto a freezing starry night,and Festus the dragon stomped his feet, anxious to fly.
“He knows.
Good luck.
“Don’t get destroyed,” he said, which was probably the longest sentence he’d ever attempted.
“Next time—hockey.
He was anxious to get out of that cold penthouse, but he had a feeling it was the most hospitableplace they’d see for a while.
“Let’s go to Chicago and try not to get destroyed.
But all she could think about was the trouble ahead.
Evil things are stirring,Zethes had warned them.
Sheknew that firsthand.
The closer they got to the solstice, the less time Piper had to make her decision.
It wasn’t so amazing.
I owe you one.
There was no way Piper would’ve let that ice witch keep Jason.
What bothered Piper more was theway Boreas had changed form, and why he’d let them go.
It had something to do with Jason’s past, those tattoos on his arm.
Boreas assumed Jasonwas some sort of Roman, and Romans didn’t mix with Greeks.
She kept waiting for Jason to offer an explanation, but he clearly didn’t want to talk aboutit.
Obviously he was a demigod.
Of course hebelonged.
But now … what if he was something else? What if he really was an enemy? She couldn’t stand that idea any more than she could standKhione.
He’d been quiet ever since they’d told him what happened in the throne room.
“I still can’t believeKhione,” he said.
“She looked so nice.
“Snow may be pretty, but up close it’s cold and nasty.
We’ll find you a better prom date.
He hadn’t said much about his time in the palace, or why the Boreads had singled him out for smellinglike fire.
Piper got the feeling he was hiding something.
Whatever it was, his mood seemed to be affecting Festus, who grumbled and steamed as hetried to keep himself warm in the cold Canadian air.
Happy the Dragon was not so happy.
Piper had no idea how Leo had stocked up on supplies, but he’d even remembered to bring veggie rationsfor her.
The cheese and avocado sandwich was awesome.
Whatever they might find in Chicago, they all knew Boreas had only let them go because he figured they were already on a suicidemission.
Piper’s eyes started to feel heavy.
The encounter with Boreas and his children had scared her more thanshe wanted to admit.
Now that she had a full stomach, her adrenaline was fading.
Don’t be a wimp!Piper had been thinking about the coach ever since Boreas mentioned he was still alive.
She’d never liked Hedge, but he’d leaped off a cliff to saveLeo, and he’d sacrificed himself to protect them on the skywalk.
She now realized that all the times at school the coach had pushed her, yelled at her torun faster or do more push-ups, or even when he’d turned his back and let her fight her own battles with the mean girls, the old goat man had been tryingto help her in his own irritating way—trying to prepare her for life as a demigod.
Piper wondered what that was about, and if it explained why the coach was always so grumpy.
You’ve got bigger problems.
This trip won’t have a happy ending.
It was only a matter of time before her friends found out.
GrandpaTom had died years before, but Dad had kept his house in Oklahoma because it was where he grew up.
The first night had been so stifling hot—no air conditioning in the middle ofAugust—that Dad suggested they sleep outside.
Piper pointed out the constellations she’d been reading about—Hercules, Apollo’s lyre, Sagittarius the centaur.
In his old T-shirt and jeans he looked like just another guy from Tahlequah, Oklahoma, a Cherokee whomight’ve never left tribal lands.
“Your grandpa would say those Greek patterns are a bunch of bull.
He told me the stars were creatures with glowing fur,like magic hedgehogs.
Once, long ago, some hunters even captured a few in the forest.
They didn’t know what they’d done until nighttime, when the starcreatures began to glow.
Golden sparks flew from their fur, so the Cherokee released them back into the sky.
“I think Grandpa Tom was full of bull, too, just like the Greeks.
But it’s a big sky.
I suppose there’s room for Hercules andhedgehogs.
“Dad, why don’t you ever play Native American parts?”The week before, he’d turned down several million dollars to play Tonto in a remake of The Lone Ranger.
Piper was still trying to figure out why.
And, of course, he would always be known as the King of Sparta.
But if the part was Native American—it didn’t matter what kindof role it was—Dad turned it down.
“Too close to home, Pipes.
Easier to pretend I’m something I’m not.
All she saw were the stick figures she knew—Hercules running across thesky, on his way to kill monsters.
Dad was probably right.
The Greeks and the Cherokee were equally crazy.
The stars were just balls of fire.
“I think you know me too well, Pipes.
“I’m probably not.
She realized she’d been falling asleep on the dragon’s back.
How could her dad pretend to be somany things he wasn’t? She was trying to do that now, and it was tearing her apart.
She could dream of finding a way to save her father without betraying her friends—even if right nowa happy ending seemed about as likely as magic hedgehogs.
He didn’t complain.
As soon she closed her eyes, she drifted off to sleep.
The ghostly purple bonfire cast shadows across the trees.
Piper’s eyes stung from smoke, and theground was so warm, the soles of her boots felt sticky.
She looked around for any sign of herfather, but the pole where he’d been chained was no longer there.
“What’ve you done with him?”The giant’s laugh was like lava hissing down a volcano.
“His body is safe enough, though I fear the poor man’s mind can’t take much more of mycompany.
For some reason he finds me—disturbing.
You must hurry, girl, or I fear there will be little left of him to save.
“Take me instead.
He’s just a mortal!”“But, my dear,” the giant rumbled, “we must prove our love for our parents.
That’s what I’m doing.
Show me you value your father’s life by doing what Iask.
Who’s more important—your father, or a deceitful goddess who used you, toyed with your emotions, manipulated your memories, eh? What is Herato you?”Piper began to tremble.
So much anger and fear boiled inside her, she could hardly talk.
“You’re asking me to betray my friends.
Their quest is impossible.
Even if you succeeded, you heard the prophecy: unleashing Hera’s ragewould mean your destruction.
The only question now—will you die with your friends, or live with your father?”The bonfire roared.
Piper tried to step back, but her feet were heavy.
She realized the ground was pulling her down, clinging to her boots like wetsand.
When she looked up, a shower of purple sparks had spread across the sky, and the sun was rising in the east.
A patchwork of cities glowed in thevalley below, and far to the west, over a line of rolling hills, she saw a familiar landmark rising from a sea of fog.
“You’re revealing where you are.
“Lead your friends here instead of their true destination, and I will deal with them.
Or even better, arrangetheir deaths before you arrive.
I don’t care which.
Just be at the summit by noon on the solstice, and you may collect your father and go in peace.
“You can’t ask me—”“To betray that foolish boy Valdez, who always irritated you and is now hiding secrets from you? To give up a boyfriend you never really had? Is thatmore important than your own father?”“I’ll find a way to defeat you,” Piper said.
“I’ll save my father and my friends.
“I was once proud too.
I thought the gods could never defeat me.
Then they hurled a mountain on top of me,crushed me into the ground, where I struggled for eons, half-conscious in pain.
That taught me patience, girl.
It taught me not to act rashly.
Now I’veclawed my way back with the help of the waking earth.
I am only the first.
My brethren will follow.
We will not be denied our vengeance—not this time.
Andyou, Piper McLean, need a lesson in humility.
I’ll show you how easily your rebellious spirit can be brought to earth.
And Piper woke up screaming, free-falling through the air.
“Not coooooool!”She tried to call to him, but he was already too far below.
She fell spread-eagle like a skydiver, the wind underneath herlike a solid block of ice.
Then Jason was there, wrapping his arms around her waist.
But part of her also thought: Great.
Second time this week he’s hugged me, and both times it’s because I’m plummetingto my death.
“Hold on!”Piper locked her arms around him, and Jason shot toward the ground.
Piper probably screamed, but the sound was ripped from her mouth.
Hervision blurred.
“It’s me!”“My dragon!” Leo yelled.
“You gotta save Festus!”Jason was already struggling to keep the three of them aloft, and Piper knew there was no way he could help a fifty-ton metal dragon.
But before shecould try to reason with Leo, she heard an explosion below them.
A fireball rolled into the sky from behind a warehouse complex, and Leo sobbed,“Festus!”Jason’s face reddened with strain as he tried to maintain an air cushion beneath them, but intermittent slow-downs were the best he could manage.
They were still high enough so that hitting the ground would flatten them into roadkill—or skykill—whenJason groaned, “I can’t—”And they dropped like stones.
Her feet didn’t like that.
Pain flared in her left ankle as she crumpled against a cold metal surface.
“Piper! Where’s Piper?”“Ow, bro!” Leo groaned.
“That’s my back! I’m not a sofa! Piper, where’d you go?”“Here,” she managed, her voice a whimper.
She was on a metal catwalk that ringed the warehouse interior.
Leo and Jason had landed on ground level, and were nowcoming up the stairs toward her.
She looked at her foot, and wave of nausea swept over her.
Her toes weren’t supposed to point that way, were they?Oh, god.
She forced herself to look away before she threw up.
Focus on something else.
Anything else.
How they’d even survived that drop, she had no idea.
Hanging from theceiling, a few electric bulbs flickered dimly, but they didn’t do much to light the enormous space.
Next to Piper, the corrugated metal wall was emblazonedwith a company logo, but it was almost completely spray-painted over with graffiti.
Down in the shadowy warehouse, she could make out huge machines,robotic arms, half-finished trucks on an assembly line.
The place looked like it had been abandoned for years.
“Oh no, you’re not.
“Leo, you got any first aid supplies?”“Yeah—yeah, sure.
Piper had noticed the tool belt yesterday morning, but she hadn’t thought to ask Leo about it.
It didn’t look like anything special—just one ofthose wraparound leather aprons with a bunch of pockets, like a blacksmith or a carpenter might wear.
And it seemed to be empty.
“How did pull that stuff from an empty belt?”“Magic,” Leo said.
“Haven’t figure it out completely, but I can summon just about any regular tool out of the pockets, plus some other helpful stuff.
“Breath mint?”Jason snatched away the mints.
“That’s great, Leo.
Now, can you fix her foot?”“I’m a mechanic, man.
Maybe if she was a car …” He snapped his fingers.
“Wait, what was that godly healing stuffthey fed you at camp—Rambofood?”“Ambrosia, dummy,” Piper said through gritted teeth.
“There should be some in my bag, if it’s not crushed.
He rummaged through the supplies the Aphrodite kids had packed for her, and found a Ziplocfull of smashed pastry squares like lemon bars.
He broke off a piece and fed it to her.
It reminded her of Dad’s black bean soup from when she was a little girl.
He used to feed it to herwhenever she got sick.
The memory relaxed her, though it made her sad.
The pain in her ankle subsided.
“Piper, we shouldn’t risk it.
They said too much could burn you up.
I think I should try to set your foot.
“Have you ever done that before?”“Yeah … I think so.
Then he got the gauze and duct tape ready.
“Piper, this is going to hurt.
When her vision cleared andshe could breathe normally again, she found that her foot was pointing the right way, her ankle splinted with plywood, gauze, and duct tape.
“Glad my face wasn’t there.
“And don’t call me ‘beauty queen,’ or I’ll punch you again.
After a few minutes, her stomach began to calm down.
Snowflakes fluttered through the hole in the roof, and after theirmeeting with Khione, snow was the last thing Piper wanted to see.
“Where are we?”Leo’s expression turned sullen.
“I don’t know with Festus.
He just jerked sideways like he hit an invisible wall and started to fall.
Had he managed to strike themdown from so far away? It seemed impossible.
If he were that powerful, why would he need her to betray her friends when he could just kill them himself?And how could the giant be keeping an eye on her in a snowstorm thousands of miles away?Leo pointed to the logo on the wall.
“As far as where we are …” It was hard to see through the graffiti, but Piper could make out a large red eye withthe stenciled words: monocle motors, assembly plant 1.
“I’m guessing we crash-landed in Detroit.
But it seemed like a pretty depressing place to land.
“How far is that fromChicago?”Jason handed her the canteen.
“Maybe three-fourths of the way from Quebec? The thing is, without the dragon, we’re stuck traveling overland.
“It isn’t safe.
Besides, I don’t know if I can walk.
And three people—Jason, you can’t fly that many across country by yourself.
“Leo, are you sure the dragon didn’t malfunction? I mean, Festus is old, and—”“And I might not have repaired him right?”“I didn’t say that,” Jason protested.
“It’s just—maybe you could fix it.
He pulled a few screws out of his pockets and started fiddling with them.
“I’d have to find where he landed, ifhe’s even in one piece.
She just couldn’t stand it anymore.
The secret about her father was heating up inside her like too muchambrosia.
If she kept lying to her friends, she felt like she’d burn to ashes.
It couldn’t be your fault.
He didn’t even try to make a joke at her expense.
“You’re in pain.
Just rest.
They were both being so kind to her.
Yet if Enceladus was watching hersomehow, saying the wrong thing could get her father killed.
“Look, um, Jason, why don’t you stay with her, bro? I’ll scout around for Festus.
I think he fell outside the warehouse somewhere.
If I canfind him, maybe I can figure out what happened and fix him.
“You shouldn’t go by yourself.
I’ll be fine,” Leo said, a little too quickly, and Piper realized he was a lot more shaken up than he was letting on.
It was the exact expression he’d had on his face after he’d kissed her the first time, up onthe Wilderness School dorm roof—that cute little scar on his lip curving into a crescent.
The memory gave her a warm feeling.
Then she rememberedthat the kiss had never really happened.
Her jeans were tattered from the fall through the roof.
She didn’t know what her face looked like, but probably horrible.
She wondered if it was her stupid mother, the goddess of love, messing with herthoughts.
If Piper started getting urges to read fashion magazines, she was going to have to find Aphrodite and smack her.
As long as she didn’t move it, the pain wasn’t bad.
“You did a good job,” she told Jason.
“Where’d youlearn first aid?”He shrugged.
“Same answer as always.
I don’t know.
“Like déjà vu.
Ever forgotten a word or a name, and you know it should be on the tip of your tongue, but it isn’t? It’s like that—onlywith my whole life.
The last three months—a life she thought she’d had, a relationship with Jason—had turned out to be Mist.
Is that more important than your own father?She should’ve kept her mouth shut, but she voiced the question that had been on her mind since yesterday.
“Is that someone from your past?”Jason pulled back.
“None of my business.
Forget it.
“Just, I’m trying to figure things out.
Her name’s Thalia.
She’s my sister.
I don’t remember any details.
I’m noteven sure how I know, but—um, why are you smiling?”“Nothing.
Not an old girlfriend.
She felt ridiculously happy.
“Um, it’s just—that’s great you remembered.
Annabeth told meshe became a Hunter of Artemis, right?”Jason nodded.
“I get the feeling I’m supposed to find her.
Hera left me that memory for a reason.
It’s got something to do with this quest.
But … I alsohave the feeling it could be dangerous.
I’m not sure I want to find out the truth.
Is that crazy?”“No,” Piper said.
“Not at all.
Something about that logo bothered her.
She had to save him, but how could she betray her friends?“Jason,” she said.
“Speaking of the truth, I need to tell you something—something about my dad—”She didn’t get the chance.
Somewhere below, metal clanged against metal, like a door slamming shut.
The sound echoed through the warehouse.
He took out his coin and flipped it, snatching his golden sword out of the air.
He peered over the railing.
“Leo?” he called.
“I don’t like this.
“Go check.
She drew her dagger Katoptris and tried to look confident.
“Anyone gets close, I’llskewer them.
“I’ll leave you the pack.
If I’m not back in five minutes—”“Panic?” she suggested.
“Glad you’re back to normal.
The makeup and the dress were a lot more intimidating than the dagger.
It wasn’t fair.
Then he made his way to the stairs and disappeared into the dark.
She lost track at around forty-three.
Then something in the warehouse wentbang!The echo died.
Piper’s heart pounded, but she didn’t call out.
Her instincts told her it might not be a good idea.
It’s not like I can run.
Then she looked up again at the Monocle Motors sign.
A little voice in her head pestered her,warning of danger.
Something from Greek mythology …Her hand went to her backpack.
She took out the ambrosia squares.
Too much would burn her up, but would a little more fix her ankle?Boom.
The sound was closer this time, directly below her.
She dug out a whole square of ambrosia and stuffed it in her mouth.
Her heart racedfaster.
Her skin felt feverish.
No pain, no stiffness at all.
She cut through the duct tape with her dagger and heard heavy steps onthe stairs—like metal boots.
Finally she couldn’t stand it.
Gripping herdagger, she called out, “Jason?”“Yeah,” he said from the darkness.
“On my way up.
So why did all her instincts say Run?With effort, she got to her feet.
“You’re just in time for dinner.
A dozen of the blue plastic boxes had been set up in thefactory yard, and Festus had flattened them all.
Fortunately, they hadn’t been used in a long time, and the fireball from the crash incinerated most of thecontents; but still, there were some pretty gross chemicals leaking out of the wreckage.
Leo had to pick his way through and try not to breathe through hisnose.
Heavy snow was coming down, but the dragon’s hide was still steaming hot.
Of course, that didn’t bother Leo.
The dragon looked perfectly fine.
Yes, it had fallen out of thesky and landed with a big ka-boom, but its body wasn’t even dented.
The fireball had apparently come from built up gasses inside the toilet units, notfrom the dragon itself.
Festus’s wings were intact.
Nothing seemed broken.
There was no reason it should have stopped.
“Festus, you’re making me look bad.
“Oh, Festus, what the heck?”The wiring had frozen over.
Leo knew it had been okay yesterday.
He’d worked so hard to repair the corroded lines, but something had caused aflash freeze inside the dragon’s skull, where it should’ve been too hot for ice to form.
The ice had caused the wiring to overload and char the control disk.
Sure, the dragon was old, but still, it didn’t make sense.
That wasn’t the problem.
But the charred control disk was not good.
The Greek letters and pictures carved around theedges, which probably held all kinds of magic, were blurred and blackened.
Again.
Nothing is unfixable.
He wasn’t walking from Detroit to Chicago in a snowstorm, and he wasn’t going to be responsiblefor stranding his friends.
Leo couldn’t help smiling as he pulled out the supplies.
The belt’s pockets did have limits.
They wouldn’t give him anythingmagic, like Jason’s sword, or anything huge, like a chain saw.
He’d tried asking for both.
And if he asked for too many things at once, the belt needed acooldown time before it could work again.
The more complicated the request, the longer the cooldown.
But anything small and simple like you might findaround a workshop—all Leo had to do was ask.
While he worked, snow collected on the cooling dragon.
Leo had to stop from time to time to summon fireand melt it away, but mostly he went into autopilot mode, his hands working by themselves as his thoughts wandered.
He should’ve figured a family of winter gods would hate him on sight.
Son ofthe fire god flying a fire-breathing dragon into an ice penthouse—yeah, maybe not the best move.
Still, he hated feeling like a reject.
Jason and Piper gotto visit the throne room.
Leo got to wait in the lobby with Cal, the demigod of hockey and major head injuries.
Leo knew he couldn’t keep the truth from his friends much longer.
Ever since Camp Half-Blood, one line of that GreatProphecy kept coming back to him: To storm or fire the world must fall.
If he told his friends what he could really do—Hey, guess what,guys? I might destroy the world!—why would anyone welcome him back at camp? Leo would have to go on the run again.
Even though he knew that drill,the idea depressed him.
Dang, that girl was fine.
Leo knew he’d acted like a total fool, but he couldn’t help himself.
He’d had his clothes cleaned withthe one-hour valet service —which had been totally sweet, by the way.
He’d combed his hair—never an easy job—and even discovered the tool bagcould make breath mints, all in hopes that he could get close to her.
Naturally, no such luck.
Even at Wilderness School, Leo had spent the last few weeksfeeling like a third wheel as Jason and Piper, his only friends, became a couple.
He was happy for them and all, but still it made him feel like they didn’tneed him anymore.
It was achance for a reset.
Now Jason and Piper were heading toward being a couple again—that was obvious from the way they’d acted in the warehouse justnow, like they wanted to talk in private without Leo around.
What had he expected? He’d wind up the odd man out again.
Khione had just given him thecold shoulder a little quicker than most.
“Nobody’s going to play any violins for you just because you’re not important.
Fix the stupid dragon.
He stood, but he couldn’t see who’d spoken.
Then he looked at the ground.
Snow andchemical sludge from the toilets, even the asphalt itself was shifting like it was turning to liquid.
A ten-foot-wide area formed eyes, a nose, and a mouth—the giant face of a sleeping woman.
Her lips didn’t move.
But Leo could hear her voice in his head, as if the vibrations were coming through the ground, straightinto his feet and resonating up his skeleton.
In some ways, you are the most important of the seven—like the control disk in the dragon’s brain.
They will never reach me, never stop me.
And I will fully wake.
He hadn’t heard that voice since he was eight, but it was her: the earthen womanfrom the machine shop.
“You killed my mom.
The mouth formed a sleepy smile like it was having a pleasant dream.
Ah, but Leo.
I am your mother too—the First Mother.
Donot oppose me.
Walk away now.
Let my son Porphyrion rise and become king, and I will ease your burdens.
You will tread lightly on the earth.
“Leave me alone!”The toilet seat sank into the liquid earth.
Snow and sludge rippled, and the face dissolved.
But it didn’t.
Leo wanted to think he’d imagined it.
Metal crumpled and groaned, and the noiseechoed across the yard.
Instantly Leo knew that Jason and Piper were in trouble.
“Gimme the biggest hammer you got.
Then he jumped off thedragon’s back and ran toward the warehouse.
The voice of the earth woman still rang in his ears, reminding him of his mother’s death.
Thelast thing he wanted to do was plunge into another dark warehouse.
Suddenly he felt eight years old again, alone and helpless as someone he caredabout was trapped and in trouble.
That’s how she wants you to feel.
He took a deep breath and peered inside.
Nothing looked different.
Gray morning light filtered through thehole in the roof.
A few lightbulbs flickered, but most of the factory floor was still lost in shadows.
He could make out the catwalk above, the dim shapes ofheavy machinery along the assembly line, but no movement.
No sign of his friends.
Then he realized it was smell.
Something smelled wrong—likeburning motor oil and sour breath.
Leo was certain.
His body shifted into high gear, all his nerves tingling.
How could Piper have gotten offthe catwalk with her broken ankle?He slipped inside and ducked behind a cargo container.
Slowly, gripping his hammer, he worked his way toward the center of the room, hidingbehind boxes and hollow truck chassis.
Finally he reached the assembly line.
He crouched behind the nearest piece of machinery—a crane with arobotic arm.
Hanging directly above the assembly line, suspended by a chain from a crane on the opposite side, was amassive truck engine—just dangling thirty feet up, as if it had been left there when the factory was abandoned.
Below it on the conveyor belt sat a truckchassis, and clustered around it were three dark shapes the size of forklifts.
Nearby, dangling from chains on two other robotic arms, were two smallershapes—maybe more engines, but one of them was twisting around as if it were alive.
“Told you it was nothing,” the thing rumbled.
Its voice wastoo deep and feral to be human.
“Bah, there’s nobody out there.
No demigod could be that quiet, eh?”The first monster chuckled.
“Probably ran away, if he knows what’s good for him.
Or the girl was lying about a third demigod.
Let’s get cooking.
A bright orange light sizzled to life—an emergency flare—and Leo was temporarily blinded.
He ducked behind the crane until the spotscleared from his eyes.
Then he took another peep and saw a nightmare scene even Tía Callida couldn’t have dreamed up.
They were Jason and Piper.
Both hung upside down, tied by their ankles andcocooned with chains up to their necks.
Piper was flailing around, trying to free herself.
Her mouth was gagged, but at least she was alive.
Jason didn’tlook so good.
He hung limply, his eyes rolled up in his head.
A red welt the size of an apple had swollen over his left eyebrow.
The emergency flare had ignited a mixture of tires andwood, which, from the smell of it, had been doused in kerosene.
A big metal pole was suspended over the flames—a spit, Leo realized, which meant thiswas a cooking fire.
Why hadn’t Leo realized?Three massive humanoids gathered around the fire.
Two were standing, stoking the flames.
The largest one crouched with his back to Leo.
The twofacing him were each ten feet tall, with hairy muscular bodies and skin that glowed red in the firelight.
One of the monsters wore a chain mail loincloth thatlooked really uncomfortable.
The other wore a ragged fuzzy toga made of fiberglass insulation, which also would not have made Leo’s top ten wardrobeideas.
Other than that, the two monsters could’ve been twins.
Each had a brutish face with a single eye in the center of his forehead.
The cooks wereCyclopes.
He’d seen some weird things so far—storm spirits and winged gods and a metal dragon that liked Tabasco sauce.
Butthis was different.
These were actual, flesh-and-blood, ten-foot-tall living monsters who wanted to eat his friends for dinner.
If only he had Festus.
He could use a fire-breathing sixty-foot-long tank about now.
But all he had was a toolbelt and a backpack.
His three-pound club hammer looked awfully small compared to those Cyclopes.
She wanted Leo to walk away and leave his friends to die.
No way was Leo going to let that earth lady make him feel powerless—never again.
Leo slipped offhis backpack and quietly startedto unzip it.
“Can I take her gag off now? I like itwhen they scream.
The crouching figure grunted, and Loincloth ripped the gag off Piper’s mouth.
She took a shaky breath like she was trying to keep herself calm.
At least he hoped that’s what theywere.
The robotic crane’s maintenance panel was easy to find.
He slipped a screwdriver from his tool belt and went to work, but he had to go slowly.
Theleader Cyclops was only twenty feet in front of him.
The monsters obviously had excellent senses.
Pulling off his plan without making noise seemedimpossible, but he didn’t have much choice.
His buddy Loinclothglowered at Piper, waiting for her to do something entertaining.
“Scream, girl! I like funny screaming!”When Piper finally spoke, her tone was calm and reasonable, like she was correcting a naughty puppy.
“Oh, Mr.
Cyclops, you don’t want to kill us.
Itwould be much better if you let us go.
He turned to his friend in the fiberglass toga.
“She’s kind of pretty, Torque.
Maybe I should let her go.
“I saw her first, Sump.
I’ll let her go!” Sump and Torque started to argue, but the third Cyclops rose andshouted, “Fools!”Leo almost dropped his screwdriver.
The third Cyclops was a female.
She was several feet taller than Torque or Sump, and even beefier.
She worea tent of chain mail cut like one of those sack dresses Leo’s mean Aunt Rosa used to wear.
What’d they call that—a muumuu? Yeah, the Cyclops ladyhad a chain mail muumuu.
Her greasy black hair was matted in pigtails, woven with copper wires and metal washers.
Her nose and mouth were thickand smashed together, like she spent her free time ramming her face into walls; but her single red eye glittered with evil intelligence.
Torque backed up quickly.
“She’s using charmspeak on you.
“Don’t try your pretty talk on me, girl! I’m Ma Gasket! I’ve eaten heroes tougher than you forlunch!”Leo feared Piper would get crushed, but Ma Gasket just dropped her and let her dangle from her chain.
Then she started yelling at Sump about howstupid he was.
He twisted wires and turned switches, hardly thinking about what he was doing.
He finished attaching the remote.
If so, ugly definitely ran in the family.
“I should’ve thrown you out onthe streets when you were babies, like proper Cyclops children.
You might have learned some useful skills.
Curse my soft heart that I kept you!”“Soft heart?” Torque muttered.
I said you got a soft heart.
We get to work for you, feed you, file your toenails—”“And you should be grateful!” Ma Gasket bellowed.
“Now, stoke the fire, Torque! And Sump, you idiot, my case of salsa is in the other warehouse.
“I mean no, Ma.
I mean—”“Go get it!” Ma Gasket picked up a nearby truck chassis and slammed it over Sump’s head.
Sump crumpled to his knees.
Leo was sure a hit likethat would kill him, but Sump apparently got hit by trucks a lot.
He managed to push the chassis off his head.
Then he staggered to his feet and ran offtofetch the salsa.
While they’re separated.
As he dashed between robotic arms, the Cyclopes didn’t see him, but Piper did.
“What’s the matter, girl? So fragile I broke you?”Thankfully, Piper was a quick thinker.
She looked away from Leo and said, “I think it’s my ribs, ma’am.
If I’m busted up inside, I’ll taste terrible.
“Good one.
The last hero we ate—remember him, Torque? Son of Mercury, wasn’t he?”“Yes, Ma,” Torque said.
“Tasty.
Little bit stringy.
Said he was on medication.
But he tasted fine!”“Tasted like mutton,” Torque recalled.
“Purple shirt.
Talked in Latin.
Yes, a bit stringy, but good.
Apparently, Piper was having the same thought he was, because she asked, “Purple shirt? Latin?”“Good eating,” Ma Gasket said fondly.
“Point is, girl, we’re not as dumb as people think! We’re not falling for those stupid tricks and riddles, not usnorthern Cyclopes.
A kid who spoke Latin had been caught here—in a purple shirt like Jason’s? He didn’tknow what that meant, but he had to leave the interrogation to Piper.
If he was going to have any chance of defeating these monsters, he had to movefast before Sump came back with the salsa.
He wished he could use that—it would make a great weapon.
Butthe crane holding it was on the opposite side of the conveyor belt.
There was no way Leo could get over there without being seen, and besides, he wasrunning short on time.
From his tool belt he summoned some wires, a radio adapter, and a smaller screwdriver and started tobuild a universal remote.
For the first time, he said a silent thank-you to his dad—Hephaestus—for the magic tool belt.
Get me out of here, he prayed,and maybe you’re not such a jerk.
“Oh, I’ve heard about the northern Cyclopes!” Which Leo figured was bull, but she sounded convincing.
“Inever knew you were so big and clever!”“Flattery won’t work either,” Ma Gasket said, though she sounded pleased.
“It’s true, you’ll be breakfast for the best Cyclopes around.
“I thought you made weapons for the gods.
Good at eating people.
Good at smashing.
And good at building things, yes, but not for the gods.
Our cousins, the elderCyclopes, they do this, yes.
Thinking they’re so high and mighty ’cause they’re a few thousand years older.
Then there’s our southern cousins, living onislands and tending sheep.
Morons! But we Hyperborean Cyclopes, the northern clan, we’re the best! Founded Monocle Motors in this old factory—thebest weapons, armor, chariots, fuel-efficient SUVs! And yet—bah! Forced to shut down.
Laid off most of our tribe.
The war was too quick.
Titans lost.
Nogood! No more need for Cyclops weapons.
“I’m sure you made some amazing weapons.
“Squeaky war hammer!” He picked up a large pole with an accordion-looking metal box on the end.
“Not as good as the exploding ax, but this one can be used more than once.
“If you could just free my hands—”Torque stepped forward eagerly, but Ma Gasket said, “Stupid! She’s tricking you again.
Enough talk! Slay the boy first before he dies on his own.
Ilike my meat fresh.
Just a few more minutes!“Hey, wait,” Piper said, trying to get the Cyclopes’ attention.
“Hey, can I just ask—”The wires sparked in Leo’s hand.
The Cyclopes froze and turned in his direction.
Then Torque picked up a truck and threw it at him.
If he’d been a half-second slower, he would’ve been smashed.
She yelled, “Torque, you pathetic excuse for a Cyclops, get him!”Torque barreled toward him.
Leo frantically gunned the toggle on his makeshift remote.
Twenty feet.
A three-ton yellow metal claw slammed the Cyclops in the back so hard, he landed flat on his face.
BeforeTorque could recover, the robotic hand grabbed him by one leg and hurled him straight up.
The ceiling was too dark and too high up to see exactly what happened, but judging from the harshmetal clang, Leo guessed the Cyclops had hit one of the support girders.
Instead, yellow dust rained to the floor.
Torque had disintegrated.
“My son … You … You …”As if on cue, Sump lumbered into the firelight with a case of salsa.
“Ma, I got the extra-spicy—”He never finished his sentence.
Leo spun the remote’s toggle, and the second robotic arm whacked Sump in the chest.
The salsa case explodedlike a piñata and Sump flew backward, right into the base of Leo’s third machine.
Sump may have been immune to getting hit with truck chasses, but hewasn’t immune to robotic arms that could deliver ten thousand pounds of force.
The third crane arm slammed him against the floor so hard, he explodedinto dust like a broken flour sack.
Leo was beginning to feel like Commander Tool Belt when Ma Gasket locked her eye on him.
She grabbed the nearest cranearm and ripped it off its pedestal with a savage roar.
“You busted my boys! Only I get to bust my boys!”Leo punched a button, and the two remaining arms swung into action.
Ma Gasket caught the first one and tore it in half.
The second arm smackedher in the head, but that only seemed to make her mad.
She grabbed it by the clamps, ripped it free, and swung it like a baseball bat.
It missed Piper andJason by an inch.
Then Ma Gasket let it go—spinning it toward Leo.
He yelped and rolled to one side as it demolished the machine next to him.
The future forCommander Tool Belt was not looking so hot.
Her fists were clenched, her teeth bared.
She looked ridiculous in her chain mailmuumuu and her greasy pigtails—but given the murderous glare in her huge red eye and the fact that she was twelve feet tall, Leo wasn’t laughing.
The engine block suspended on the chain—if only he’d had time to rig it.
If only he could get Ma Gasket to take one step forward.
“Take one more step, and I’ll destroy you with fire!”Ma Gasket laughed.
“Would you? Cyclopes are immune to fire, you idiot.
But if you wish to play with flames, let me help!”She scooped red-hot coals into her bare hands and flung them at Leo.
They landed all around his feet.
Then Ma Gasket grinned and picked up a barrel next to the truck.
Leo just had time to read the stenciled wordon the side—kerosene —before Ma Gasket threw it.
The barrel split on the floor in front of him, spilling lighter fluid everywhere.
Leo closed his eyes, and Piper screamed, “No!”A firestorm erupted around him.
When Leo opened his eyes he was bathed in flames swirling twenty feet into the air.
The kerosene burned off, dying down to small fiery patches on the floor.
“Leo?”Ma Gasket looked astonished.
“You live?” Then she took that extra step forward, which put her right where Leo wanted.
“What are you?”“The son of Hephaestus,” Leo said.
“And I warned you I’d destroy you with fire.
He’d never tried to do anything so focused and intense—but he shot a bolt of white-hotflames at the chain suspending the engine block above the Cyclops’s head—aiming for the link that looked weaker than rest.
Nothing happened.
Ma Gasket laughed.
“An impressive try, son of Hephaestus.
It’s been many centuries since I saw a fire user.
“Boo-yah!”Then he fell to his knees, his head buzzing.
After a few minutes he realized Piper was calling his name.
He’d never tried to summon such an intense fire before, and it had left him completely drained.
Then together they lowered Jason, who was still unconscious.
Piper managed to trickle alittle nectar into his mouth, and he groaned.
The welt on his head started to shrink.
His color came back a little.
“I think he’s gonna be fine.
Then she looked at Leo with something like fear.
“How did you—the fire—have you always … ?”Leo looked down.
“Always,” he said.
“I’m a freaking menace.
Sorry, I should’ve told you guys sooner but—”“Sorry?” Piper punched his arm.
When he looked up, she was grinning.
“That was amazing, Valdez! You saved our lives.
What are you sorry about?”Leo blinked.
He started to smile, but his sense of relief was ruined when he noticed something next to Piper’s foot.
“Look.
“That’s not possible.
Annabeth told me monsters dissipate when they’re killed.
They go back to Tartarus and can’treturn for a long time.
“Boreas said something about this—the earth yielding up horrors.
‘When monsters no longer stay in Tartarus, and soulsare no longer confined to Hades.
“But we need to get out of here.
Everything hurt—his arms, his legs, his chest, his head.
Especiallyhis head.
It felt like an overinflated water balloon.
“It is not your time.
Come, speak with me.
He heard monsters yelling, his friends screaming, fiery explosions, but it all seemed to be happeningon another plane of existence —getting farther and farther away.
Tendrils of tree roots and stone whirled together, confining him.
Outside the bars, he could see thefloor of a dry reflecting pool, another earthen spire growing at the far end, and above them, the ruined red stones of a burned-out house.
She pushed aside her veil, revealing a face thatwas proud and beautiful—but also hardened with suffering.
“You will not die today, Jason.
Your friends will see you through—for now.
“There are worse trials to come.
The very earth stirs against us.
“Why can’t you just escape?”Hera smiled sadly.
Her form began to glow, until her brilliance filled the cage with painful light.
The air hummed with power, molecules splitting apartlike a nuclear explosion.
Jason suspected if he were actually there in the flesh, he would’ve been vaporized.
The ground should’ve split and the ruined house should’ve been leveled.
But when the glow died, thecage hadn’t budged.
Nothing outside the bars had changed.
Only Hera looked different—a little more stooped and tired.
“I am not easily contained.
I can be in many places at once.
But when the greater part ofmy essence is caught, it is like a foot in a bear trap, you might say.
I can’t escape, and I am concealed from the eyes of the other gods.
Only you can findme, and I grow weaker by the day.
“How were you caught?”The goddess sighed.
“I could not stay idle.
Your father Jupiter believes he can withdraw from the world, and thus lull our enemies back to sleep.
Hebelieves we Olympians have become too involved in the affairs of mortals, in the fates of our demigod children, especially since we agreed to claimthem all after the war.
He believes this is what has caused our enemies to stir.
That is why he closed Olympus.
“Often I do not understand my husband’s moods or his decisions, but even for Zeus, this seemed paranoid.
I cannot fathom why hewas so insistent and so convinced.
It was … unlike him.
As Hera, I might have been content to follow my lord’s wishes.
But I am also Juno.
“JunoMoneta they once called me—Juno, the One Who Warns.
I was guardian of the state, patron of Eternal Rome.
I could not sit by while the descendants ofmy people were attacked.
I sensed danger at this sacred spot.
A voice—” She hesitated.
“A voice told me I should come here.
Gods do not have whatyou might call a conscience, nor do we have dreams; but the voice was like that—soft and persistent, warning me to come here.
And so the same dayZeus closed Olympus, I slipped away without telling him my plans, so he could not stop me.
And I came here to investigate.
“Only too late did I realize how quickly the earth was stirring.
I was even more foolish than Jupiter—a slave to my ownimpulses.
This is exactly how it happened the first time.
I was taken captive by the giants, and my imprisonment started a war.
Now our enemies riseagain.
The gods can only defeat them with the help of the greatest living heroes.
And the one whom the giants serve …she cannot be defeated at all—only kept asleep.
Hera’s form shivered like a candle flame in the breeze.
Outside the cage, Jason could seeshapes gathering at the edge of the pool—lumbering humanoids with hunched backs and bald heads.
Unless Jason’s eyes were tricking him—they hadmore than one set of arms.
He heard wolves too, but not the wolves he’d seen with Lupa.
He could tell from their howls this was a different pack—hungrier, more aggressive, out for blood.
“My keepers approach, and you begin to wake.
I will not be strong enough to appear to you again, even in dreams.
“Boreas told us you’d made a dangerous gamble.
What did he mean?”Hera’s eyes looked wild, and Jason wondered if she really had done something crazy.
“The only way to bring peace.
The enemy counts on our divisions, and if we are divided, we will be destroyed.
You are mypeace offering, Jason—a bridge to overcome millennia of hatred.
“You have only lived this long because I have taken your memory.
Find this place.
Your sister will help.
“Good-bye, Jason.
Beware Chicago.
Your most dangerous mortal enemy waits there.
If you are to die, it will be by herhand.
“Cyclops!”“Whoa, sleepyhead.
Leo sat in front, driving.
They flewpeacefully through the winter sky as if nothing had happened.
“Didn’t we crash-land? I thought—”“It’s okay,” Leo said.
“We got away, but you got a nasty concussion.
How you feeling?”Jason’s head throbbed.
He remembered the factory, then walking down the catwalk, then a creature looming over him—a face with one eye, amassive fist—and everything went black.
“He was amazing.
He can summon fire—”“It was nothing,” Leo said quickly.
“Shut up, Valdez.
I’m going to tell him.
Get over it.
Taking out three Cyclopes with nothing but a tool kit? Not bad.
It didn’t exactly scare him to hear how close he’d come todeath, but it did make him feel horrible.
He’d stepped right into an ambush and spent the whole fight knocked out while his friends fended for themselves.
A son of Mercury … Jason felt like he should know that kid, but the name was missing from his mind.
“There are others like me.
You’ve got us.
I was having a dream…”He told them what he’d seen, and what the goddess had said inside her cage.
“What does that mean?”Jason shook his head.
“But Hera’s gamble is me.
Just by sending me to Camp Half-Blood, I have a feeling she broke some kind of rule, somethingthat could blow up in a big way—”“Or save us,” Piper said hopefully.
“That bit about the sleeping enemy—that sounds like the lady Leo told us about.
“About that … she kind of appeared to me back in Detroit, in a pool of Porta-Potty sludge.
“Did you say … Porta-Potty?”Leo told them about the big face in the factory yard.
“I don’t know if she’s completely unkillable,” he said, “but she cannot be defeated by toilet seats.
She wanted me to betray you guys, and I was like, ‘Pfft, right, I’m gonna listen to a face in the potty sludge.
He could sense her tension without even looking at her.
“That’s one of the giants.
Just one of the names I could remember.
She’d had a rough morning.
“Well, I dunno about Enchiladas—”“Enceladus,” Piper corrected.
But Old Potty Face mentioned another name.
Porpoise Fear, or something?”“Porphyrion?” Piper asked.
“He was the giant king, I think.
“I’m going to take wild guess,” he said.
“In the oldstories, Porphyrion kidnapped Hera.
That was the first shot in the war between the giants and the gods.
“But those myths are really garbled and conflicted.
It’s almost like nobody wanted that story to survive.
I just rememberthere was a war, and the giants were almost impossible to kill.
“That’s what Hera told me.
He wasn’t sure how much time passed before the dragon dove through abreak in the clouds, and below them, glittering in the winter sun, was a city at the edge of a massive lake.
A crescent of skyscrapers lined the shore.
His worst mortal enemy would be waiting here.
If he was going to die, it would be by her hand.
“We got here alive.
Now, how do we find the storm spirits?”Jason saw a flash of movement below them.
At first he thought it was a small plane, but it was too small, too dark and fast.
The thing spiraled towardthe skyscrapers, weaving and changing shape—and, just for a moment it became the smoky figure of a horse.
Bronze dragon ain’t exactly a stealth plane.
Festus tried to follow, but his wingspan was way too wide.
His left wing clipped the edge of abuilding, slicing off a stone gargoyle before Leo pulled up.
“We’ll track him from there.
“There’re two.
A second ventus blasted around the corner of the Renaissance Hotel and linked up with the first.
They wove together in a chaoticdance, shooting to the top of a skyscraper, bending a radio tower, and diving back down toward the street.
“Nobody’s going to question a couple more evil winds.
“Look.
Storm spirits were converging—at least a dozen of them, whirling around a bigpublic art installation.
“I wanna throw something at him.
The closer they got to it, the faster his heart beat.
It was just a public fountain, but it was unpleasantlyfamiliar.
Two five-story monoliths rose from either end of a long granite reflecting pool.
The monoliths seemed to be built of video screens, flashing thecombined image of a giant face that spewed water into the pool.
As Jason watched, the image on the screens changed to a woman’s face with her eyes closed.
“I don’t like her, but I see her.
The venti swirled together into a single funnel cloud and skittered across the fountain, kicking up a waterspout almostas high as the monoliths.
They got to its center, popped off a drain cover, and disappeared underground.
“How are we supposed to follow them?”“Maybe we shouldn’t,” Leo said.
“That fountain thing is giving me seriously bad vibes.
And aren’t we supposed to, like, beware the earth?”Jason felt the same way, but they had to follow.
It was their only way forward.
They had to find Hera, and they now had only two days until the solstice.
“We’ll check it out on foot.
The signs said Grant Park, and Jason imagined it would’ve been a nice place in thesummer; but now it was a field of ice, snow, and salted walkways.
The dragon’s hot metal feet hissed as they touched down.
Festus flapped his wingsunhappily and shot fire into the sky, but there was no one around to notice.
The wind coming off the lake was bitter cold.
Anyone with sense would beinside.
Jason’s eyes stung so badly, he could barely see.
One of his ruby eyes flickered, so it looked like he was blinking.
He whacked the dragon’s bad eye, and the light went back to normal.
“Yes,” Leo said.
“Festus can’thang around here, though, in the middle of the park.
They’ll arrest him for loitering.
Maybe if I had a dog whistle …”He rummaged in his tool belt, but came up with nothing.
“Okay, give me a safety whistle.
They got that in lots of machine shops.
“Coach Hedge would be jealous! Okay, Festus, listen.
The shrill soundprobably rolled all the way across Lake Michigan.
“You hear that, come find me, okay? Until then, you fly wherever you want.
Just try not to barbecue anypedestrians.
Then he spread his wings and launched into the air.
“Ah!”“Your ankle?” Jason felt bad he’d forgotten about her injury back in the Cyclops factory.
“That nectar we gave you might be wearing off.
He hoped he lived long enough to find her one.
“Sounds cozy.
All the water had emptied out except for a few patches that were starting to freeze.
It didn’t seemright to Jason that the fountain would have water in it in the winter anyway.
Then again, those big monitors had flashed the face of their mysterious enemyDirt Woman.
Nothing about this place was right.
No spirits tried to stop them.
The giant monitor walls stayed dark.
The drain hole was easily big enough for aperson, and a maintenance ladder led down into the gloom.
As he climbed, he braced himself for horrible sewer smells, but it wasn’t that bad.
The ladder dropped into a brickwork tunnelrunning north to south.
The air was warm and dry, with only a trickle of water on the floor.
“Trust me.
“How do you know—”“Hey, man, I ran away six times.
I’ve slept in some weird places, okay? Now, which way do we go?”Jason tilted his head, listening, then pointed south.
“That way.
“Maybe the venti went with the flow.
Jason had to catch her.
“We could all use it.
We’ve been going nonstop for over a day.
Leo, can you pull any food from that tool belt besidesbreath mints?”“Thought you’d never ask.
Chef Leo is on it!”Piper and Jason sat on a brick ledge while Leo shuffled through his pack.
He was still tired and dizzy, and hungry, too.
But mostly, he wasn’t eager to face whatever lay ahead.
He turned his gold coinin his fingers.
After Khione, the Cyclops mother, and the weird sleeping lady, the last thing Jason needed was another psycho villainess in hislife.
“What?”“Getting jumped by the Cyclopes,” she said.
“It wasn’t your fault.
“I was stupid.
I left you alone and walked into a trap.
I should’ve known…”He didn’t finish.
There were too many things he should have known—who he was, how to fight monsters, how Cyclopes lured their victims bymimicking voices and hiding in shadows and a hundred other tricks.
All that information was supposed to be in his head.
He could feel the places itshould be—like empty pockets.
If Hera wanted him to succeed, why had she stolen the memories that could help him? She claimed his amnesia hadkept him alive, but that made no sense.
He was starting to understand why Annabeth had wanted to leave the goddess in her cage.
“Cut yourself some slack.
Just because you’re the son of Zeus doesn’t mean you’re a one-man army.
He hummed as he pulled supplies out of his pack and his tool belt.
Jason had been studying them for days now, and he still couldn’t decide what color they were.
“Not just the quest, I mean.
The way I appeared on the bus, the Mist messing with your mind, and making youthink I was …you know.
“Yeah, well.
None of us asked for this.
It’s not your fault.
Again, Jason thought how glad he was that she’d lost the Aphrodite blessing.
With themakeup and the dress and the perfect hair, she’d looked about twenty-five, glamorous, and completely out of his league.
He’d never thought of beauty asa form of power, but that’s the way Piper had seemed—powerful.
But the weird thing was, he couldn’t quite get that other image out of his head.
Ithadn’t been an illusion.
That side of Piper was there too.
She just did her best to hide it.
“Was I?”“Piper,” he said, “he’s in some kind of trouble, isn’t it?”Over at the fire, Leo stirred some sizzling bell peppers and meat in a pan.
“Yeah, baby! Almost there.
“Jason … I can’t talk about it.
Let us help.
She took a shaky breath.
“I wish I could, but—”“And bingo!” Leo announced.
Jason had no idea where he’d gotten all the food, or how he’d put it together sofast, but it looked amazing: pepper and beef tacos with chips and salsa.
“How did you—?”“Chef Leo’s Taco Garage is fixing you up!” he said proudly.
“And by the way, it’s tofu, not beef, beauty queen, so don’t freak.
Just dig in!”Jason wasn’t sure about tofu, but the tacos tasted as good as they smelled.
While they ate, Leo tried to lighten the mood and joke around.
Jason wasgrateful Leo was with them.
It made being with Piper a little less intense and uncomfortable.
At the same time, he kind of wished he was alone with her;but he chided himself for feeling that way.
Without another word, she curled up and put her head in his lap.
In two seconds she wassnoring.
“Make some serious coin.
“Leo … about this fire stuff you can do … is it true?”Leo’s smile faltered.
“Yeah, well …” He opened his hand.
A small ball of flame burst to life, dancing across his palm.
“Why didn’t you say anything?”Leo closed his hand and the fire went out.
“Didn’t want to look like a freak.
“Piper can turn beautiful and charm people into giving her BMWs.
You’re no more a freakthan we are.
And, hey, maybe you can fly, too.
Like jump off a building and yell, ‘Flame on!’”Leo snorted.
“If I did that, you would see a flaming kid falling to his death, and I would be yelling something a little stronger than ‘Flame on!’ Trust me,Hephaestus cabin doesn’t see fire powers as cool.
Nyssa told me they’re super rare.
When a demigod like me comes around, bad things happen.
“Maybe people with special gifts show up when bad things are happening because that’s whenthey’re needed most.
“Maybe.
But I’m telling you … it’s not always a gift.
“You’re talking about your mom, aren’t you? The night she died.
He didn’t have to.
The fact that he was quiet, not joking around—that told Jason enough.
Whatever happened that night—it wasn’t because you could summon fire.
This Dirt Woman, whoever she is, hasbeen trying to ruin you for years, mess up your confidence, take away everything you care about.
She’s trying to make you feel like a failure.
You’re not.
“She said I was meant to do something important—something that would make or breakthat big prophecy about the seven demigods.
That’s what scares me.
I don’t know if I’m up to it.
Jason didn’t know what would happen.
They were demigods,which meant sometimes things didn’t end okay.
Sometimes you got eaten by the Cyclops.
But those powers wentalong with hard stuff, like sitting in a sewer in the middle of winter, running from monsters, losing your memory, watching your friends almost get cooked,and having dreams that warned you of your own death.
“You ever wonder about the other four demigods? I mean … ifwe’re three of the ones from the Great Prophecy, who are the others? Where are they?”Jason had thought about it, all right, but he tried to push it out of his mind.
He had a horrible suspicion that he would be expected to lead those otherdemigods, and he was afraid he would fail.
He was sure of that from his dream with the wolves.
He was supposed to act confident, even if he didn’tfeel it.
But Leo and Piper were depending on him, and he was terrified of failing them.
If he had to lead a group of six—six who might not get along—thatwould be even worse.
“I guess the other four will show up when the time is right.
Who knows? Maybe they’re on some other quest right now.
“I bet their sewer is nicer than ours.
“I’ll take first watch.
Jason didn’t mind.
Now that he was resting, he didn’t really feel theneed for more sleep.
He’d been conked out long enough on the dragon.
Plus, he needed time to think about the quest, his sister Thalia, and Hera’swarnings.
He also didn’t mind Piper’s using him for a pillow.
She had a cute way of breathing when she slept—inhaling through the nose, exhaling with alittle puff through the mouth.
He was almost disappointed when she woke up.
Jason wasn’t sure what to expect at the end—a dungeon, a mad scientist’s lab, or maybe asewer reservoir where all Porta-Potty sludge ends up, forming an evil toilet face large enough to swallow the world.
“I think they have one in downtown Chicago.
“Guys, read the directory.
It’s messed up.
“And what kind of department store has its entrance in a sewer?”“Or sells poisons,” Leo said.
“Man, what does ‘sundries’ even mean? Is that like underwear?”Jason took a deep breath.
“When in doubt, start at the top.
Jason stepped out first, sword ready.
“You’ve got to see this.
“This is not Macy’s.
The entire ceiling was a stained glass mosaic with astrological signs around a giantsun.
The daylight streaming through it washed everything in a thousand different colors.
The upper floors made a ring of balconies around a huge centralatrium, so they could see all the way down to the ground floor.
Gold railings glittered so brightly, they were hard to look at.
The carpeting was a riot of oriental patterns and colors, and the racks of merchandise were just as bizarre.
There was too much to take it atonce, but Jason saw normal stuff like shirt racks and shoe trees mixed in with armored manikins, beds of nails, and fur coats that seemed to be moving.
“Check it out.
The pool glittered with goldcoins, and on either side of the fountain stood a gilded cage—like an oversize canary cage.
Somebody had imprisoned the storm spirits, and the cage shuddered as they triedto get out.
In the other, frozen like a statue, was a short, buff satyr, holding a tree-branch club.
“We’ve got to get down there.
She wore an elegant black dress with diamond jewelry, and she looked like a retired fashion model—maybe fifty years old, though it was hard for Jason to judge.
Her long dark hair swept over one shoulder, and her face was gorgeous in that surrealsuper-model way—thin and haughty and cold, not quite human.
With their long red-painted nails, her fingers looked more like talons.
“I’m so happy to see new customers.
How may I help you?”Leo glanced at Jason like, All yours.
“I found it abandoned, you know.
I understand so many stores are, these days.
I decided it would make the perfect place.
I lovecollecting tasteful objects, helping people, and offering quality goods at a reasonable price.
So this seemed a good … how do you say … firstacquisition in this country.
Clearly she wasn’t hostile, though.
Jason started to relax.
Her voice wasrich and exotic.
Jason wanted to hear more.
“I am the Princess of Colchis.
My friends call me Your Highness.
Now, what are you looking for?”Jason had heard of rich foreigners buying American department stores.
Of course most of the time they didn’t sell poisons, living fur coats, stormspirits, or satyrs, but still—with a nice voice like that, the Princess of Colchis couldn’t be all bad.
“Jason …”“Um, right.
Actually, Your Highness …” He pointed to the gilded cage on the first floor.
“That’s our friend down there, Gleeson Hedge.
The satyr.
Couldwe … have him back, please?”“Of course!” the princess agreed immediately.
“I would love to show you my inventory.
First, may I know your names?”Jason hesitated.
It seemed like a bad idea to give out their names.
A memory tugged at the back of his mind—something Hera had warned himabout, but it seemed fuzzy.
If they could get what they wanted without a fight, that would be better.
Besides,this lady didn’t seem like an enemy.
“This is Leo.
I’m Jason.
Jason’s mind was getting blurrier, but he knew something didn’t seem right.
Then the moment passed, and Her Highness looked like a normalelegant woman again, with a cordial smile and a soothing voice.
What an interesting name,” she said, her eyes as cold as the Chicago wind.
“I think we’ll have to make a special deal for you.
Come,children.
Let’s go shopping.
The way the lady’s face glowed when she’d heardJason’s name had been bad enough.
Now Her Highness was smiling like nothing had happened, and Jason and Leo didn’t seem to think anything waswrong.
“Shall we start with the potions?”“Cool,” Jason said.
If this—princess—is really our friend—”“Oh, I’m better than a friend, my dear,” Her Highness said.
“I’m a saleswoman.
“Don’t worry.
We’ll work our way down to the first floor, eh?”Leo nodded eagerly.
“Sure, yeah! That sounds okay.
Right, Piper?”Piper did her best to stare daggers at him: No, it is not okay!“Of course it’s okay.
“Come along, boys.
Well, not exactly caught, and not exactly stealing.
Shenever kept the stuff.
She just did it to get her dad’s attention.
Usually she talked her neighborhood UPS guy into taking the stuff back.
But of course thesalesmen she duped always came to their senses and called the police, who eventually tracked her down.
Lining the display shelves were crystal flasks—some shaped likeswans or honey bear dispensers.
The liquids inside were every color, from glowing white to polka-dotted.
And the smells—ugh! Some were pleasant,like fresh-baked cookies or roses, but they were mixed with the scents of burning tires, skunk spray, and gym lockers.
“This one will heal any disease.
“Leprosy? Hangnails?”“Any disease, sweet boy.
And this vial”—she pointed to a swan-shaped container with blue liquid inside—“will kill you very painfully.
His voice sounded dazed and sleepy.
“We’ve got a job to do.
Remember?” She tried to put power into her words, to snap him out of his trance with charmspeak, buther voice sounded shaky even to her.
This princess woman scared her too much, made her confidence crumble, just the way she’d felt back in theAphrodite cabin with Drew.
“Sure.
But shopping first, okay?”The princess beamed at him.
“Then we have potions for resisting fire—”“Got that covered,” Leo said.
“You don’t appear to be wearing my trademark sunscreen …but no matter.
We also havepotions that cause blindness, insanity, sleep, or—”“Wait.
“Could that potion cure lost memory?”The princess narrowed her eyes.
“Possibly.
Yes.
Quite possibly.
Why, my dear? Have you forgotten something important?”Piper tried to keep her expression neutral, but if that vial could cure Jason’s memory …Do I really want that? she wondered.
Hera had taken away his memories for a reason.
She’d told him it was the only wayhe’d survive at Camp Half-Blood.
What if Jason found out that he was their enemy, or something? He might come out of his amnesia and decide hehated Piper.
He might have a girlfriend wherever he came from.
Piper hated seeing him that way.
She wanted to help him because she caredabout him, even if that meant losing him.
And maybe it would make this trip through Her Craziness’s department store worthwhile.
“Well, now … The price is always tricky.
I love helping people.
Honestly, I do.
And I always keep mybargains, but sometimes people try to cheat me.
“Once, for instance, I met a handsome young man who wanted a treasurefrom my father’s kingdom.
We made a bargain, and I promised to help him steal it.
“I demanded a high price.
The young man had to take me away with him.
He was quite good-looking, dashing,strong …” She looked at Piper.
“I’m sure, my dear, you understand how one might be attracted to such a hero, and want to help him.
She got the creepiest feeling the princess could read her thoughts.
Pieces of old myths she’d read with her dad started coming together, but this womancouldn’t be the one she was thinking of.
I betrayed my own family to win the hero his prize.
And still he cheated me of my payment.
“I’m sure you don’t need to worry, Leo.
You seem honest.
You would always pay a fair price, wouldn’tyou?”Leo nodded.
“What were we buying again? I’ll take two.
“I sense that you would.
The force of the suggestion nearly lifted her offher feet.
She wanted to pay anyprice.
She wanted to say yes.
Piper realized she was being charmspoken.
She’d sensed something like it before, when Drew spoke at the campfire,but this was a thousand times more potent.
No wonder her friends were dazed.
Was this was what people felt when Piper used charmspeak? A feelingof guilt settled over her.
“No, I won’t pay any price.
But a fair price, maybe.
After that, we need to leave.
Right, guys?”Just for a moment, her words seemed to have some effect.
The boys looked confused.
“Not many people could resist my suggestions.
Are you a child of Aphrodite, my dear? Ah, yes—I should have seenit.
No matter.
Perhaps we should shop a while longer before you decide what to buy, eh?”“But the vial—”“Now, boys.
Her voice was so much more powerful than Piper’s, so full of confidence, Piper didn’t stand a chance.
“You’ll need all the help you can get if you’re to make it to the Bay Area.
She thought about her dream of the mountaintop—the scene Enceladus had shown her, a place she knew,where she was supposed to betray her friends in two days.
“Why the Bay Area?”The princess smiled.
“Well, that’s where they’ll die, isn’t it?”Then she led them toward the escalators, Jason and Leo still looking excited to shop.
“I’m a seer, my dear.
I know your little secret.
But we don’t want to dwell on that, do we?The boys are having such fun.
Its ringed tail twitched, and its little legs wiggled frantically asLeo walked.
Jason was ogling the men’s sportswear.
Boys interested in shopping for clothes? A definite sign they were under an evil spell.
“Who are you?”“I told you, my dear.
I’m the Princess of Colchis.
“Where was Colchis, you mean.
My father ruled the far shores of the Black Sea, as far to the east as aGreek ship could sail in those days.
But Colchis is no more—lost eons ago.
The princess looked no more than fifty, but a bad feeling started settling over Piper—something King Boreas had mentionedback in Quebec.
“How old are you?”The princess laughed.
“A lady should avoid asking or answering that question.
Let’s just say the, ah, immigration process to enter your country tookquite a while.
My patron finally brought me through.
She made all this possible.
“Your patron …”“Oh, yes.
She doesn’t bring just anyone through, mind you—only those who have special talents, such as me.
And really, she insists on so little—astore entrance that must be underground so she can, ah, monitor my clientele; and a favor now and then.
In exchange for a new life? Really, it was thebest bargain I’d made in centuries.
We have to get out of here.
“Why does this look so familiar?”“Jason, it’s like yours,” Piper said.
“Now we really have to leave.
“The boys aren’t done, are they? And yes, my dear.
Those shirts are very popular—tradeins from previous customers.
Next to that was a dented bronzebreastplate pitted with corrosion—acid, maybe?—and a Roman toga slashed to pieces and stained with something that looked disturbingly like driedblood.
“Why don’t you tell the boys how you betrayed your family? I’m sure they’d like to hear thatstory.
“Oh, one will do strange things for love, Piper.
You should know that.
I fell for that young hero, in fact,because your mother Aphrodite had me under a spell.
If it wasn’t for her—but I can’t hold a grudge against a goddess, can I?”The princess’s tone made her meaning clear: I can take it out on you.
“Didn’t he, Your Highness? He married you just as he promised.
But even after I helped him steal my father’s treasure, he still needed my help.
His warships overtook us.
He would have destroyed us, but I convinced my brother to come aboard our shipfirst and talk under a flag of truce.
He trusted me.
For a moment he looked almost like himself.
“Killed your own—”“No,” the princess snapped.
“Those stories are lies.
It was my new husband and his men who killed my brother, though they couldn’t have done itwithout my deception.
They threw his body into the sea, and the pursuing fleet had to stop and search for it so they could give my brother a proper burial.
All this, I did for my husband.
And he forgot our bargain.
He betrayed me in the end.
“What did he do?”The princess held the sliced-up toga against Jason’s chest, as if measuring him for an assassination.
“Don’t you know the story, my boy? You of allpeople should.
You were named for him.
“The original Jason.
But then you’re —you should be dead!”The princess smiled.
“As I said, a new life in a new country.
Certainly I made mistakes.
I turned my back on my own people.
I was called a traitor, athief, a liar, a murderess.
But I acted out of love.
Piper could feel the sorcerywashing over them, taking control more firmly than ever.
“Don’t you see who she is? Don’t you—”“Let’s continue, shall we?” the princess said breezily.
“I believe you wanted to talk about a price for the storm spirits—and your satyr.
“Is that an armored forge?”Before Piper could stop him, he hopped off the escalator and ran over to a big oval oven that looked like a barbecue on steroids.
This is the H-2000, designed by Hephaestus himself.
Hot enough to meltCelestial bronze or Imperial gold.
“Imperial gold?”The princess nodded.
“Yes, my dear.
Like that weapon so cleverly concealed in your pocket.
To be properly forged, Imperial gold had to beconsecrated in the Temple of Jupiter on Capitoline Hill in Rome.
Quite a powerful and rare metal, but like the Roman emperors, quite volatile.
Be surenever to break that blade…” She smiled pleasantly.
“Rome was after my time, of course, but I do hear stories.
And now over here—this golden throne isone of my finest luxury items.
Sit in it and you’ll be immediately trapped.
He began walking toward it in a trance.
“How much for both?”“Oh, the seat I could let you have for five great deeds.
The forge, seven years of servitude.
And for only a bit of your strength—” She led Leo into theappliance section, giving him prices on various items.
She pulled him aside and slapped him across the face.
“What was that for?”“Snap out of it!” Piper hissed.
Can’t you feel it?”He knit his eyebrows.
“She seems okay.
Remember what Boreassaid—something about the souls no longer being confined to Hades? It’s not just monsters who can’t stay dead.
She’s come back from the Underworld!”Jason shook his head uneasily.
“She’s not a ghost.
“If you please, we will now see what you came for.
That is what you want, yes?”Piper had to choke back a scream.
She was tempted to pull out her dagger and take on this witch herself, but she didn’t like her chances—not in themiddle of Her Highness’s department store while her friends were under a spell.
Piper couldn’t even be sure they’d take her side in a fight.
She had tofigure out a better plan.
For the first time, Piper noticed two large bronze sundials—each about the size of atrampoline—inlaid on the marble tile floor to the north and south of the fountain.
The gilded oversize canary cages stood to the east and west, and thefarthest one held the storm spirits.
They were so densely packed, spinning around like a super-concentrated tornado, that Piper couldn’t tell how manythere were—dozens, at least.
The old satyr seemed to have been petrified at the moment he was sucked into the sky above the GrandCanyon.
He was frozen mid-shout, his club raised over his head like he was ordering the gym class to drop and give him fifty.
His curly hair stuck up atodd angles.
If Piper just concentrated on certain details—the bright orange polo shirt, the wispy goatee, the whistle around his neck—she could imagineCoach Hedge as his good old annoying self.
But it was hard to ignore the stubby horns on his head, and the fact that he had furry goat legs and hoovesinstead of workout pants and Nikes.
“I always keep my wares in good condition.
We can certainly barter for the storm spirits and the satyr.
A package deal.
If wecome to terms, I’ll even throw in the vial of healing potion, and you can go in peace.
“That’s better than startingunpleasantness, isn’t it, dear?”Don’t trust her, warned a voice in her head.
If Piper was right about this lady’s identity, nobody would be leaving in peace.
A fair deal wasn’tpossible.
It was all a trick.
But her friends were looking at her, nodding urgently and mouthing, Say yes! Piper needed more to time to think.
“Name your price.
“Name my price? Perhaps not the best haggling strategy, my boy, but at least you know a thing’s value.
Freedom is veryvaluable indeed.
You would ask me to release this satyr, who attacked my storm winds—”“Who attacked us,” Piper interjected.
“As I said, my patron asks me for small favors from time to time.
Sending the storm spirits to abduct you—that was one.
Iassure you it was nothing personal.
And no harm done, as you came here, in the end, of your own free will! At any rate, you want the satyr freed, and youwant my storm spirits—who are very valuable servants, by the way—so you can hand them over to that tyrant Aeolus.
Doesn’t seem quite fair, does it?The price will be high.
Before they could speak, she played her last card.
“You helped the original Jason steal the Golden Fleece.
You’re one of the most evil villains in Greek mythology.
Jason,Leo—don’t trust her.
She was utterly sincere, and it seemed to have some effect.
Jason stepped away fromthe sorceress.
Her diamond jewelry glittered, and her painted fingers curled like blood-tippedclaws.
“It’s true, I’m Medea.
But I’m so misunderstood.
Oh, Piper, my dear, you don’t know what it was like for women in the old days.
We had no power,no leverage.
Often we couldn’t even choose our own husbands.
But I was different.
I chose my own destiny by becoming a sorceress.
Is that so wrong? Imade a pact with Jason: my help to win the fleece, in exchange for his love.
A fair deal.
He became a famous hero! Without me, he would’ve diedunknown on the shores of Colchis.
“Then … you really did die three thousand years ago? You came back from the Underworld?”“Death no longer holds me, young hero,” Medea said.
“Thanks to my patron, I am flesh and blood again.
“Like a monster?”Medea spread her fingers, and steam hissed from her nails, like water splashed on hot iron.
“You have no idea what’s happening, do you, my dears?It is so much worse than a stirring of monsters from Tartarus.
My patron knows that giants and monsters are not her greatest servants.
I am mortal.
I learnfrom my mistakes.
And now that I have returned to the living, I will not be cheated again.
Now, here is my price for what you ask.
“The original Jason left Medea because she was crazy and bloodthirsty.
“Still he broke his promise! I ask you, was that right?”Jason and Leo dutifully shook their heads, but Piper wasn’t through.
She murdered her own children to get back at Jason.
She poisoned hisnew wife and fled the kingdom.
“An invention to ruin my reputation! The people of the Corinth—that unruly mob—killed my children and drove me out.
Jason didnothing to protect me.
He robbed me of everything.
So yes, I sneaked back into the palace and poisoned his lovely new bride.
It was only fair—a suitableprice.
“I died with my dreams shattered, but no longer.
I know now not to trust heroes.
When they come asking fortreasures, they will pay a heavy price.
Especially when the one asking has the name of Jason!”The fountain turned bright red.
Piper drew her dagger, but her hand was shaking almost too badly to hold it.
“Jason, Leo—it’s time to go.
Now.
“What of your quest, boys? And my price is so easy.
Did you know this fountain is magic? If a deadman were to be thrown into it, even if he was chopped to pieces, he would pop back out fully formed—stronger and more powerful than ever.
“She did that trick with somebody before—a king, I think.
She convinced his daughters to cut him to pieces so hecould come out of the water young and healthy again, but it just killed him!”“Ridiculous,” Medea said, and Piper could hear the power charged in every syllable.
“Leo, Jason—my price is so simple.
Why don’t you two fight? Ifyou get injured, or even killed, no problem.
We’ll just throw you into the fountain and you’ll be better than ever.
You do want to fight, don’t you? You resenteach other!”“Guys, no!” Piper said.
But they were already glaring at each other, as if it was just dawning on them how they really felt.
Now she understood what real sorcery looked like.
She’d always thought magic meant wands and fireballs, butthis was worse.
Medea didn’t just rely on poisons and potions.
Her most potent weapon was her voice.
“Jason’s always the star.
He always gets the attention and takes me for granted.
“You never take anything seriously.
You can’t even fix a dragon.
“I’m doing you a favor.
Let it happen now, and it will make your choice so much easier.
Enceladus will bepleased.
You could have your father back today!”Medea’s charmspeak didn’t work on her, but the sorceress still had a persuasive voice.
Her father back today? Despite her best intentions, Piperwanted that.
She wanted her father back so much, it hurt.
“Serve a giant? No.
But we all serve the same greater cause—a patron you cannot begin to challenge.
Walk away, child ofAphrodite.
This does not have to be your death, too.
Save yourself, and your father can go free.
Part of them had to beresisting, Piper hoped.
This went completely against their nature.
As it passed through themulticolored light, Medea said, “O Iris, goddess of the rainbow, show me the office of Tristan McLean.
Sitting behind his desk, talking on the phone, was her dad’s assistant, Jane, in her darkbusiness suit, her hair swirled in a tight bun.
“How can I help you, ma’am? Hello, Piper.
“Your father’s assistant.
Quite easy to manipulate.
An organized mind for a mortal, but incredibly weak.
“I just wanted to congratulate you, Jane.
Getting Mr.
McLean to leave town so suddenly, take his jet to Oaklandwithout alerting the press or the police—well done! No one seems to know where he’s gone.
And telling him his daughter’s life was on the line—that wasa nice touch to get his cooperation.
“He was quite cooperative when he believed Piper was in danger.
The blade trembled in her hand.
She couldn’t use it for a weapon any better than Helen of Troy could, but it wasstill a looking glass, and what she saw in it was a scared girl with no chance of winning.
“If the girl cooperates, it may be time for Mr.
McLean to come home.
Would you arrange asuitable cover story for his absence, just in case? And I imagine the poor man will need some time in a psychiatric hospital.
I will stand by.
“There, you see?”“You lured my dad into a trap,” Piper said.
“You helped the giant—”“Oh, please, dear.
You’ll work yourself into a fit! I’ve been preparing for this war for years, even before I was brought back to life.
I’m a seer, as I said.
Years ago, still suffering in the Fields of Punishment, I had a vision of the seven in your so-called GreatProphecy.
I saw your friend Leo here, and saw that he would be an important enemy someday.
I stirred the consciousness of my patron, gave her thisinformation, and she managed to wake just a little—just enough to visit him.
“Leo, listen to this! She helped get your mother killed!”“Uh-huh,” Leo mumbled, in a daze.
He frowned at his hammer.
“So … I just attack Jason? That’s okay?”“Perfectly safe,” Medea promised.
“And Jason, strike him hard.
Show me you are worthy of your namesake.
She knew it was her last chance.
“Jason, Leo—she’s tricking you.
Put down your weapons.
“Please, girl.
You’re no match for me.
I trained with my aunt, the immortal Circe.
I can drive men mad or heal them withmy voice.
What hope do these puny young heroes have against me? Now, boys, kill each other!”“Jason, Leo, listen to me.
For years she’d been trying to control herself and not show weakness, but nowshe poured everything into her words—her fear, her desperation, her anger.
She knew she might be signing her dad’s death warrant, but she cared toomuch about her friends to let them hurt each other.
“Medea is charming you.
It’s part of her magic.
You are best friends.
Don’t fight each other.
Fight her!”They hesitated, and Piper could feel the spell shatter.
“Leo, was I just about to stab you?”“Something about my mother … ?” Leo frowned, then turned toward Medea.
“You … you’re working for Dirt Woman.
You sent her to the machineshop.
“Lady, I got a three-pound hammer with your name on it.
“I’ll simply collect payment another way.
Jason swung his sword at Medea, but she dissolved into smoke andreappeared at the base of the escalator.
“Take your frustration out on my pets!”Before Jason could go after her, the giant bronze sundials at either end of the fountain swung open.
Two snarling gold beasts—flesh-and-bloodwinged dragons—crawled out from the pits below.
Each was the size of a camper van, maybe not large compared to Festus, but large enough.
Piper could feel the heat coming off their glittering skin.
One turned his angry orange eyes on her.
“They’ll paralyze you.
“These two dears have been with me along time—sun dragons, you know, gifts from my grandfather Helios.
They pulled my chariot when I left Corinth, and now they will be your destruction.
Tata!”The dragons lunged.
Leo and Jason charged to intercept.
Piper was amazed how fearlessly the boys attacked—working like a team who hadtrained together for years.
She was quick for a three-thousand-year-old lady.
Piper climbed at top speed, takingthe steps three at a time, and still she couldn’t catch her.
Medea didn’t stop at floor two.
She hopped the next escalator and continued to ascend.
Of course that’s what she would go for.
She was famous for potions.
Leo was blowing his safety whistle, and Jason was yelling to keep the dragons’ attention.
Piper didn’tdare look—not while she was running with a dagger in her hand.
She could just see herself tripping and stabbing herself in the nose.
That would besuper heroic.
She imagined Coach Hedge yelling in her mind, just like backin gym class at Wilderness School: Move it, McLean! You call that escalator-climbing?She reached the top floor, breathing hard, but she was too late.
Medea had reached the potions counter.
She threw hershield.
She stumbled backward, crashing over the counter,breaking vials and knocking down shelves.
When the sorceress stood from the wreckage, her dress was stained a dozen different colors.
Many of thestains were smoldering and glowing.
“Do you have any idea what so many potions will do when mixed?”“Kill you?” Piper said hopefully.
She coughed, and her face contorted in pain—or was she faking?Below, Leo called, “Jason, help!”Piper risked a quick look, and almost sobbed in despair.
One of the dragons had Leo pinned to the floor.
It was baring its fangs, ready to snap.
Smoke was rolling across the carpet as the stain spread, throwing sparks and setting fires in the clothingracks.
“You have only seconds before this concoction consumes everything and destroys the building.
There’s no time—”CRASH! The stained glass ceiling splintered in a rain of multicolored shards, and Festus the bronze dragon dropped into the department store.
Only now did Piper appreciate just how big and strong their metal friend was.
Leo raced to the fountain and pressed the marble tile,closing the sundials.
They shuddered as the dragons banged against them, trying to get out, but for the moment they were contained.
The whole fourth floor was on fire now.
The air filled with noxious gas.
Even with the roof open, Piper couldfeel the heat intensifying.
She backed up to the edge of the railing, keeping her dagger pointed toward Medea.
“You want yourboyfriend’s memory restored? Take me with you!”Piper glanced behind her.
Leo and Jason were on board Festus’s back.
The bronze dragon flapped his mighty wings, snatched the two cages withthe satyr and the storm spirits in his claws, and began to ascend.
Fire and the smoke curled up the walls, melting the railings, turning the air to acid.
“Your boy hero will stay ignorant forever, and your father will die.
Take me with you!”For one heartbeat, Piper was tempted.
Then she saw Medea’s grim smile.
The sorceress was confident in her powers of persuasion, confident thatshe could always make a deal, always escape and win in the end.
She plummeted for only a second before Leo and Jason caught her, hauling her aboard the dragon.
Then the department store explodedbehind them.
Eventually, the smoke from the burning department store faded in the distance, but Leo didn’t relax untilthe suburbs of Chicago gave way to snowy fields, and the sun began to set.
“You did awesome.
Gears popped and clicked in his neck.
He didn’t like those noises.
If the control disk was failing again—No, hopefully it was something minor.
Something he could fix.
“You’ve earned some motor oil and Tabasco sauce.
He flew at a steady pace, his great wings angling to catch the wind, but he was carrying aheavy load.
Two cages in his claws plus three people on his back—the more Leo thought about it, the more worried he got.
Even metal dragons hadlimits.
“You feeling okay?”“Yeah … not bad for a brainwashed zombie.
“Thanks for saving us back there, beauty queen.
Ifyou hadn’t talked me out of that spell—”“Don’t worry about it,” Piper said.
He felt terrible about how easily Medea had set him against his best friend.
And those feelings hadn’t come from nowhere—his resentment of the way Jason always got the spotlight and didn’t really seem to need him.
Leo did feel that way sometimes, even if he wasn’t proudof it.
Medea had seen the future down in the Underworld.
That was how her patron, the woman inthe black earthen robes, had come to the machine shop seven years ago to scare him, ruin his life.
That’s how his mother had died—because ofsomething Leo might do someday.
So in a weird way, even if his fire powers weren’t to blame, Mom’s death was still his fault.
He hoped she wouldn’t make it out, and would go right back to theFields of Punishment, where she belonged.
Those feelings didn’t make him proud, either.
That was Frankenstein thinking.
It wasn’t natural.
It wasn’t right.
Medea might’ve been brought back to life, but shehadn’t seemed quite human, with the hissing nails and the glowing head and whatnot.
Thinking any other way would just drive Leo nuts.
Still, the thought kept poking at him, like an echo of Medea’s voice.
“Couple more hours, maybe, to make sure Medea’s not following us.
I don’t thinkFestus can fly much longer than that.
“Coach Hedge probably wants to get out of his canary cage, too.
Question is—where are we going?”“The Bay Area,” Leo guessed.
His memories of the department store were fuzzy, but he seemed to remember hearing that.
“Didn’t Medea saysomething about Oakland?”Piper didn’t respond for so long, Leo wondered if he’d said something wrong.
“Something’s happened to your dad, right? He got lured into some kind of trap.
“Look, Medea said you would both die in the Bay Area.
And besides … even if we went there, the Bay Area is huge!First we need to find Aeolus and drop off the storm spirits.
Boreas said Aeolus was the only one who could tell us exactly where to go.
“So how do we find Aeolus?”Jason leaned forward.
“You mean you don’t see it?” He pointed ahead of them, but Leo didn’t see anything except clouds and the lights of a fewtowns glowing in the dusk.
“That … whatever it is,” Jason said.
“In the air.
Piper looked just as confused as he was.
“Could you be more specific on the ‘whatever-it-is’ part?”“Like a vapor trail,” Jason said.
“Except it’s glowing.
Really faint, but it’s definitely there.
We’ve been following it since Chicago, so I figured you sawit.
“Maybe Festus can sense it.
You think Aeolus made it?”“Well, it’s a magic trail in the wind,” Jason said.
“Aeolus is the wind god.
I think he knows we’ve got prisoners for him.
He’s telling us where to fly.
She didn’t just sound nervous.
She sounded broken with despair, like they’d already sealed their fate, and like it was her fault.
You don’t like any of the names I make up for you.
But if your dad’s in trouble and we can help—”“You can’t,” she said, her voice getting shakier.
“Look, I’m tired.
If you don’t mind …”She leaned back against Jason and closed her eyes.
Festus seemed to know where he was going.
He kept his course, gently curving toward the southwest and hopefullyAeolus’s fortress.
Another wind god to visit, a whole new flavor of crazy—Oh, boy, Leo couldn’t wait.
His energy level was crashing.
Themonotonous beat of the dragon’s wings made his eyes feel heavy.
His head started to nod.
“It’s cool.
Hand me the reins.
Besides, I’m the only one who can see the vapor trail.
I’ll make sure we stay on course.
“All right.
Maybe just …”He didn’t finish the sentence before slumping forward against the dragon’s warm neck.
Everything was hazy and gray, with bands of interference running across his sight.
He’d never dreamed with abad connection before.
Out of the corners of his eyes he saw bench saws, metal lathes, and tool cages.
A forge glowed cheerfully againstone wall.
Not Bunker 9—much warmer and more comfortable, obviously not abandoned.
It was a large ugly face.
Staring down at him was a bearded man in grimy blue coveralls.
His face was lumpy and covered withwelts, as if he’d been bitten by a million bees, or dragged across gravel.
Possibly both.
“Holy father, boy.
I should think you’d know the difference.
“Hephaestus?”Being in the presence of his father for the first time, Leo probably should’ve been speechless or awestruck or something.
But after what he’d beenthrough the last couple of days, with Cyclopes and a sorceress and a face in the potty sludge, all Leo felt was a surge of complete annoyance.
“After fifteen years? Great parenting, Fur Face.
Where do you get off sticking your ugly nose into my dreams?”The god raised an eyebrow.
A little spark caught fire in his beard.
Then he threw back his head and laughed so loudly, the tools rattled on theworkbenches.
“I miss Esperanza.
“Not that you’d care.
About both of you.
Which is why I never saw you before today.
He pulled a miniature motor from his pocket and beganfiddling absently with the pistons—just the way Leo did when he was nervous.
“Or people.
Well, any organic life forms, really.
I thought about speaking to you at your mom’s funeral.
Very impressive.
“Like—me right now, having this dream—looking at me having a dream?”Hephaestus scratched his beard.
“Now you’ve confused me.
But yes—it’s you.
I’m always keeping an eye on you, Leo.
But talking to you is, um …different.
“Of course not!”“Yeah, you’re scared.
He’d spent years thinking about what he’d say to his dad if they ever met—how Leo wouldchew him out for being a deadbeat.
Now, looking at that bronze mirror, Leo thought about his dad watching his progress over the years, even his stupidscience experiments.
Leo knew about running away from people, not fitting in.
How’d you even—Never mind.
I don’t want to know.
“Gods are different from mortals, boy.
We can exist in manyplaces at once—wherever people call on us, wherever our sphere of influence is strong.
In fact, it’s rare our entire essence is ever together in one place—our true form.
It’s dangerous, powerful enough to destroy any mortal who looks upon us.
So, yes … lots of children.
Add to that our different aspects,Greek and Roman—” The god’s fingers froze on his engine project.
“Er, that is to say, being a god is complicated.
And yes, I try to keep an eye on all mychildren, but you especially.
“I thought the gods had gone silent.
“Zeus’s orders—very strange, even for him.
He’s blocked all visions, dreams, and Iris-messages to and fromOlympus.
Hermes is sitting around bored out of his mind because he can’t deliver the mail.
Fortunately, I kept my old pirate broadcasting equipment.
It looked like a combination satellite dish, V-6 engine, and espresso maker.
Each time Hephaestusjostled the machine, Leo’s dream flickered and changed color.
“Radio Free Hephaestus.
Those were the days.
I keep it around for pay-for-view, mostly, or makingviral brain videos—”“Viral brain videos?”“But now it’s come in handy again.
If Zeus knew I was contacting you, he’d have my hide.
He excels at that, boy.
Then again, Leo wasn’t sure he wanted to be called “son.
Before it could hit the floor, it sprouted helicopter wings and flew itself into arecycling bin.
“That’s what got Zeus upset.
We gods were … well, embarrassed.
Don’t think there’s anyother way to say it.
“We won because the demigods of”—again he hesitated, as if he’d almost made a slip—“of Camp Half-Blood took the lead.
Wewon because our children fought our battles for us, smarter than we did.
If we’d relied on Zeus’s plan, we would’ve all gone down to Tartarus fighting thestorm giant Typhon, and Kronos would’ve won.
Bad enough mortals won our war for us, but then that young upstart, Percy Jackson—”“The guy who’s missing.
Yes.
Him.
He had the nerve to turn down our offer of immortality and tell us to pay better attention to our children.
Er, no offense.
“That was sarcasm, wasn’t it? Machines don’t have sarcasm, usually.
Butas I was saying, the gods felt ashamed, shown up by mortals.
At first, of course, we were grateful.
But after a few months, those feelings turned bitter.
We need to be admired, looked up to, held in awe and admiration.
well, that stuck in Zeus’s craw.
Hedecided it was high time we got back to traditional values.
Gods were to be respected.
Our children were to be seen and not visited.
Olympus wasclosed.
At least that was part of his reasoning.
And, of course, we started hearing of bad things stirring under the earth.
Monsters re-forming instantly.
The dead rising again.
Little stuff like that?”“Aye, boy.
Leo’s dream sharpened to full color, but the god’s face was such a riot ofred welts and yellow and black bruises, Leo wished it would go back to black and white.
None of us really believes that.
And I don’tmind saying, we’re in no shape to fight another war.
We barely survived the Titans.
If we’re repeating the old pattern, what comes next is even worse.
“Hera said demigods and gods had to join forces to defeat them.
Is that true?”“Mmm.
I hate to agree with my mother about anything, but yes.
Those giants are tough to kill, boy.
They’re a different breed.
“More like war dogs.
Back in the beginning, y’see, everything in creation came from the same parents—Gaea and Ouranos,Earth and Sky.
They had their different batches of children—your Titans, your Elder Cyclopes, and so forth.
Then Kronos, the head Titan—well, you’veprobably heard how he chopped up his father Ouranos with a scythe and took over the world.
Then we gods came along, children of the Titans, anddefeated them.
But that wasn’t the end of it.
The earth bore a new batch of children, except they were sired by Tartarus, the spirit of the eternal abyss—the darkest, most evil place in the Underworld.
Those children, the giants, were bred for one purpose—revenge on us for the fall of the Titans.
Theyrose up to destroy Olympus, and they came awfully close.
He absently swatted out the flames.
“What my blasted mother Hera is doing now—she’s a meddling foolplaying a dangerous game, but she’s right about one thing: you demigods have to unite.
That’s the only way to open Zeus’s eyes, convince theOlympians they must accept your help.
And that’s the only way to defeat what’s coming.
You’re a big part of that, Leo.
”The god’s gaze seemed far away.
Leo wondered if really could split himself into different parts—where else was he right now? Maybe his Greekside was fixing a car or going on a date, while his Roman side was watching a ball game and ordering pizza.
Leo tried to imagine what it would feel liketo have multiple personalities.
He hoped it wasn’t hereditary.
“Why claim me now? Why not when I was thirteen, like you’re supposedto? Or you could’ve claimed me at seven, before my mom died! Why didn’t you find me earlier? Why didn’t you warn me about this?”Leo’s hand burst into flames.
“Hardest part, boy.
Letting my children walk their own paths.
Interfering doesn’t work.
The Fates make sure of that.
The timing had to be right.
I can’t explain it much more, but—”Leo’s dream went fuzzy.
Just for a moment, it turned into a rerun of Wheel of Fortune .
Then Hephaestus came back into focus.
“I can’t talk much longer.
Zeus is sensing an illegal dream.
He is lord of the air, after all, including the airwaves.
Just listen, boy: youhave a role to play.
Your friend Jason is right—fire is a gift, not a curse.
I don’t give that blessing to just anyone.
They’ll never defeat the giants without you,much less the mistress they serve.
She’s worse than any god or Titan.
“I told you.
Yes, I’m pretty sure I told you.
Just be warned: along the way, you’re going to lose somefriends and some valuable tools.
Nothing lasts forever, not even the best machines.
And everything can be reused.
“Just watch out for—”Leo’s dream switched to Wheel of Fortune just as the wheel hit Bankrupt and the audience said, “Awwww!”Then Leo snapped awake to Jason and Piper screaming.
His ruby eyes were dim.
“You can’t fall again!”He could barely hold on.
The wind stung his eyes, but he managed to pull open the panel on the dragon’s neck.
He toggled the switches.
He tuggedthe wires.
The dragon’s wings flapped once, but Leo caught a whiff of burning bronze.
The drive system was overloaded.
Festus didn’t have the strengthto keep flying, and Leo couldn’t get to the main control panel on the dragon’s head—not in midair.
He saw the lights of a city below them—just flashes inthe dark as they plummeted in circles.
They had only seconds before they crashed.
“Take Piper and fly out of here!”“What?”“We need to lighten the load! I might be able to reboot Festus, but he’s carrying too much weight!”“What about you?” Piper cried.
“If you can’t reboot him—”“I’ll be fine,” Leo yelled.
“Just follow me to the ground.
Go!”Jason grabbed Piper around the waist.
They both unbuckled their harnesses, and in a flash they were gone—shooting into the air.
“Just you and me, Festus—and two heavy cages.
You can do it, boy!”Leo talked to the dragon while he worked, falling at terminal velocity.
He could see the city lights below him, getting closer and closer.
He summonedfire in his hand so he could see what he was doing, but the wind kept extinguishing it.
His eyes flickered weakly to life, and he spread his wings.
Their fall turned into a steep glide.
“Come on, big boy.
Come on!”They were still flying in way too hot, and the ground was too close.
Leo needed a place to land—fast.
Not good for a fire-breathing dragon.
He’d never get Festus out from the bottom if he sank, especially in freezingtemperatures.
Then, on the riverbanks, Leo spotted a white mansion with a huge snowy lawn inside a tall brick perimeter fence—like some rich person’sprivate compound, all of it blazing with light.
A perfect landing field.
He did his best to steer the dragon toward it, and Festus seemed to come back tolife.
They could make this!Then everything went wrong.
As they approached the lawn, spotlights along the fence fixed on them, blinding Leo.
He heard bursts like tracer fire, thesound of metal being cut to shreds—and BOOM.Leo blacked out.
He was lying in the snow, covered in mud and grease.
He spit a clump of frozengrass out of his mouth.
“You rolled pretty hard when—when Festus—”“Where is he?” Leo sat up, but his head felt like it was floating.
They’d landed inside the compound.
Something had happened on the way in—gunfire?“Seriously, Leo,” Jason said.
“You could be hurt.
You shouldn’t—”Leo pushed himself to his feet.
Then he saw the wreckage.
Festus must have dropped the big canary cages as he came over the fence, becausethey’d rolled in different directions and landed on their sides, perfectly undamaged.
His limbs were scattered across the lawn.
His tail hung on the fence.
The main section of his body had plowed atrench twenty feet wide and fifty feet long across the mansion’s yard before breaking apart.
What remained of his hide was a charred, smoking pile ofscraps.
Only his neck and head were somewhat intact, resting across a row of frozen rosebushes like a pillow.
He ran to the dragon’s head and stroked its snout.
The dragon’s eyes flickered weakly.
Oil leaked out of his ear.
“You’re the best thing I ever fixed.
Jason and Piper stood next to him, but Leo kept his eyes fixed on the dragon.
Nothing lasts forever, not even the best machines.
Long creak.
Two short clicks.
Creak.
Creak.
Almost like a pattern … triggering an old memory in Leo’s mind.
Leo realizedFestus was trying to say something.
He was using Morse code—just like Leo’s mom had taught him years ago.
Leo listened more intently, translating theclicks into letters: a simple message repeating over and over.
“I understand.
I will.
I promise.
Festus was gone.
He wasn’t even embarrassed.
His friends stood on either side, patting his shoulders, saying comforting things; but the buzzing in Leo’sears drowned out their words.
What did you promise Festus?”Leo sniffled.
He opened the dragon’s head panel, just to be sure, but the control disk was cracked and burned beyond repair.
“Everything can be reused.
“When was this?”Leo didn’t answer.
He worked at the dragon’s neck hinges until the head was detached.
It weighed about a hundred pounds, but Leo managed tohold it in his arms.
He looked up at the starry sky and said, “Take him back to the bunker, Dad.
Please, until I can reuse him.
I’ve never asked you foranything.
It flew into the sky and disappeared.
“He answered you?”“I had a dream,” Leo managed.
“Tell you later.
He felt like a broken machine himself—like someone had removedone little part of him, and now he’d never be complete.
He might move, he might talk, he might keep going and do his job.
But he’d always be offbalance, never calibrated exactly right.
Otherwise, Festus had died for nothing.
He had to finish this quest—for his friends, for his mom, forhis dragon.
The large white mansion glowed in the center of the grounds.
Tall brick walls with lights and security cameras surrounded theperimeter, but now Leo could see—or rather sense—just how well those walls were defended.
“I mean, what city?”“Omaha, Nebraska,” Piper said.
“I saw a billboard as we flew in.
But I don’t know what this mansion is.
We came in right behind you, but as you werelanding, Leo, I swear it looked like—I don’t know—”“Lasers,” Leo said.
He picked up a piece of dragon wreckage and threw it toward the top of the fence.
Immediately a turret popped up from thebrick wall and a beam of pure heat incinerated the bronze plating to ashes.
“Some defense system.
How are we even alive?”“Festus,” Leo said miserably.
“He took the fire.
The lasers sliced him to bits as he came in so they didn’t focus on you.
I led him into a death trap.
“He saved our lives again.
“The main gates are locked, and I’m guessing I can’t fly us out of here without getting shot down.
“Since we can’t go out, we’ll have to go in.
It was like he could smell the traps, and he picked just the right tool out of his belt to disable them.
“Yeah, amazing,” he said.
“Can’t fix a dragon right, but I’m amazing.
“It is? All those traps, and the door’s unlocked?”Leo turned the knob.
The door swung open easily.
He stepped inside without hesitation.
“He’s going to need some time to get over Festus.
Don’t take it personally.
“Yeah, okay.
Back in Medea’s store, he’d said some pretty harsh stuff to Leo—stuff a friend shouldn’t say, not to mention the fact he’dalmost skewered Leo with a sword.
If it hadn’t been for Piper, they’d both be dead.
And Piper hadn’t gotten out of that encounter easily, either.
I don’t care if it’s a trap ornot.
“Jason, you don’t knowwhat you’re saying.
Please—don’t make me feel worse.
Come on.
We should stick together.
“Yeah, we’re doing great with that.
A faint glow peeked through the breaks in the thick velvet curtains.
The windows rose about ten feet tall.
Spaced between themalong the walls were life-size metal statues.
As Jason’s eyes adjusted, he saw sofas arranged in a U in the middle of the room, with a central coffee tableand one large chair at the far end.
A massive chandelier glinted overhead.
Along the back wall stood a row of closed doors.
“It’s not working.
“What do we do—explore?”Leo shook his head.
“After all those traps outside? Bad idea.
He hated being a demigod.
Looking around, he didn’t see a comfortable room to hang out in.
He imagined vicious storm spiritslurking in the curtains, dragons under the carpet, a chandelier made of lethal ice shards, ready to impale them.
“We’re not separating again—not like in Detroit.
“I needed that.
“Too cold to wait outside.
Let’s bring the cages in and make camp in this room.
Wait for daylight; thenwe can decide what to do.
Thankfully, Leo didn’t find anypoison throw pillows or electric whoopee cushions on the sofas.
Besides, they had no fire, so they settled for cold rations.
They looked like Greek gods or heroes.
Maybe that was a good sign.
Or maybe theywere used for target practice.
On the coffee table sat a tea service and a stack of glossy brochures, but Jason couldn’t make out the words.
The bigchair at the other end of the table looked like a throne.
None of them tried to sit in it.
The venti kept churning in their prison, hissing and spinning, and Jason got theuncomfortable feeling they were watching him.
He could sense their hatred for the children of Zeus—the lord of the sky who’d ordered Aeolus to imprisontheir kind.
The venti would like nothing better than to tear Jason apart.
Leo was working on the cage, trying to open it with various tools, but the lockseemed to be giving him a hard time.
Jason decided not to sit next to him in case Hedge suddenly unfroze and went into ninja goat mode.
The couches were a little too comfortable —a lot better than adragon’s back—and he’d taken the last two watches while his friends slept.
He was exhausted.
Jason wondered if she was really asleep or dodging a conversation about her dad.
Whatever Medeahad meant in Chicago, about Piper getting her dad back if she cooperated—it didn’t sound good.
If Piper had risked her own dad to save them, thatmade Jason feel even guiltier.
If Jason had his days straight, this was early morning of December 20.
Which meant tomorrow was the wintersolstice.
“It’s your turn.
“Leo, I’m sorry about that stuff I said in Chicago.
That wasn’t me.
You’re not annoying and you do take stuff seriously—especially your work.
I wish I could do half the things you can do.
He looked at the ceiling and shook his head like, What am I gonna do with this guy?“I try very hard to be annoying,” Leo said.
“Don’t insult my ability to annoy.
And how am I supposed to resent you if you go apologizing? I’m a lowlymechanic.
You’re like the prince of the sky, son of the Lord of the Universe.
I’m supposed to resent you.
And ‘Watch me fly.
I am the eagle that soars—’”“Shut up, Valdez.
“Yeah, see.
I do annoy you.
Leo still looked sad and exhausted—just not quite so angry.
“It’s gonna take a few hours to get this goat man free.
Then I still got to figure out how to make the winds a smallerholding cell, ’cause I am not lugging that canary cage to California.
“You gave him a purpose again.
I think this quest was the high point of his life.
“Now, sleep, man.
I want some time without you organic life forms.
He closed his eyes and had a long, blissfully dreamless sleep.
He wasn’t sure what was more jarring—the full sunlight that now bathed the room, or the screaming satyr.
Gleeson Hedge was capering around on his furry hindquarters, swinging his club andyelling, “Die!” as he smashed the tea set, whacked the sofas, and charged at the throne.
His eyes were so wild, Jason was afraid he might attack.
The satyr was still wearing his orange polo shirt and hiscoach’s whistle, but his horns were clearly visible above his curly hair, and his beefy hindquarters were definitely all goat.
Could you call a goat beefy?Jason put the thought aside.
“Jason.
Her hair looked likeit had become a nest for a friendly hamster.
“What’s going on? We were at the Grand Canyon.
The anemoi thuellai were attacking and—” He zeroed in onthe storm spirit cage, and his eyes went back to DEFCON 1.
“Die!”“Whoa, Coach!” Leo stepped in his path, which was pretty brave, even though Hedge was six inches shorter.
“It’s okay.
They’re locked up.
We justsprang you from the other cage.
“Coach—Gleeson—um, whatever you want us to call you.
You saved us at the Grand Canyon.
You were totally brave.
We thought we’d lost you.
Then we got word the storm spirits had taken you back totheir—um, operator, Medea.
She’s mortal.
She’s dead.
“So! You were sent on a dangerous quest to rescue me.
Excellent!”“Um.
“Actually, Glee—can I still call you Coach Hedge? Gleesonseems wrong.
We’re on a quest for something else.
We kind of found you by accident.
Then his eyes lit up again.
“But there are no accidents! Not on quests.
This wasmeant to happen! So, this is the witch’s lair, eh? Why is everything gold?”“Gold?” Jason looked around.
From the way Leo and Piper caught their breath, he guessed they hadn’t noticed yet either.
Even the curtains—which seemed tohave opened by themselves at daybreak—appeared to be woven of gold fiber.
“No wonder they got so much security.
“This isn’t Medea’s place, Coach.
It’s some rich person’s mansion in Omaha.
We got away from Medea and crashlandedhere.
“I’m meant to protect you.
What’s the quest?”Before Jason could decide if he wanted to explain or just shove Coach Hedge back into his cage, a door opened at the far end of the room.
He had a white beard and one of those long, old-fashionedsleeping caps pressed down over his white hair.
He froze when he saw them, and the toothbrush fell out of his mouth.
There are strange people in the throne room.
He raised his club and shouted, “Die!”IT TOOK ALL THREE OF THEM to hold back the satyr.
“Whoa, Coach!” Jason said.
“Bring it down a few notches.
Jasonguessed he must be Lit, the old guy’s son.
He was dressed in pajama pants with a sleeveless T-shirt that said cornhuskers, and he held a sword thatlooked like it could husk a lot of things besides corn.
His ripped arms were covered in scars, and his face, framed by curly dark hair, would’ve beenhandsome if it wasn’t also sliced up.
“Hold on!” Piper steppedforward, trying for her best calming voice.
“This is just a misunderstanding! Everything’s fine.
It didn’thelp that Hedge was screaming, “I’ll get them!Don’t worry!”“Coach,” Jason pleaded, “they may be friendly.
Besides, we’re trespassing in their house.
“Now, who are you, and why are you here?”“Let’s all put our weapons down,” Piper said.
“Coach, you first.
“Just one thwack?”“No,” Piper said.
Even with her hair messed up and wearing two-day-old clothes, she looked extremely cute, andJason felt a little jealous she was giving Lit that smile.
“You speak well, girl—fortunately for your friends, or I would’ve run them through.
“I try not to get run through before lunchtime.
“Well, since you’re here.
Please, sit down.
“Your Majesty—”“No, no, it’s fine, Lit,” the old man said.
“New land, new customs.
They may sit in my presence.
After all, they’ve seen me in my nightclothes.
Nosense observing formalities.
“Welcome to my humble home.
I am King Midas.
“He died.
Tricky to do that in a bathrobe, and Jason kept worrying the old guy wouldforget and uncross his legs.
Hopefully he was wearing golden boxers under there.
Jason wondered if helooked that ripped holding a sword.
Sadly, he doubted it.
“What our satyr friend means, Your Majesty, is that you’re the second mortal we’ve met who should be—sorry—dead.
King Midaslived thousands of years ago.
In the distance, downtown Omaha looked like a clusterof children’s blocks —way too clean and small for a regular city.
It’s strange.
Seems like a dream, doesn’t it, Lit?”“A very long dream, Your Majesty.
I’m enjoying myself very much.
I like being alive better.
“You didn’t happen to have a … patron?”Midas hesitated, but there was a sly twinkle in his eyes.
“Does it matter, my dear?”“We could kill them again,” Hedge suggested.
“Why don’t you go outside and stand guard?”Leo coughed.
“Is that safe? They’ve got some serious security.
“Sorry about that.
But it’s lovely stuff, isn’t it? Amazing what gold can still buy.
Such excellent toys you have in this country!”He fished a remote control out of his bathrobe pocket and pressed a few buttons—a pass code, Jason guessed.
“Safe to go out now.
“Fine.
But if you need me …” He winked at Jason meaningfully.
Then he pointed at himself, pointed two fingers at their hosts,and sliced a finger across his throat.
Very subtle sign language.
“So … you don’t know how you got here?”“Oh, well, yes.
Sort of,” the king said.
He frowned at Lit.
“Why did we pick Omaha, again? I know it wasn’t the weather.
“Apparently I was mistaken.
But this is a rather nice house, isn’t it? Lit—it’s shortfor Lityerses, by the way—horrible name, but his mother insisted—Lit has plenty of wide-open space to practice his swordplay.
He has quite a reputationfor that.
They called him the Reaper of Men back in the old days.
“How nice.
Jason was now one hundred percent sure he didn’t like this guy, and he was starting to regret sending Hedgeoutside.
“All this gold—”The king’s eyes lit up.
“Are you here for gold, my boy? Please, take a brochure!”The king’s eyes lit up.
“Are you here for gold, my boy? Please, take a brochure!”Jason looked at the brochures on the coffee table.
The title said GOLD: Invest for Eternity.
“Um, you sell gold?”“No, no,” the king said.
“I make it.
In uncertain times like these, gold is the wisest investment, don’t you think? Governments fall.
The dead rise.
But gold retains its value!”Leo frowned.
“I’ve seen that commercial.
“I assure you, I can beat any price for a serious investor.
I can make a wide assortment ofgold items at a moment’s notice.
“Your Majesty, you gave up the golden touch, didn’t you?”The king looked astonished.
“Gave it up?”“Yes,” Piper said.
“You got it from some god—”“Dionysus,” the king agreed.
“I’d rescued one of his satyrs, and in return, the god granted me one wish.
I chose the golden touch.
“And you realized how greedy you’d been.
So you repented.
“You see, son? You’re away for a few thousand years, and the story gets twisted all around.
Mydear girl, did those stories ever say I’d lost my magic touch?”“Well, I guess not.
They just said you learned how to reverse it with running water, and you brought your daughter back to life.
Sometimes I still have to reverse my touch.
There’s no running water in the house because I don’t want accidents”—he gestured tohis statues—“but we chose to live next to a river just in case.
Occasionally, I’ll forget and pat Lit on the back—”Lit retreated a few steps.
“I hate that.
At any rate, gold is wonderful.
Why would I give it up?”“Well …” Piper looked truly lost now.
“Isn’t that the point of the story? That you learned your lesson?”Midas laughed.
“My dear, may I see your backpack for a moment? Toss it here.
She dumped everything out of the pack and tossed it to Midas.
As soon as he caught it, thepack turned to gold, like frost spreading across the fabric.
It still looked flexible and soft, but definitely gold.
The king tossed it back.
“That pack is magic now, as well.
Go ahead—put your little storm spirit enemies in there.
He took the bag from Piper and held it up to the cage.
As soon as he unzipped the backpack, the windsstirred and howled in protest.
The cage bars shuddered.
The door of the prison flew open and the winds got vacuumed straight into the pack.
Leo zippedit shut and grinned.
“Gotta admit.
That’s cool.
“My golden touch a curse? Please.
I didn’t learn any lesson, and life isn’t a story, girl.
Honestly, my daughter Zoe was muchmore pleasant as a gold statue.
There in the corner was a golden statue of a girl with a shocked expression, as if shewere thinking, Dad!“That’s horrible!” Piper said.
She doesn’t mind.
Besides, if I’d learned my lesson, would I have gotten these?”Midas pulled off his oversize sleeping cap, and Jason didn’t know whether to laugh or get sick.
Midas had long fuzzy gray ears sticking up from hiswhite hair—like Bugs Bunny’s, but they weren’t rabbit ears.
They were donkey ears.
“I didn’t need to see that.
“A few years after the golden touch incident, I judged a music contest between Apollo and Pan, and I declared Panthe winner.
Apollo, sore loser, said I must have the ears of an ass, and voilà.
This was my reward for being truthful.
I tried to keep them a secret.
Only mybarber knew, but he couldn’t help blabbing.
“That’s him.
Hewon’t be telling anyone’s secrets again.
Suddenly he didn’t strike Jason as a harmless old man in a bathrobe.
His eyes had a merry glow to them—the look of a madmanwho knew he was mad, accepted his madness, and enjoyed it.
“Yes, gold has many uses.
I think that must be why I was brought back, eh Lit? To bankrollour patron.
“That and my good sword arm.
Suddenly the air in the room seemed much colder.
“You work for the giants.
“Well, I don’t care for giants myself, of course.
But even supernatural armies need to get paid.
I do owe mypatron a great debt.
I tried to explain that to the last group that came through, but they were very unfriendly.
Wouldn’t cooperate at all.
“The last group?”“Hunters,” Lit snarled.
“Blasted girls from Artemis.
He caught a whiff of electrical fire like he’d just melted some of the springsin the sofa.
“What happened?”Lit shrugged.
“Few days ago? I didn’t get to kill them, unfortunately.
They were looking for some evil wolves, or something.
Said they were following atrail, heading west.
Missing demigod—I don’t recall.
Annabeth had mentioned the Hunters were looking for him.
And in Jason’s dream of the burned-out house in theredwoods, he’d heard enemy wolves baying.
Hera had called them her keepers.
It had to be connected somehow.
“Very unpleasant young ladies, those Hunters,” he recalled.
“They absolutely refused to be turned into gold.
Muchof the security system outside I installed to keep that sort of thing from happening again, you know.
I don’t have time for those who aren’t seriousinvestors.
They got the message.
“It’s been a great visit.
Welcome back to life.
Thanks for the gold bag.
“I know you’re not serious investors, but that’s all right! I have to rebuild my collection.
The king rose, and Leo and Piper moved away from him.
“You don’t have to be turned to gold.
I give all my guests a choice—join my collection, or die at the hands ofLityerses.
Really, it’s good either way.
“Your Majesty, you can’t—”Quicker than any old man should’ve been able to move, Midas lashed out and grabbed her wrist.
Leo tried to summon fire, but he’d forgotten his power wasn’tworking.
Midas touched his hand, and Leo transformed into solid metal.
His friends—just gone.
And he hadn’t been able to stop it.
“Gold trumps fire, I’m afraid.
“In this room, my powerdampens all others: fire… even charmspeak.
Which leaves me only one more trophy to collect.
“Need help in here!”For once, the satyr didn’t charge in.
Jason wondered if the lasers had gotten him, or if he was sitting at the bottom of a trap pit.
“No goat to the rescue? Sad.
But don’t worry, my boy.
It’s really not painful.
Lit can tell you.
“I choose combat.
You said I could choose to fight Lit instead.
“I said you could die fighting Lit.
But of course, if you wish.
“I am the Reaper of Men!”“Come on, Cornhusker.
This time it came up as a javelin, and Jason was glad for the extra length.
“Very nice.
He slashed and sliced, and Jason could barely dodge the strikes, but his mind went into a different mode—analyzing patterns,learning Lit’s style, which was all offense, no defense.
Lit seemed surprised to find him still alive.
“You don’t fight like a Greek.
“It’s Roman.
“What is Roman?”“News flash,” Jason said.
“While you were dead, Rome defeated Greece.
Created the greatest empire of all time.
“Never even heard of them.
“Lit?”“I’m fine,” Lit growled.
Midas put his hand on his son’s shoulder, and suddenly a very angry-looking gold statue was sitting on Midas’s throne.
“That was a naughty trick, demigod.
I’ll get you for that.
“Don’t worry, son.
I’ll get you downto the river right after I collect this prize.
Jason dodged, but the old man was fast, too.
Jason kicked the coffee table into the old man’s legs and knocked him over, butMidas wouldn’t stay down for long.
Anger washed over him.
He was the son of Zeus.
He could not fail his friends.
Midas must’ve felt it too, because he stumbledto his feet and grabbed his donkey ears.
“My power is supreme here!”Thunder rumbled.
Outside, the sky turned black.
“Yes?”“It’s an excellent conductor of electricity.
A lightning bolt ripped through the roof like it was an eggshell, connected with the tip of Jason’sspear, and sent out arcs of energy that blasted the sofas to shreds.
Chunks of ceiling plaster crashed down.
The chandelier groaned and snapped offitschain, and Midas screamed as it pinned him to the floor.
The glass immediately turned into gold.
Midas cursed in Ancient Greek, thoroughly pinned under his chandelier.
The rainsoaked everything, turning the gold chandelier back to glass.
Piper and Leo were slowly changing too, along with the other statues in the room.
His mouth was covered with dirt, snow, and grass.
His head was spinning from summoning the lightning bolt, and it was all he could do to keep from passing out.
“Getting a snack.
Sorry.
Who needs killing?”“No one, now!” Jason said.
“Just grab Leo.
I’ll get Piper.
Hopefully that would keep the Reaper of Men from turning back to flesh—at least untilafter Midas’s victims did.
“I think these guys will want some quality time with Midas.
“He turned me to gold!”“You’re okay now.
Next to her, a campfire blazed, turning the air sharp with smoke.
Firelight flickered against rockwalls.
They were in a shallow cave, but it didn’t offer much protection.
Outside, the wind howled.
Snow blew sideways.
It might’ve been day or night.
Thestorm made it too dark to tell.
He didn’t look great, but better than Piper felt.
“I got the precious metal treatmenttoo,” he said.
“But I came out of it faster.
Dunno why.
We had to dunk you in the river to get you back completely.
Tried to dry you off, but … it’s really,really cold.
“We risked as much nectar as we could.
Coach Hedge did a little nature magic—”“Sports medicine.
“Kind of a hobby of mine.
Your breath might smell like wild mushrooms and Gatorade fora few days, but it’ll pass.
You probably won’t die.
Probably.
“How did you beat Midas?”Jason told her the story, putting most of it down to luck.
“Kid’s being modest.
You should’ve seen him.
Hi-yah! Slice! Boom with the lightning!”“Coach, you didn’t even see it,” Jason said.
“You were outside eating the lawn.
“Then I came in with my club, and we dominated that room.
Afterward, I told him, ‘Kid, I’m proud of you! If youcould just work on your upper body strength—’”“Coach,” said Jason.
“Leo, can you stoke the fire?”“On it.
“Where are we?”“Pikes Peak,” Jason said.
“Colorado.
“I harnessed the storm spirits to bring us this far.
They didn’t like it—went a little faster than I wanted, almostcrashed us into the mountainside before I could get them back in the bag.
I’m not going to be trying that again.
“That’s what I asked him.
“That glittery wind trail we saw yesterday? It was still in the sky, though it had faded a lot.
Ifollowed it until I couldn’t see it anymore.
Then—honestly I’m not sure.
I just felt like this was the right place to stop.
“Aeolus’s floating palace should be anchored above us, right at the peak.
This is one ofhis favorite spots to dock.
“I don’t know.
Something else, too …”“The Hunters were heading west,” Piper remembered.
“Do you think they’re around here?”Jason rubbed his forearm as if the tattoos were bothering him.
“I don’t see how anyone could survive on the mountain right now.
The storm’s prettybad.
It’s already the evening before the solstice, but we didn’t have much choice except to wait out the storm here.
We had to give you some time to restbefore we tried moving.
The wind howling outside the cave scared her, and she couldn’t stop shivering.
“Uh, you mind if I …”“I suppose.
They scooted closer to the fire.
Coach Hedge chewed on his club and spit splinters into the fire.
“So, guys, long as you’re cuddled up for story time …something I’ve been meaning to tell you.
On the way to Omaha, I had this dream.
Kinda hard to understand with the static and the Wheel of Fortunebreaking in—”“Wheel of Fortune ?” Piper assumed Leo was kidding, but when he looked up from his burgers, his expression was deadly serious.
In the firelight, with the wind howling, the story was even creepier.
Piper could imagine the static-filled voice of thegod warning about giants who were the sons of Tartarus, and about Leo losing some friends along the way.
“I don’tunderstand.
If demigods and gods have to work together to kill the giants, why would the gods stay silent? If they need us—”“Ha,” said Coach Hedge.
“The gods hate needing humans.
They like to be needed by humans, but not the other way around.
Things will have to geta whole lot worse before Zeus admits he made a mistake closing Olympus.
“What? I’m intelligent! I’m not surprised you cupcakes haven’t heard of the Giant War.
The gods don’t like to talk about it.
Bad PR toadmit you needed mortals to help beat an enemy.
That’s just embarrassing.
“When I dreamed about Hera in her cage, she said Zeus was acting unusually paranoid.
And Hera—she saidshe went to those ruins because a voice had been speaking in her head.
What if someone’s influencing the gods, like Medea influenced us?”Piper shuddered.
She’d had a similar thought—that some force they couldn’t see was manipulating things behind the scenes, helping the giants.
“Yeah, Hephaestus said something similar, like Zeus was acting weirder than usual.
But whatbothered me was the stuff my dad didn’t say.
Like a couple of times he was talking about the demigods, and how he had so many kids and all.
I don’tknow.
He acted like getting the greatest demigods together was going to be almost impossible—like Hera was trying, but it was a really stupid thing todo, and there was some secret Hephaestus wasn’t supposed to tell me.
Piper could feel the tension in his arms.
“He mentioned a sacred oath not to discuss—something.
Coach, you know anything about that?”“Nah.
I’m just a satyr.
They don’t tell us the juicy stuff.
Especially an old—” He stopped himself.
“But you’re not that old, are you?”“Hundred and six,” the coach muttered.
“Say what?”“Don’t catch your panties on fire, Valdez.
That’s just fifty-three in human years.
Still, yeah, I made some enemies on the Council of Cloven Elders.
I’vebeen a protector a longtime.
But they started saying I was getting unpredictable.
Too violent.
Can you imagine?”“Wow.
“That’s hard to believe.
“Yeah, then finally we get a good war going with the Titans, and do they put me on the front lines? No! They send me as far away aspossible—the Canadian frontier, can you believe it? Then after the war, they put me out to pasture.
The Wilderness School.
Bah! Like I’m too old to behelpful just because I like playing offense.
All those flower-pickers on the Council—talking about nature.
“Nature means big things killing and eating little things! And when you’re a —you know—vertically challengedsatyr like me, you get in good shape, you carry a big stick, and you don’t take nothing from no one! That’s nature.
“Flowerpickers.
I don’t do flesh.
Don’t eat your cudgel.
I got some tofu patties here.
Piper’s a vegetarian too.
I’ll throw them on in a second.
Piper usually hated the smell of cooking meat, but her stomach rumbled like it wanted to mutiny.
Think broccoli.
Carrots.
Lentils.
Lying by the fire, with Jason holding her, Piper’s conscience felt like a hot bullet slowing working its waytoward her heart.
All the guilt she’d been holding in for the last week, since the giant Enceladus had first sent her a dream, was about to kill her.
Jason even said he’d walk into a trap to save her dad.
And Piper had shut them out.
Maybe she’d done the right thing in Chicago by saving her friends, but she’d only delayed her problem.
She could neverbetray her friends, but the tiniest part of her was desperate enough to think, What if I did?She tried to imagine what her dad would say.
Hey, Dad, if you were ever chained up by a cannibal giant and I had to betray a couple of friends tosave you, what should I do?Funny, that had never come up when they did Any Three Questions.
Her dad would never take the question seriously, of course.
He’d probably tellher one of Grandpa Tom’s old stories—something with glowing hedgehogs and talking birds—and then laugh about it as if the advice was silly.
Sometimes she dreamed about that little two-room house in Oklahoma.
She wondered what itwould’ve been like to grow up there.
He’d had spent his whole life running away from that place, distancing himself from the rez, playing any roleexcept Native American.
He’d always told Piper how lucky she was to grow up rich and well cared-for, in a nice house in California.
Can you believe I ever looked like that? he’d say.
Being Cherokee was the same way for him—something funny and mildly embarrassing.
Maybe that’s why he was always so unhappy, changing roles.
Maybe that’s why Piper startedstealing things, looking for something her dad couldn’t give her.
The wind kept raging.
Piper thought of an old story her dad had told her … one that maybe did answer some of herquestions.
The kids were making fun of her becausePiper Cherokee was a kind of airplane.
“No, Pipes.
Fine airplane.
That’s not how I named you.
Grandpa Tom picked out your name.
He said you’d learn to sing the hardest Cherokee songs,even the snake song.
The snakes prepared for war on the humans, but the woman’s husband tried to make peace.
He promised he’d do anythingto repay the rattlesnakes.
The snakes held him to his word.
They told him to send his wife to the well so the snakes could bite her and take her life inexchange.
The man was heartbroken, but he did what they asked.
Afterward, the snakes were impressed that the man had given up so much and kepthis promise.
They taught him the snake song for all the Cherokee to use.
From that point on, if any Cherokee met a snake and sang that song, the snakewould recognize the Cherokee as a friend, and would not bite.
“He let his wife die?”Her dad spread his hands.
“It was a hard sacrifice.
But one life brought generations of peace between snakes and Cherokee.
Grandpa Tombelieved that Cherokee music could solve almost any problem.
He thought you’d know lots of songs, and be the greatest musician of the family.
That’swhy we named you Piper.
Had her grandfather foreseen something about her, even when she was a baby? Had he sensed she was a child of Aphrodite? Herdad would probably tell her that was crazy.
Grandpa Tom was no oracle.
Her friends were counting on her.
They’d saved her when Midas had turned her to gold.
She couldn’t repay them with lies.
She stopped shivering and settled against Jason’s chest.
Leo handed out the food.
Piper didn’t want to move, talk,or do anything to disrupt the moment.
But she had to.
“I don’t want to hide anything from you guys anymore.
Too late to change her mind now.
He told me I hadto cooperate, or my dad would be killed.
“Big giant.
Breathes fire.
Not somebody I’d want barbecuing my daddy goat.
“Piper, go on.
What happened next?”“I—I tried to reach my dad, but all I got was his personal assistant, and she told me not to worry.
“Didn’t Medea say something about controlling her?”Piper nodded.
“To get my dad back, I had to sabotage this quest.
I didn’t realize it would be the three of us.
Then after we started the quest,Enceladus sent me another warning: He told me he wanted you two dead.
He wants me to lead you to a mountain.
I don’t know exactly which one, but it’sin the Bay Area—I could see the Golden Gate Bridge from the summit.
I have to be there by noon on the solstice, tomorrow.
An exchange.
She waited for them to yell at her, or turn their backs, or kick her out into the snowstorm.
“God, Piper.
I’m so sorry.
“No kidding.
You’ve been carrying this around for a week? Piper, we could help you.
“Why don’t you yell at me or something? I was ordered to kill you!”“Aw, come on,” Jason said.
“You’ve saved us both on this quest.
I’d put my life in your hands any day.
“Can I have a hug too?”“You don’t get it!” Piper said.
“I’ve probably just killed my dad, telling you this.
He was eating his tofu burger folded inside the paper plate, chewing it all like a taco.
“Giant hasn’t gotten what hewants yet, so he still needs your dad for leverage.
He’ll wait until the deadline passes, see if you show up.
He wants you to divert the quest to thismountain, right?”Piper nodded uncertainly.
“And she has to be saved by the same day.
So you have to choose—rescueyour dad, or rescue Hera.
If you go after Hera, then Enceladus takes care of your dad.
Besides, Enceladus would never let you go even if youcooperated.
You’re obviously one of the seven in the Great Prophecy.
She’d talked about this before with Jason and Leo, and she supposed it must be true, but she still had trouble believing it.
Shedidn’t feel that important.
She was just a stupid child of Aphrodite.
How could she be worth deceiving and killing?“So we have no choice,” she said miserably.
“We have to save Hera, or the giant king gets unleashed.
That’s our quest.
The world depends on it.
He isn’t stupid.
He’ll know if we change course and go the wrong way.
He’ll kill my dad.
“We’ll save him.
“Besides, it’s a trap.
“We’re not going to let your dad die.
We just gotta figure out a plan.
“Would help if we knew where this mountain was.
Maybe Aeolus can tell you that.
The Bay Area has a bad reputation fordemigods.
Old home of the Titans, Mount Othrys, sits over Mount Tam, where Atlas holds up the sky.
I hope that’s not the mountain you saw.
“I don’t think so.
This was inland.
The Bay Area …”“You think you’ve been there?” Piper asked.
Then the anguish came back into his eyes.
“I don’t know.
Hedge, what happenedto Mount Othrys?”Hedge took another bite of paper and burger.
“Well, Kronos built a new palace there last summer.
Big nasty place, was going to be theheadquarters for his new kingdom and all.
Weren’t any battles there, though.
Kronos marched on Manhattan, tried to take Olympus.
If I remember right,he left some other Titans in charge of his palace, but after Kronos got defeated in Manhattan, the whole palace just crumbled on its own.
I—” He tensed, looking toward the cave entrance.
“Did you hear that?”For a second, nothing.
Then Piper heard it: howls piercing the night.
Leo and Coach Hedge got to their feet too.
Piper tried, but black spots danced before her eyes.
“We’ll protect you.
She hated feeling helpless.
She didn’t want anyone to protect her.
First the stupid ankle.
Now stupid hypothermia.
She wantedto be on her feet, with her dagger in her hand.
Maybe a little protection is fine.
Their fangs gleamed, and theirglowing red eyes looked disturbingly intelligent.
The wolf in front was almost as tall as a horse, his mouth stained as if he’d just made a fresh kill.
The fur stood up along his spine.
One ofhis lieutenants tried to advance, but the alpha wolf snapped at his ear.
Then all of the wolves backed into the dark.
“What’d you say, Jason?”Hedge cursed.
“Whatever it was, it wasn’t enough.
Look.
They didn’t attack.
They waited—at least a dozen now, in a rough semicircle justoutside the firelight, blocking the cave exit.
“Here’s the plan.
I’ll kill them all, and you guys escape.
“They respect a pack.
And Hedge, no crazy stuff.
We’re not leaving you or anyone else behind.
She was the weak link in their “pack” right now.
No doubt the wolves could smell her fear.
She might as well bewearing a sign that said free lunch.
His hair was greasy and ragged, the color of fireplace soot, topped with a crown of whatlooked like finger bones.
His robes were tattered fur—wolf, rabbit, raccoon, deer, and several others Piper couldn’t identify.
The furs didn’t look cured,and from the smell, they weren’t very fresh.
His frame was lithe and muscular, like a distance runner’s.
But the most horrible thing was his face.
His thinpale skin was pulled tight over his skull.
His teeth were sharpened like fangs.
His eyes glowed bright red like his wolves’—and they fixed on Jason withabsolute hatred.
“Tell your faun to mind his tongue, son of Rome.
Or he’ll be my first snack.
Now, if she could remember who this wolf guy was inGreek mythology, and how to defeat him, that she could use.
His nostrils twitched.
“So it’s true,” he mused.
“A child of Aphrodite.
A son of Hephaestus.
A faun.
And a childof Rome, of Lord Jupiter, no less.
All together, without killing each other.
How interesting.
“By whom?”The man snarled—perhaps a laugh, perhaps a challenge.
“Oh, we’ve been patrolling for you all across the west, demigod, hoping we’d be the first tofind you.
The giant king will reward me well when he rises.
I am Lycaon, king of the wolves.
And my pack is hungry.
She knew she’d heard it before, but she couldn’t remember details.
He moved to each side as if looking for an opening, but Jason’s blade moved with him.
“There’s no food for you here.
Apparently he wasn’t a tofu fan.
Your father made me what I am.
I was the powerful mortal king of Arcadia,with fifty fine sons, and Zeus slew them all with his lightning bolts.
“For good reason!”Jason glanced over his shoulder.
“Coach, you know this clown?”“I do,” Piper answered.
The details of the myth came back to her—a short, horrible story she and her father had laughed at over breakfast.
Shewasn’t laughing now.
“But the king wasn’t sure it was really Zeus.
So to test his powers, Lycaon tried to feed him human flesh.
The wolves behind him howled too.
“They call… they call werewolves lycanthropes, named after him, the first werewolf.
“An immortal, smelly, vicious mutt.
“I will tear you apart, faun!”“Oh, you want some goat, buddy? ’Cause I’ll give you goat.
“Lycaon, you said you wanted to kill me first, but.
Since this one”—he waggled his claws at Piper—“has failed to kill you, you are to be delivered alive tothe Wolf House.
One of my compatriots has asked for the honor of killing you herself.
“Oh, a great admirer of yours.
Apparently, you made quite an impression on her.
She will take care of you soon enough, andreally I cannot complain.
Spilling your blood at the Wolf House should mark my new territory quite well.
Lupa will think twice about challenging my pack.
She didn’t understand everything Lycaon had said, but a woman who wanted to kill Jason? Medea, shethought.
Somehow, she must’ve survived the explosion.
Spots danced before her eyes again.
The cave seemed to spin.
Shivering in her blankets, pale and sweaty and barely able to hold a knife, she couldn’thave looked very threatening.
“A brave try, girl.
Perhaps I’ll make your end quick.
Only the son of Jupiter is needed alive.
The rest of you, I’m afraid, are dinner.
But at least she’d die on her feet, fighting next to Jason.
“You’re not killing anyone, wolf man.
Not without going through me.
Jason slashed at him, but his golden sword passed straight through as if the wolf king wasn’t there.
“Gold, bronze, steel—none of these are any good against my wolves, son of Jupiter.
“Aren’t werewolves hurt by silver?”“We don’t have any silver!” Jason said.
Hedge charged forward with an elated “Woot!”But Leo struck first.
He threw his glass bottle and it shattered on the ground, splattering liquid all over the wolves—the unmistakable smell ofgasoline.
He shot a burst of fire at the puddle, and a wall of flames erupted.
Several caught fire and had to run back into the snow.
Even Lycaon looked uneasily at the barrier of flames nowseparating his wolves from the demigods.
“I can’t hit them if they’re way over there.
“I can’t summon any more gas!” Leo warned.
Then his face turned red.
“Wow, that came out wrong.
I mean the burningkind.
What you got, man?”“Nothing,” Jason said.
“Not even a weapon that works.
“I think the snowstorm is interfering, or something.
“We’ll have come all this way for nothing.
“I can smell your fear.
A few more minutes of life, heroes.
Pray to whatever gods you wish.
Zeus did not grant me mercy, and you willhave none from me.
Jason cursed and dropped his sword.
He crouched like he was ready to go hand-to-hand.
Leo pulled his hammerout of his pack.
Piper raised her dagger—not much, but it was all she had.
Coach Hedge hefted his club, and he was the only one who looked excitedabout dying.
A long stick sprouted from the neck of the nearest wolf—the shaft of asilver arrow.
The wolf writhed and fell, melting into a puddle of shadow.
More wolves fell.
The pack broke in confusion.
An arrow flashed toward Lycaon, but the wolf king caught it in midair.
Then he yelled inpain.
When he dropped the arrow, it left a charred, smoking gash across his palm.
Another arrow caught him in the shoulder, and the wolf kingstaggered.
He growled at his pack, and the wolves turned and ran.
Lycaon fixed Jason with those glowing red eyes.
“This isn’tover, boy.
A smaller whitewolf burst into the cave, followed by two more.
“Wait.
All of them carried bows,with quivers of glowing silver arrows on their backs.
One, a little taller than the rest, crouched in the firelight and snatched upthe arrow that had wounded Lycaon’s hand.
“Phoebe, stay with me.
Watch the entrance.
The rest of you, follow Lycaon.
We can’t lose him now.
I’llcatch up with you.
“We’ve been following that demon’s trail for over a week.
Is everyone allright? No one got bit?”Jason stood frozen, staring at the girl.
Piper realized something about her voice sounded familiar.
It was hard to pin down, but the way she spoke,the way she formed her words, reminded her of Jason.
“You’re Thalia.
Piper was afraid she might draw her bow, but instead she pulled down her parka hood.
Her hair was spiky black, with a silver tiaraacross her brow.
Her face had a super-healthy glow to it, as if she were a little more than human, and her eyes were brilliant blue.
She was the girl fromJason’s photograph.
“This might be a shock, but—”“Thalia.
“I’m Jason, your brother.
Why didn’t he get to have the long-lost sister or the movie star dad who neededrescuing? All he got was a tool belt and a dragon that broke down halfway through the quest.
Maybe it was the stupid curse of the Hephaestus cabin, butLeo didn’t think so.
His life had been unlucky way before he got to camp.
Then he thought he’d better not say that or he’d get introuble.
He liked her dark hair, her blue eyes, and her confident attitude.
She looked like the kind of girl who could stomp anybody on the ball court or thebattlefield, and wouldn’t give Leo the time of day—just Leo’s type!For a minute, Jason and Thalia faced each other, stunned.
Then Thalia rushed forward and hugged him.
“Thank Artemis, it is you.
Thatlittle scar on your lip—you tried to eat a stapler when you were two!”Leo laughed.
“Seriously?”Hedge nodded like he approved of Jason’s taste.
“Staplers —excellent source of iron.
“Who told you I was dead? What happened?”At the cave entrance, one of the white wolves barked.
Thalia looked back at the wolf and nodded, but she kept her hands on Jason’s face, like shewas afraid he might vanish.
“My wolf is telling me I don’t have much time, and she’s right.
But we have to talk.
Let’s sit.
She collapsed.
She would’ve cracked her head on the cave floor if Hedge hadn’t caught her.
“What’s wrong with her? Ah—never mind.
I see.
Hypothermia.
Ankle.
“Don’t you know nature healing?”Hedge scoffed.
“Why do you think she looks this good? Can’t you smell the Gatorade?”Thalia looked at Leo for the first time, and of course it was an accusatory glare, like Why did you let the goat be a doctor? As if that was Leo’s fault.
Phoebe’s an excellent healer.
“I’ll freeze my horns off.
“Come on, Hedge.
These two need time to talk.
Fine,” the satyr muttered.
“Didn’t even get to brain anybody.
Leo was about to follow when Jason called, “Actually, man, could you, um, stick around?”Leo saw something in Jason’s eyes he didn’t expect: Jason was asking for support.
He wanted somebody else there.
He was scared.
“Sticking around is my specialty.
For a few minutes, nobody spoke.
Jason studied his sister like she was ascary device—one that might explode if handled incorrectly.
Thalia seemed more at ease, as if she was used to stumbling across stranger things thanlong-lost relatives.
But still she regarded Jason in a kind of amazed trance, maybe remembering a little two-year-old who tried to eat a stapler.
Leo tooka few pieces of copper wire out of his pockets and twisted them together.
“So … the Hunters of Artemis.
This whole ‘not dating’ thing—is that like always, or more of a seasonal thing, orwhat?”Thalia stared at him as if he’d just evolved from pond scum.
Yeah, he was definitely liking this girl.
“Don’t mind Leo.
He’s just trying to break the ice.
But, Thalia … what happened to our family? Who told you I wasdead?”Thalia tugged at a silver bracelet on her wrist.
In the firelight, in her winter camouflage, she almost looked like Khione the snow princess—just ascold and beautiful.
“I woke up three days ago on a bus with Leo and Piper.
“Hera stole his memories.
“Hera? How do you know that?”Jason explained about their quest—the prophecy at camp, Hera getting imprisoned, the giant taking Piper’s dad, and the winter solstice deadline.
Nothing seemed to surprise her—the monsters, the prophecies, the dead rising.
But when Jason mentioned King Midas,she cursed in Ancient Greek.
“That man’s a menace.
But we were so intent on following Lycaon—Well, I’m glad you gotaway.
So Hera’s been … what, hiding you all these years?”“I don’t know.
“She left me just enough memory to recognize your face.
“I’d forgotten about that.
I left it in Cabin One, didn’t I?”Jason nodded.
“I think Hera wanted for us to meet.
When we landed here, at this cave … I had a feeling it was important.
Like I knew you were closeby.
Is that crazy?”“Nah,” Leo assured him.
“We were absolutely destined to meet your hot sister.
Probably she just didn’t want to let on how much Leo impressed her.
But you can’t trust Hera, especially since we’re children of Zeus.
Shehates all children of Zeus.
Does that make any sense?”The color drained from Thalia’s face.
“Oh, gods.
Mother wouldn’t have … You don’t remember—No, of course you don’t.
“Jason … I’m not sure how to say this.
Our momwasn’t exactly stable.
She caught Zeus’s eye because she was a television actress, and she was beautiful, but she didn’t handle the fame well.
Shedrank, pulled stupid stunts.
She was always in the tabloids.
She could never get enough attention.
Even before you were born, she and I argued all thetime.
She … she knew Dad was Zeus, and I think that was too much for her to take.
It was like the ultimate achievement for her to attract the lord of thesky, and she couldn’t accept it when he left.
The thing about the gods… well, they don’t hang around.
But she’d never acted mad about it.
She’d dealt with working a dead-end job, living in a tiny apartment,never having enough money—and she’d seemed fine with it.
As long as she had Leo, she always said, life would be okay.
He might have had some hard times.
But at least he remembered her.
He found himself tapping out a Morse codemessage on his knee: Love you.
He felt bad for Jason, not having memories like that—not having anything to fall back on.
“Now you got a sister.
You’re not alone.
I think he felt bad about wrecking her life, and he seemed—differentsomehow.
A little older and sterner, more fatherly toward me.
For a while, Mom improved.
She loved having Zeus around, bringing her presents, causingthe sky to rumble.
She always wanted more attention.
That’s the year you were born.
Mom … well, I never got along with her, but you gave me a reason tohang around.
You were so cute.
Of course, Zeus eventually stopped coming by again.
He probably couldn’t stand Mom’s demands anymore,always pestering him to let her visit Olympus, or to make her immortal or eternally beautiful.
When he left for good, Mom got more and more unstable.
Mom blamed Hera.
She claimed the goddess was coming after you too—that Hera hadbarely tolerated my birth, but two demigod children from the same family was too big an insult.
Mom even said she hadn’t wanted to name you Jason, butZeus insisted, as a way to appease Hera because the goddess liked that name.
I didn’t know what to believe.
He felt like an intruder.
He shouldn’t be listening to this, but it also made him feel like he was getting to know Jasonfor the first time—like maybe being here now made up for those four months at Wilderness School, when Leo had just imagined they’d had a friendship.
“If I’d known you were alive … gods, things would’ve been so different.
But when you were two, Mom packed usin the car for a family vacation.
We drove up north, toward the wine country, to this park she wanted to show us.
I remember thinking it was strangebecause Mom never took us anywhere, and she was acting super nervous.
I was holding your hand, walking you toward this big building in the middle ofthe park, and …” She took a shaky breath.
“Mom told me to go back to the car and get the picnic basket.
I didn’t want to leave you alone with her, but itwas only for a few minutes.
When I came back … Mom was kneeling on the stone steps, hugging herself and crying.
She said—she said you were gone.
I didn’t know what she’d done.
I was afraid she’d completely lost her mind.
I ran all over theplace looking for you, but you’d just vanished.
She had to drag me away, kicking and screaming.
For the next few days I was hysterical.
I don’t remembereverything, but I called the police on Mom and they questioned her for a long time.
Afterward, we fought.
She told me I’d betrayed her, that I shouldsupport her, like she was the only one who mattered.
Finally I couldn’t stand it.
Your disappearance was the last straw.
I ran away from home, and I neverwent back, not even when Mom died a few years ago.
I thought you were gone forever.
I never told anyone about you—not even Annabeth or Luke, mytwo best friends.
It was just too painful.
“When I got to camp, he took one look at me and said, ‘You should be dead.
“I never told him.
“Important thing is you’ve got each other now, right? You two are lucky.
“Leo’s right.
Look at you.
You’re my age.
You’ve grown up.
“How could I be missing all that time? And the Roman stuff …”Thalia frowned.
“The Roman stuff?”“Your brother speaks Latin,” Leo said.
“He calls gods by their Roman names, and he’s got tattoos.
Thenhe gave Thalia the rundown about the other weird stuff that had happened: Boreas turning into Aquilon, Lycaon calling Jason a “child of Rome,” and thewolves backing off when Jason spoke Latin to them.
“Latin.
Zeus sometimes spoke Latin, the second time he stayed with Mom.
Like I said, he seemed different, moreformal.
“And that’s why I think of myself as a child of Jupiter?”“Possibly,” Thalia said.
“I’ve never heard of something like that happening, but it might explain why you think in Roman terms, why you can speakLatin rather than Ancient Greek.
That would make you unique.
Still, it doesn’t explain how you’ve survived without Camp Half-Blood.
A child of Zeus, orJupiter, or whatever you want to call him—you would’ve been hounded by monsters.
If you were on your own, you should’ve died years ago.
I know Iwouldn’t have been able to survive without friends.
You would’ve needed training, a safe haven—”“He wasn’t alone,” Leo blurted out.
“We’ve heard about others like him.
“What do you mean?”Leo told her about the slashed-up purple shirt in Medea’s department store, and the story the Cyclopes told about the child of Mercury who spokeLatin.
“I mean besides Camp Half-Blood? Maybe some crazy Latin teacher has been abductingchildren of the gods or something, making them think like Romans.
Thalia’s dazzling blue eyes studied him intently, making him feel like a suspect in alineup.
“I’ve never seen evidence of a crazy Latin teacher, or demigods in purple shirts.
Still …” Her voicetrailed off, like she’d just had a troubling thought.
“I’ll have to talk to the goddess.
Maybe Artemis will guide us.
“Most of the gods have gone silent.
“She has to be careful not to let Zeus know, but she thinks Zeus is being ridiculous closing Olympus.
She said we’d find a lead to a missing friend of ours.
“The guy Annabeth is looking for.
He kind of doubted it.
“And how does it connect to us?”“We need to find out soon,” Thalia admitted.
“If your deadline is tomorrow, we’re wasting time.
Aeolus could tell you—”The white wolf appeared again at the doorway and yipped insistently.
“Otherwise I’ll lose the other Hunters’ trail.
First, though, I’ll take you to Aeolus’s palace.
“I haven’t had a brother in years.
I think I can stand a few minutes with you before you get annoying.
Piperlooked back to normal, decked out in a new parka, gloves, and camo pants like a Hunter.
She and Hedge and Phoebe were kicking back, drinking hotchocolate.
“We’ve been sitting in a cave and you get the luxury tent? Somebody give me hypothermia.
I want hot chocolate and a parka!”Phoebe sniffed.
“Boys,” she said, like it was the worst insult she could think of.
“They’ll need extra coats.
And I think we can spare some chocolate.
The hot chocolatewas first-rate.
He crunched down his plastic thermos cup.
“You up for moving?”Piper nodded.
“Thanks to Phoebe, yeah.
You guys are really good at this wilderness survival thing.
I feel like I could run ten miles.
“She’s tough for a child of Aphrodite.
I like this one.
“Tough Hephaestus kid here.
Let’s hit it.
The tent self-collapsed into a square the size of a pack of chewinggum.
Leo wanted to ask her for the blueprints, but they didn’t have time.
“Come on, Valdez! Pick upthe pace! Let’s chant.
I’ve got a girl in Kalamazoo—”“Let’s not,” Thalia snapped.
“How you doing, man?”Jason’s expression was enough of an answer: Not good.
“Like it’s no big deal that I appeared.
I didn’t know what I was expecting, but … she’s not like me.
She seemsso much more together.
“Plus, she’s had more time to get used to this whole demigod thing.
You fight monsters and talk to godsfor a while, you probably get used to surprises.
“I just wish I understood what happened when I was two, why my mom got rid of me.
Thalia ran away because of me.
And your sister is pretty cool.
She’s a lot like you.
Leo wondered if he’d said the right things.
He wanted to make Jason feel better, but this was way outside his comfortzone.
That would be a lot easier than trying to talk it through.
Not good with organic life forms.
Thanks for those inherited traits,Dad.
He slammed into Thalia and nearly sent them both down the side of themountain the hard way.
Fortunately, the Hunter was light on her feet.
She steadied them both, then pointed up.
Below them the world was blanketed in clouds.
The air was so thin, Leo could hardly breathe.
Night hadset in, but a full moon shone and the stars were incredible.
Stretching out to the north and south, peaks of other mountains rose from the clouds likeislands—or teeth.
Hovering in the sky, about a quarter mile away, was a massive free-floating island of glowing purple stone.
It washard to judge its size, but Leo figured it was at least as wide as a football stadium and just as tall.
The sides were rugged cliffs, riddled with caves, andevery once in a while a gust of wind burst out with a sound like a pipe organ blast.
At the top of the rock, brass walls ringed some kind of a fortress.
As the winds changed direction, the bridge snaked around—blurring andthinning, in some places even breaking into a dotted line like the vapor trail of a plane.
“I’m not a big fan of heights, I’ll admit.
But if you want to get to Aeolus’s fortress, this is the only way.
“How can people not notice it sitting on top of Pikes Peak?”“The Mist,” Thalia said.
“Still, mortals do notice it indirectly.
Some days, Pikes Peak looks purple.
People say it’s a trick of the light, but actually it’sthe color of Aeolus’s palace, reflecting off the mountain face.
“You should see Olympus, little brother.
“We should go across in two different groups.
The bridge is fragile.
“Jason, can’t you just fly us up there?”Thalia laughed.
Then she seemed to realize Leo’s question wasn’t a joke.
“Wait … Jason, you can fly?”Jason gazed up at the floating fortress.
“Well, sort of.
More like I can control the winds.
But the winds up here are so strong, I’m not sure I’d want totry.
Thalia, you mean … you can’t fly?”For a second, Thalia looked genuinely afraid.
Then she got her expression under control.
Leo realized she was a lot more scared of heights thanshe was letting on.
Might be better if we stuck to the bridge.
Amazingly, it held his weight.
“Easy! I’ll go first.
Piper, come on,girl.
I’ll give you a hand.
“Phoebe, I’ll be back soon.
Go find the others.
Tell them I’m on my way.
“It hardly ever breaks.
Piper and Hedge had already made it safely to the top and were waving at them,encouraging them to keep climbing, but Leo got distracted.
He was thinking about bridges—how he would design something way more stable than thisshifting ice vapor business if this were his palace.
He was pondering braces and support columns.
Then a sudden revelation stopped him in his tracks.
“Leo, this isn’t a good place to stop.
What do you mean?”“They’re wind spirits,” Leo said.
“Can’t they fly?”“Yes, but sometimes they need a way to connect to the world below.
“The wind spirits don’t like to anchor to the earth, but sometimes it’s necessary.
Like now.
They know you’re coming.
He was so excited he could almost feel his body’s temperature rising.
He couldn’t quite put his thoughts into words, but heknew he was on to something important.
“What are you thinking?”“Oh, gods,” Thalia said.
“Keep moving.
Look at your feet.
With horror, he realized his body temperature really was rising, just as it had years ago at that picnic table under the pecantree, when his anger had gotten away from him.
Now, excitement was causing the reaction.
His pants steamed in the cold air.
His shoes were literallysmoking, and the bridge didn’t like it.
The ice was thinning.
“You’re going to melt it.
But his body was overheating on its own, running as fast as his thoughts.
“Listen, Jason, what did Hera call you in that dream? Shecalled you a bridge.
“I don’t what you’re talking about, but the bridge is—”“Just listen,” Leo insisted.
“If Jason is a bridge, what’s he connecting? Maybe two different places that normally don’t get along—like the air palaceand the ground.
You had to be somewhere before this, right? And Hera said you were an exchange.
“Oh, gods.
“What are you two talking about?”Thalia murmured something like a prayer.
“I understand now why Artemis sent me here.
Jason—she told me to hunt for Lycaon and I would find a clueabout Percy.
You are the clue.
Artemis wanted us to meet so I could hear your story.
“I don’t have a story.
I don’t remember anything.
“It’s all connected.
If we just knew where—”Leo snapped his fingers.
“Jason, what did you call that place in your dream? That ruined house.
The Wolf House?”Thalia nearly choked.
“The Wolf House? Jason, why didn’t you tell me that! That’s where they’re keeping Hera?”“You know where it is?” Jason asked.
Leo would’ve fallen to his death, but Jason grabbed his coat and pulled him to safety.
The two of them scrambled up thebridge, and when they turned, Thalia was on the other side of a thirty-foot chasm.
The bridge was continuing to melt.
“Find out where the giant is keeping Piper’s dad.
Save him! I’ll take the Hunters to theWolf House and hold it until you can get there.
We can do both!”“But where is the Wolf House?” Jason shouted.
Leo was pretty sure she said: “I’llsee you there.
I promise.
They climbed for their lives, the ice vapor thinning under their feet.
Several times, Jason grabbed Leoand used the winds to keep them aloft, but it was more like bungee jumping than flying.
They stoodgasping for breath at the base of a stone stairway chiseled into the side of the cliff, leading up to the fortress.
The top of Pikes Peak floated below them in a sea of clouds, but there was no sign of Thalia.
And Leo had just burned theironly exit.
“Leo, why are your clothes smoking?”“I got a little heated,” he gasped.
“Sorry, Jason.
Honest.
I didn’t—”“It’s all right,” Jason said, but his expression was grim.
“We’ve got less than twenty-four hours to rescue a goddess and Piper’s dad.
Let’s go see theking of the winds.
As they climbed the cliffs of the floating island, he kept looking back, but Thalia was gone.
She’d found a new family with the Hunters, and a new mother in Artemis.
Sheseemed so confident and comfortable with her life, Jason wasn’t sure if he’d ever be part of it.
And she seemed so set on finding her friend Percy.
Hadshe ever searched for Jason that way?Not fair, he told himself.
She thought you were dead.
It was almost like Thalia had handed him a baby—a really loud, ugly baby—and said,Here, this is yours.
Carry it.
He didn’t want to carry it.
He didn’t want to look at it or claim it.
He didn’t want to know that he had an unstable mother who’dgotten rid of him to appease a goddess.
No wonder Thalia had run away.
Their dad wasn’t much of a bargain, either.
Jason understood why Thalia had renounced that part of her life too, but he was still resentful.
Hecouldn’t be so lucky.
He was left holding the bag —literally.
The closer they got to Aeolus’s palace, the heavier the bag got.
The windsstruggled, rumbling and bumping around.
He kept bounding up the slippery staircase and trotting back down.
“Come on,cupcakes! Only a few thousand more steps!”As they climbed, Leo and Piper left Jason in his silence.
Maybe they could sense his bad mood.
Piper kept glancing back, worried, as if he were theone who’d almost died of hypothermia rather than she.
Or maybe she was thinking about Thalia’s idea.
They’d told her what Thalia had said on thebridge—how they could save both her dad and Hera—but Jason didn’t really understand how they were going to do that, and he wasn’t sure if thepossibility had made Piper more hopeful or just more anxious.
He wasn’t steaming anymore, but the incident on the ice bridge hadreally freaked Jason out.
Leo hadn’t seemed to realize that he had smoke coming out his ears and flames dancing through his hair.
If Leo startedspontaneously combusting every time he got excited, they were going to have a tough time taking him anywhere.
Jason imagined trying to get food at arestaurant.
I’ll have a cheeseburger and—Ahhh! My friend’s on fire! Get me a bucket!Mostly, though, Jason worried about what Leo had said.
Jason didn’t want to be a bridge, or an exchange, or anything else.
He just wanted to knowwhere he’d come from.
And Thalia had looked so unnerved when Leo mentioned the burned-out house in his dreams—the place the wolf Lupa had toldhim was his starting point.
How did Thalia know that place, and why did she assume Jason could find it?The answer seemed close.
But the nearer Jason got to it, the less it cooperated, like the winds on his back.
Bronze walls marched all the way around the fortress grounds, though Jason couldn’t imagine who wouldpossibly attack this place.
Twenty-foot-high gates opened for them, and a road of polished purple stone led up to the main citadel—a white-columnedrotunda, Greek style, like one of the monuments in Washington, D.C.—except for the cluster of satellite dishes and radio towers on the roof.
“Dang, check this guy’s front yard.
The grounds were amazing in a scary way.
They were divided into four sections like big pizzaslices, each one representing a season.
Snowmen rolled across the landscape as the wind blew, so Jasonwasn’t sure if they were decorations or alive.
Mounds of leaves blew into patterns—gods, people, animals that ran after each otherbefore scattering back into leaves.
One looked like a green pasture with sheep made out of clouds.
The lastsection was a desert where tumbleweeds scratched strange patterns in the sand like Greek letters, smiley faces, and a huge advertisement that read:watch aeolus nightly!“One section for each of the four wind gods,” Jason guessed.
“Four cardinal directions.
“You guys mind—”“Go ahead,” Jason said.
He was actually relieved to send the satyr off.
It would be hard enough getting on Aeolus’s good side without Coach Hedgewaving his club and screaming, “Die!”While the satyr ran off to attack springtime, Jason, Leo, and Piper walked down the road to the steps of the palace.
They passed through the frontdoors into a white marble foyer decorated with purple banners that read olympian weather channel, and some that just read ow!“Hello!” A woman floated up to them.
Literally floated.
She was pretty in that elfish way Jason associated with nature spirits at Camp Half-Blood—petite, slightly pointy ears, and an ageless face that could’ve been sixteen or thirty.
Her brown eyes twinkled cheerfully.
Even though there was no wind,her dark hair blew in slow motion, shampoo-commercial style.
Her white gown billowed around her like parachute material.
Jason couldn’t tell if she hadfeet, but if so, they didn’t touch the floor.
She had a white tablet computer in her hand.
“Are you from Lord Zeus?” she asked.
“We’ve been expecting you.
Her shape faded in and out likeshe was made of fog.
The smile turned into a pout.
“I’m an aura, sir.
A wind nymph, as you might expect, working for the lord of thewinds.
My name is Mellie.
We don’t have ghosts.
“No, of course you don’t! My friend simply mistook you for Helen of Troy, the most beautiful mortal of all time.
It’s an easymistake.
The compliment seemed a little over the top, but Mellie the aura blushed.
“Oh … well, then.
So you are from Zeus?”“Er,” Jason said, “I’m the son of Zeus, yeah.
She didn’t lookwhere she was going, but apparently it didn’t matter as she drifted straight through a marble column with no problem.
“We’re out of prime time now, sothat’s good,” she mused.
“I can fit you in right before his 11:12 spot.
Winds blasted around them, so Jason felt like he was pushing through an invisible crowd.
Doors blew openand slammed by themselves.
Paper airplanes of all different sizes and shapes sped around, and other wind nymphs, aurai,would occasionally pluck them out of the air, unfold and read them, then toss them back into the air, where the planes would refold themselves and keepflying.
She looked like a mix between an old lady and a chicken on steroids.
She had a wrinkled face with black hair tied ina hairnet, arms like a human plus wings like a chicken, and a fat, feathered body with talons for feet.
It was amazing she could fly at all.
She kept driftingaround and bumping into things like a parade balloon.
“That’s a harpy, of course.
Our, ah, ugly stepsisters, I suppose you would say.
Don’t you have harpies on Olympus? They’re spirits ofviolent gusts, unlike us aurai.
We’re all gentle breezes.
Above the interior door, a green light blinked.
“He probably won’t kill you if we go in now.
Come along!”JASON’S JAW DROPPED. THE CENTRAL SECTION of Aeolus’s fortress was as big as a cathedral, with a soaring domed roof covered in silver.
Televisionequipment floated randomly through the air—cameras, spotlights, set pieces, potted plants.
And there was no floor.
Leo almost fell into the chasm beforeJason pulled him back.
“Hey, Mellie.
A little warning next time!”An enormous circular pit plunged into the heart of the mountain.
It was probably half a mile deep, honeycombed with caves.
Some of the tunnelsprobably led straight outside.
Jason remembered seeing winds blast out of them when they’d been on Pikes Peak.
Other caves were sealed with someglistening material like glass or wax.
The whole cavern bustled with harpies, aurai, and paper airplanes, but for someone who couldn’t fly, it would be avery long, very fatal fall.
“I’m so sorry.
Could we get a floor in the main studio, please? Yes, a solid one.
Thanks.
In no time there was a makeshift floorsnaking out over the chasm.
It was made of plywood, marble blocks, carpet squares, wedges of grass sod—just about anything.
“The harpies are very good.
She just drifted across without touching the floor, but Jason decided he had the best chance at surviving, since he could fly, so hestepped out first.
Amazingly, the floor held.
“If I fall, you’re catching me.
“You’re catching me, too, Superman.
But I ain’t holding your hand.
A manhovered inside, checking monitors and reading paper airplane messages.
She pushed a forty-two-inch Sony out of their way and led them into the controlarea.
“I got to get a room like this.
Some Jason recognized—news broadcasts, mostly—but some programs looked alittle strange: gladiators fighting, demigods battling monsters.
Maybe they were movies, but they looked more like reality shows.
He had a remote control in each hand and was pointing them at various screens,seemingly at random.
Helooked like he was in his sixties, with a shock of white hair, but he had a ton of stage makeup on, and that smooth plastic-surgery look to his face, so heappeared not really young, not really old, just wrong—like a Ken doll someone had halfway melted in a microwave.
His eyes darted back and forth fromscreen to screen, like he was trying to absorb everything at once.
He muttered things into his phone, and his mouth kept twitching.
He was eitheramused, or crazy, or both.
“Ah, sir, Mr.
Aeolus, these demigods—”“Hold it!” He held up a hand to silence her, then pointed at one of the screens.
“Watch!”It was one of those storm-chaser programs, where insane thrill-seekers drive after tornados.
As Jason watched, a Jeep plowed straight into a funnelcloud and got tossed into the sky.
“The Disaster Channel.
People do that on purpose!” He turned toward Jason with a mad grin.
“Isn’t that amazing? Let’swatch it again.
“You’re back.
How did it go?”Jason hesitated.
“Sorry? I think you’ve mistaken me—”“No, no, Jason Grace, aren’t you? It was—what—last year? You were on your way to fight a sea monster, I believe.
“Must not have been a very good sea monster! No, I remember every hero who’s ever come to me for aid.
Odysseus—gods, hedocked at my island for a month! At least you only stayed a few days.
Now, watch this video.
These ducks get sucked straight into—”“Sir,” Mellie interrupted.
“Two minutes to air.
“I love air.
How do I look? Makeup!”Immediately a small tornado of brushes, blotters, and cotton balls descended on Aeolus.
They blurred across his face in a cloud of flesh-tone smokeuntil his coloration was even more gruesome than before.
Wind swirled through his hair and left it sticking up like a frosted Christmas tree.
Aeolus.
“We brought you these rogue storm spirits.
“Well, how nice.
“Boreas sent us to capture them for you.
We hope you’ll accept them and stop—you know—orderingdemigods to be killed.
“Demigods be killed—did I order that?”Mellie checked her computer tablet.
“Yes, sir, fifteenth of September.
‘Storm spirits released by the death of Typhon, demigods to be heldresponsible,’ etc… yes, a general order for them all to be killed.
“I was just grumpy.
Rescind that order, Mellie, and um, who’s on guard duty—Teriyaki?—Teri, take these storm spirits downto cell block Fourteen E, will you?”A harpy swooped out of nowhere, snatched the golden bag, and spiraled into the abyss.
“Now, sorry about that kill-on-sight business.
But gods, I really was mad, wasn’t I?” His face suddenly darkened, and his suitdid the same, the lapels flashing with lightning.
“You know … I remember now.
Almost seemed like a voice was telling me to give that order.
A little coldtingle on the back of my neck.
A cold tingle on the back of his neck … Why did that sound so familiar? “A … um, voice in your head, sir?”“Yes.
How odd.
Mellie, should we kill them?”“No, sir,” she said patiently.
“They just brought us the storm spirits, which makes everything all right.
“Sorry.
Mellie, let’s send the demigods something nice.
A box of chocolates, perhaps.
Never mind.
Wait, it’s time! I’m on!”Aeolus flew off toward the blue screen as newscast music started to play.
“Well, you know what they say.
If you don’t like his mood, wait five minutes.
That expression ‘whichever way the wind blows’—that was based on him.
“Was I here before?”Mellie blushed.
“I’m sorry, I don’t remember.
I’m Mr.
Aeolus’s new assistant.
I’ve been with him longer than most, but still—not that long.
“Oh …” Mellie thought for a moment.
“I’ve been doing this for … twelve hours?”A voice blared from floating speakers: “And now, weather every twelve minutes! Here’s your forecaster for Olympian Weather—the OW! channel—Aeolus!”Lights blazed on Aeolus, who was now standing in front of the blue screen.
His smile was unnaturally white, and he looked like he’d had so muchcaffeine his face was about to explode.
“Along the eastern seaboard—oh, hold on.
“Sorry, folks! Poseidon is angry with Miami today, so it lookslike that Florida freeze is back on! Sorry, Demeter.
Over in the Midwest, I’m not sure what St.
Louis did to offend Zeus, but you can expect winter storms!Boreas himself is being called down to punish the area with ice.
Bad news, Missouri! No, wait.
Hephaestus feels sorry for central Missouri, so you all willhave much more moderate temperatures and sunny skies.
“Weather isn’t this random.
“And how often are the mortal weathermen right? They talk about fronts and air pressure and moisture, but the weather surprisesthem all the time.
At least Aeolus tells us why it’s so unpredictable.
Very hard job, trying to appease all the gods at once.
It’s enough to drive anyone …”She trailed off, but Jason knew what she meant.
Mad.
Aeolus was completely mad.
“See you in twelve minutes, because I’m sure it’ll change!”The lights shut off, the video monitors went back to random coverage, and just for a moment, Aeolus’s face sagged with weariness.
Then heseemed to remember he had guests, and he put a smile back on.
“I suppose … thanks! And did you want something else? I assume so.
Demigodsalways do.
I know that.
I said I remembered him from before.
Then he laughed so abruptly, Jason almost jumped into the chasm.
“You mean you’re here on behalf of your father this time?Finally! I knew they would send someone to renegotiate my contract!”“Um, what?” Jason asked.
“It’s been what, three thousand years since Zeus made me master of the winds.
Not that I’mungrateful, of course! But really, my contract is so vague.
Obviously I’m immortal, but ‘master of the winds.
Can we start with that?”Jason looked at his friends, mystified.
His business suit turned completely blue—not a cloud in the fabric.
“Marvelous! I mean, I think I’ve shown quite a bitof initiative with the weather channel, eh? And of course I’m in the press all the time.
So many books have been written about me: Into Thin Air , Up in theAir, Gone with the Wind—”“Er, I don’t think those are about you,” Jason said, before he noticed Mellie shaking her head.
“Mellie, they’re biographies of me, aren’t they?”“Absolutely, sir,” she squeaked.
Who has time? But obviously the mortals love me.
So, we’ll change my official title to god of the winds.
Then, aboutsalary and staff—”“Sir,” Jason said, “we’re not from Olympus.
“But—”“I’m the son of Zeus, yes,” Jason said, “but we’re not here to negotiate your contract.
We’re on a quest and we need your help.
“Like last time? Like every hero who comes here? Demigods! It’s always about you, isn’t it?”“Sir, please, I don’t remember last time, but if you helped me once before—”“Sir, please, I don’t remember last time, but if you helped me once before—”“I’m always helping! Well, sometimes I’m destroying, but mostly I’m helping, and sometimes I’m asked to do both at the same time! Why, Aeneas, thefirst of your kind—”“My kind?” Jason asked.
“You mean, demigods?”“Oh, please!” Aeolus said.
“I mean your line of demigods.
You know, Aeneas, son of Venus—the only surviving hero of Troy.
When the Greeksburned down his city, he escaped to Italy, where he founded the kingdom that would eventually become Rome, blah, blah, blah.
That’s what I meant.
“The point being, I was thrown in the middle of that conflict, too! Juno calls up: ‘Oh, Aeolus, destroy Aeneas’s ships for me.
Idon’t like him.
Calm the winds.
“I guess not.
“We hear you know everything.
“Well … that’s true, of course.
For instance, I know that this business here”—he waggledhis fingers at the three of them—“this harebrained scheme of Juno’s to bring you all together is likely to end in bloodshed.
As for you, Piper McLean, Iknow your father is in serious trouble.
It was a photo of Piper with a guy who must’vebeen her dad.
His face did look familiar.
Jason was pretty sure he’d seen him in some movies.
Her hands were shaking.
“This—this is from his wallet.
“All things lost in the wind eventually come to me.
The photo blew away when the Earthborn captured him.
“Now, you, son of Hephaestus … yes, I see your future.
He staggered backward.
“What is it?”“Something I—I drew when I was a kid.
“It’s … yeah, it’s nothing.
“Really? Just the key to your success! Now, where were we? Ah, yes, you wanted information.
Are you sure about that? Sometimesinformation can be dangerous.
Behind him, Mellie shook her head in warning.
“We need to find the lair of Enceladus.
“The giant? Why would you want to go there? He’s horrible! He doesn’t even watch my program!”Piper held up the photo.
“Aeolus, he’s got my father.
We need to rescue him and find out where Hera is being held captive.
“Even I can’t see that, and believe me, I’ve tried.
There’s a veil of magic over Hera’s location—very strong,impossible to locate.
“I’m getting something! Yes, she’s at a place called the Wolf House! Sadly, I don’tknow where that is.
“If you help us find him, we could get the location of the goddess—”“Yeah,” Leo said, catching on.
“And if we save her, she’d be really grateful to you—”“And Zeus might promote you,” Jason finished.
“A promotion—and all you want from me is the giant’s location?”“Well, if you could get us there, too,” Jason amended, “that would be great.
“Oh, he could do that! He often sends helpful winds—”“Mellie, quiet!” Aeolus snapped.
“I have half a mind to fire you for letting these people in under false pretenses.
“Yes, sir.
Sorry, sir.
“But about that help …”Aelous tilted his head as if thinking.
Then Jason realized the wind lord was listening to voices in his earpiece.
“He says … he says it would be better if you could avoid saving her until after the weekend, because hehas a big party planned—Ow! That’s Aphrodite yelling at him, reminding him that the solstice starts at dawn.
She says I should help you.
AndHephaestus… yes.
Hmm.
Very rare they agree on anything.
Hold on …”Jason smiled at his friends.
Finally, they were having some good luck.
Their godly parents were standing up for them.
Coach Hedge waddled in from the lobby, grass all over his face.
Mellie saw him comingacross the makeshift floor and caught her breath.
“Who is that?”Jason stifled a cough.
“That? That’s just Coach Hedge.
Uh, Gleeson Hedge.
He’s our …” Jason wasn’t sure what to call him: teacher, friend,problem?“Our guide.
“Wow, nice place.
Oh! Sod squares.
“And we’re using the sod as a floor.
This is, ah, Mellie—”“An aura.
“Beautiful as a summer breeze.
“It seems so.
You’ll find Enceladus on Mount Diablo.
“That doesn’t sound good.
“I went there once with my dad.
It’s just east of San Francisco Bay.
“Not good.
Not good at all.
“As to getting you there—”Suddenly his face went slack.
He bent over and tapped his earpiece as if it were malfunctioning.
When he straightened again, his eyes were wild.
“She hasn’t spoke to me for centuries.
I can’t—yes, yes I understand.
“I’m sorry, son of Jupiter.
New orders.
You all have to die.
“But—but, sir! Zeus said to help them.
Aphrodite, Hephaestus—”“Mellie!” Aeolus snapped.
“Your job is already on the line.
Besides, there are some orders that transcend even the wishes of the gods, especiallywhen it comes to the forces of nature.
“Zeus will fire you if you don’t help us!”“I doubt it.
Jason could hear storm spirits screaming out of it, spiraling uptoward them, howling for blood.
“And if she is waking—by all the gods—she cannot be denied.
Good-bye, heroes.
I’mterribly sorry, but I’ll have to make this quick.
I’m back on the air in four minutes.
Coach Hedge pulled out his club.
Mellie the aura yelled, “No!”She dived at their feet just as the storm spirits hit with hurricane force, blasting the floor to pieces, shredding the carpet samples and marble andlinoleum into what should’ve been lethal projectiles, had Mellie’s robes not spread out like a shield and absorbed the brunt of the impact.
The five of themfell into the pit, and Aeolus screamed above them, “Mellie, you are so fired!”“Quick,” Mellie yelled.
“Son of Zeus, do you have any power over the air?”“A little!”“Then help me, or you’re all dead!” Mellie grabbed his hand, and an electric charge went through Jason’s arm.
He understood what she needed.
The storm spirits were following them down, closing rapidly, bringing with them a cloudof deadly shrapnel.
“Group hug!”Hedge, Leo, and Piper tried to huddle together, hanging on to Jason and Mellie as they fell.
“I’ll pulverize you!”“He’s magnificent,” Mellie sighed.
Still, they slammed into the tunnel at painful speed andwent rolling over each other down a steep vent that was not designed for people.
There was no way they could stop.
Jason and the others clung to her desperately, and they began to slow down, but the storm spirits werescreaming into the tunnel behind them.
“Stay together! When the winds hit—”“You’re doing great, Mellie,” Hedge said.
“My own mama was an aura, you know.
She couldn’t have done better herself.
“Look!”Behind them, the tunnel was turning dark.
Jason could feel his ears pop as the pressure built.
“But I’ll try to shield you, do you one more favor.
“I hope you get a new job.
Then the real winds hit, shooting them into the sky so fast, Jason blackedout.
On the horizon, the Spring Mountains loomed like jagged black teeth, the dim glow of Las Vegasbehind them.
She didn’t want Jason to think she’d dragged himup here on false pretenses.
(Even though her pretenses had been totally false.
One streaked across the sky almostevery minute—a line of white, yellow, or blue fire.
Piper was sure her Grandpa Tom would have some Cherokee myth to explain them, but at the momentshe was busy creating her own story.
“I can’t believe Leo didn’t want to see this.
“Oh, yeah?”“Mm-hmm.
You ever feel like three would be a crowd?”“Yeah,” Jason admitted.
“Like right now.
You know how much trouble we’d get in if we got caught up here?”“Oh, I’d make up something,” Piper said.
“I can be very persuasive.
So you want to dance, or what?”He laughed.
His eyes were amazing, and his smile was even better in the starlight.
“With no music.
At night.
On a rooftop.
Sounds dangerous.
They slow danced a few steps, but it quickly turned into a kiss.
Piper almost couldn’t kiss him again, becauseshe was too busy smiling.
“No punishment.
She was elegant withouttrying, fashionable without effort, stunning without makeup.
After seeing Aeolus with his silly face-lifts and cosmetics, Piper thought this woman lookedeven more astonishing.
There was nothing artificial about her.
Piper couldn’t decide the color of her eyes, or the exact color of her hair.
The womanbecame more and more beautiful, as if her image were aligning itself to Piper’s thoughts—getting as close as possible to Piper’s ideal of beauty.
“Mom?”The goddess smiled.
“You’re only dreaming, my sweet.
If anyone wonders, I wasn’t here.
Okay?”“I—” Piper wanted to ask a thousand questions, but they all crowded together in her head.
Piper thought it looked awesome, but the goddess made a face.
“This isn’t my color, is it? Pity, it’s cute.
Medeareally does have some lovely things here.
“I saw it.
“I suppose that’s why everything’s on sale.
Just a memory, now.
And I’m sorry to pull you out of your other dream.
Muchmore pleasant, I know.
She didn’t know whether she was more angry or embarrassed, but mostly she felt hollow with disappointment.
“It wasn’t real.
Itnever even happened.
So why do I remember it so vividly?”Aphrodite smiled.
“Because you are my daughter, Piper.
You see possibilities much more vividly than others.
You see what could be.
And it stillmight be—don’t give up.
Unfortunately—” The goddess gestured around the department store.
“You have other trials to face, first.
Medea will be back,along with many other enemies.
The Doors of Death have opened.
“You’re a smart one, Piper.
You know.
“The sleeping woman, the one Medea and Midas called their patron.
She’s managed to open a new entrance fromthe Underworld.
She’s letting the dead escape back into the world.
And not just any dead.
The worst, the most powerful, the ones most likely to hate the gods.
“That’s why they don’t stay disintegrated.
Their patron, as you call her, has a special relationship with Tartarus, the spirit of the pit.
“No … thiswould make me look ridiculous.
“You? You can’t look anything but perfect.
“But beauty is about finding the right fit, the most natural fit.
To be perfect, you have to feel perfect about yourself—avoid trying to be something you’re not.
For a goddess, that’s especially hard.
We can change so easily.
“He never got over you.
“Yes … Tristan.
Oh, he was amazing.
So gentle and kind, funny and handsome.
Yet he had so much sadnessinside.
I didn’t want to leave your father, of course.
It’s always so hard, but it was for the best.
If he had realized who I actually was—”“Wait—he didn’t know you were a goddess?”“Of course not.
“I wouldn’t do that to him.
For most mortals, that’s simply too hard to accept.
It can ruin their lives! Askyour friend Jason—lovelyboy, by the way.
His poor mother was destroyed when she found out she’d fallen in love with Zeus.
No, it was much betterTristan believed that I was a mortal woman who left him without explanation.
Better a bittersweet memory than an immortal, unattainable goddess.
Whichbrings me to an important matter …”She opened her hand and showed Piper a glowing glass vial of pink liquid.
“This is one of Medea’s kinder mixtures.
It erases only recent memories.
“You want me to dope my dad? You want me to make him forget what he’s been through?”Aphrodite held up the vial.
The liquid cast a pink glow over her face.
“Your father acts confident, Piper, but he walks a fine line between two worlds.
He fears that he’s shut off an importantpart of himself, and someday it will destroy him.
Now he’s been captured by a giant.
He’s living a nightmare.
Even if he survives … if he has to spend therest of his life with those memories, knowing that gods and spirits walk the earth, it will shatter him.
That’s what our enemy hopes for.
She will break him,and thus break your spirit.
Her dad was the strongest person she knew.
Piper would never take his memories the way Herahad taken Jason’s.
She remembered what her dad had said months ago, at the beach at Big Sur: If I reallybelieved in Ghost Country, or animal spirits, or Greek gods.
I don’t think I could sleep at night.
I’d always be looking for somebody to blame.
“The one controlling the giants?”Aphrodite pursed her lips.
She moved to the next rack, which held battered armor and ripped togas, but Aphrodite looked through them as if theywere designer outfits.
“I’m never given much credit among the gods.
My children are laughed at.
They’re dismissed as conceited andshallow.
“Granted.
Perhaps I’m conceited and shallow, too, sometimes.
A girl has to indulge.
Oh, this is nice.
“No?”“No,” Piper said.
“Are you going to answer my question?”“Patience, my sweet,” the goddess said.
“My point is that love is the most powerful motivator in the world.
It spurs mortals to greatness.
Their noblest,bravest acts are done for love.
“Like Helen starting the Trojan War?”“Ah, Katoptris.
“I’m glad you found it.
I get so much flack for that war, but honestly, Paris and Helen were a cute couple.
And theheroes of that war are immortal now—at least in the memories of men.
Love is powerful, Piper.
It can bring even the gods to their knees.
I told this to myson Aeneas when he escaped from Troy.
He thought he had failed.
He thought he was a loser! But he traveled to Italy—”“And became the forebear of Rome.
You see, Piper, my children can be quite powerful.
You can be quite powerful, because my lineage is unique.
I am closer to the beginning ofcreation than any other Olympian.
“Didn’t you … rise from the sea? Standing on a seashell?”The goddess laughed.
“That painter Botticelli had quite an imagination.
I never stood on a seashell, thank you very much.
But yes, I rose from thesea.
The first beings to rise from Chaos were the Earth and Sky—Gaea and Ouranos.
When their son the Titan Kronos killed Ouranos—”“By chopping him to pieces with a scythe,” Piper remembered.
“Yes.
The pieces of Ouranos fell into the sea.
His immortal essence created sea foam.
And from that foam—”“You were born.
I remember now.
So you’re—”“The last child of Ouranos, who was greater than the gods or the Titans.
So, in a strange way, I’m the eldest Olympian god.
As I said, love is apowerful force.
And you, my daughter, are much more than a pretty face.
Which is why you already know who is waking the giants, and who has the powerto open doors into the deepest parts of the earth.
“The earth itself.
That’s our enemy.
“She has slumbered for eons, but she is slowlywaking.
Even asleep, she is powerful, but once she wakes … we will be doomed.
You must defeat the giants before that happens, and lull Gaea backinto her slumber.
Otherwise the rebellion has only begun.
The dead will continue to rise.
Monsters will regenerate with even greater speed.
The giants willlay waste to the birthplace of the gods.
And if they do that, all civilization will burn.
“She is a cruel deity.
She orchestrated Ouranos’s death.
She gave Kronos the sickle and urged himto kill his own father.
While the Titans ruled the world, she slumbered in peace.
But when the gods overthrew them, Gaea woke again in all her anger andgave birth to a new race—the giants—to destroy Olympus once and for all.
“The rise of the giants.
“Now you know.
What will you do?”“Me?” Piper clenched her fists.
“What am I supposed to do? Put on a pretty dress and sweet-talk Gaea into going back to sleep?”“I wish that would work,” Aphrodite said.
“But no, you will have to find your own strengths, and fight for what you love.
Like my favored ones, Helen andParis.
Like my son Aeneas.
“The first great hero of Rome.
The result will depend on you, Piper, but I will tell you this: Theseven greatest demigods must be gathered to defeat the giants, and that effort will not succeed without you.
When the two sides meet … you will be themediator.
You will determine whether there is friendship or bloodshed.
“I do not always agree with Hera, but she’s taken a bold risk, and I agree it must be done.
Zeushas kept the two sides apart for too long.
Only together will you have the power to save Olympus.
Now, wake, and I hope you like the clothes I picked out.
It was a sunny morning.
The air was brisk but not unpleasant for sitting outside.
At the other tables,a mix of bicyclists, business people, and college kids sat chatting and drinking coffee.
Lots of foot traffic passed in front of quaint little shops.
The street was lined with bottle-brush trees and bloomingazaleas as if winter was a foreign concept.
And they all had new clotheson.
Piper looked down at her own outfit and gasped.
“Mother!”She yelled louder than she meant.
Jason flinched, bumping the table with his knees, and then all of them were awake.
“Fight who? Where?”“Falling!” Leo grabbed the table.
“No—not falling.
Where are we?”Jason blinked, trying to get his bearings.
He focused on Piper and made a little choking sound.
“What are you wearing?”Piper probably blushed.
She was wearing the turquoise dress she’d seen in her dream, with black leggings and black leather boots.
She had on herfavorite silver charm bracelet, even though she’d left that back home in L.A., and her old snowboarding jacket from her dad, which amazingly went withthe outfit pretty well.
She pulled out Katoptris, and judging from the reflection in the blade, she’d gotten her hair done, too.
“It’s my—” She remembered Aphrodite’s warning not to mention that they’d talked.
“It’s nothing.
“Aphrodite strikes again, huh? You’re gonna be the best-dressed warrior in town, beauty queen.
“You look at yourself recently?”“What … oh.
Leo was wearing pinstriped pants, black leather shoes, a white collarless shirt with suspenders, and his toolbelt, Ray-Ban sunglasses, and a porkpie hat.
“I think my dad wore that to his last premiere, minus the tool belt.
“’Course, I look better.
Aphrodite had given him a baggy canary yellow zoot suit with two-tone shoes that fit over his hooves.
He had amatching yellow broad-brimmed hat, a rose-colored shirt, a baby blue tie, and a blue carnation in his lapel, which Hedge sniffed and then ate.
Looking at him, her heart did a little tap dance.
Jason was dressed simply in jeans and a clean purple T-shirt, likehe’d worn at the Grand Canyon.
He had new track shoes on, and his hair was newly trimmed.
His eyes were the same color as the sky.
Aphrodite’smessage was clear: This one needs no improvement.
“Those winds shot us halfway across the country, I’d guess.
We would’vebeen smashed flat on impact, but Mellie’s last gift—a nice soft breeze—cushioned our fall.
“Man, we suck.
“Besides, she couldn’t help herself.
I’ve got that effect on nymphs.
I’ll send her a message when we’re through withthis quest and help her figure something out.
That is one aura I could settle down with and raise a herd of baby goats.
“Anyone else want coffee?”“Coffee!” Hedge’s grin was stained blue from the flower.
“I love coffee!”“Um,” Jason said, “but—money? Our packs?”Piper looked down.
Their packs were at their feet, and everything seemed to still be there.
She reached into her coat pocket and felt two things shehadn’t expected.
One was a wad of cash.
The other was a glass vial—the amnesia potion.
She left the vial in her pocket and brought out the money.
“Allowance? Piper, your mom rocks!”“Waitress!” Hedge called.
“Six double espressos, and whatever these guys want.
Put it on the girl’s tab.
The menus said “Café Verve, Walnut Creek, CA.” And according to the waitress, it was 9 a.
onDecember 21, the winter solstice, which gave them three hours until Enceladus’s deadline.
They could see it on the horizon, right at the end of the street.
After the Rockies, MountDiablo didn’t look very large, nor was it covered in snow.
It seemed downright peaceful, its golden creases marbled with gray-green trees.
But size wasdeceptive with mountains, Piper knew.
It was probably much bigger up close.
And appearances were deceptive too.
Here they were—back in California—supposedly her home—with sunny skies, mild weather, laid-back people, and a plate of chocolate chip scones with coffee.
And only a few miles away,somewhere on that peaceful mountain, a superpowerful, super-evil giant was about to have her father for lunch.
Aphrodite must’ve thought it was important if she’d magicallytransferred it to his new outfit.
“Nothing.
You don’t want to see my kindergarten artwork.
“Aeolus said it was the key to our success.
“Not today.
He was talking about… later.
“Now—what’s our game plan?”Coach Hedge belched.
He’d already had three espressos and a plate of doughnuts, along with two napkins and another flower from the vase on thetable.
He would’ve eaten the silverware, except Piper had slapped his hand.
“Kill everything except Piper’s dad.
Leave.
“There’s more you need to know.
She told them about their realenemy: Gaea.
“Isn’t that Mother Nature? She’s supposed to have, like, flowers in her hair and birds singing around her and deer andrabbits doing her laundry.
“Piper’s telling us some serious stuff, here.
Gaea’s no softie.
I’m not evensure I could take her.
“Really?”Hedge nodded.
“This earth lady—she and her old man the sky were nasty customers.
She couldn’t help looking up at the blue sky, wondering if it had eyes.
“So Ouranos, he’s not the best dad.
He throws their first kids, the Cyclopes, into Tartarus.
That makes Gaea mad, but she bidesher time.
Then they have another set of kids—the twelve Titans—and Gaea is afraid they’ll get thrown into prison too.
So she goes up to her sonKronos—”“The big bad dude,” Leo said.
“The one they defeated last summer.
And Gaea’s the one who gives him the scythe, and tells him, ‘Hey, why don’t I call your dad down here? And while he’s talking to me,distracted, you can cut him to pieces.
Then you can take over the world.
Wouldn’t that be great?’”Nobody said anything.
Piper’s chocolate chip scone didn’t look so appetizing anymore.
Even though she’d heard the story before, she still couldn’tquite get her mind around it.
She tried to imagine a kid so messed up, he would kill his own dad just for power.
Then she imagined a mom so messedup, she would convince her son to do it.
“But Gaea is literally the mother of all bad guys.
She’s so old and powerful, so huge, that it’s hard for herto be fully conscious.
Most of the time, she sleeps, and that’s the way we like her—snoring.
“How can she be asleep?”Gleeson brushed crumbs off his canary yellow lapel.
He was on his sixth espresso now, and his pupils were as big as quarters.
“Even in her sleep,part of her consciousness is active—dreaming, keeping watch, doing little things like causing volcanoes to explode and monsters to rise.
Even now,she’s not fully awake.
Believe me, you don’t want to see her fully awake.
“She’s causing the giants to rise.
And if their king comes back—this guy Porphyrion—”“He’ll raise an army to destroy the gods,” Jason put in.
“Starting with Hera.
It’ll be another war.
And Gaea will wake up fully.
“Which is why it’s a good idea for us to stay off the ground as much as possible.
“So … climbing a mountain.
That would be bad.
First, she’d been asked to betray her friends.
Now they were trying to help her rescue her dad even though they knew they werewalking into a trap.
The idea of fighting a giant had been scary enough.
But the idea that Gaea was behind it—a force more powerful than a god or Titan…“Guys, I can’t ask you to do this,” Piper said.
“This is too dangerous.
“Who’s ready to beat stuff up?”LEO HOPED THE TAXI COULD TAKE THEM all the way to the top.
The cab made lurching, grinding sounds as it climbed the mountain road, and halfway up they found the ranger’s station closed, achain blocking the way.
“You sure about this? Gonna be a long walk back, and my car’s acting funny.
I can’t wait for you.
He had a bad feeling about what was wrong with the cab, and when he looked down he saw he was right.
Not fast—just enough to make the driver think he had a transmission problem or abad axle—but Leo knew different.
No reason at all it should have been soft, but already Leo’s shoes were starting to sink.
Gaea was messing withthem.
He was generous—heck, why not? It was Aphrodite’s money.
Plus, he had a feeling he might neverbe coming off this mountain.
“And get out of here.
Quick.
Soon all they could see was his dust trail.
The whole inland valley around Mount Diablo was a patchwork of towns—grids of tree-lined streetsand nice middle-class suburbs, shops, and schools.
All these normal people living normal lives—the kind Leo had never known.
“Walnut Creek below us.
To the south, Danville, past those hills.
And that way …”He pointed west, where a ridge of golden hills held back a layer of fog, like the rim of a bowl.
“That’s the Berkeley Hills.
The East Bay.
Past that, SanFrancisco.
“You remember something? You’ve been here?”“Yes … no.
“It just seems important.
“Bad place, Jason.
Trust me, this is as close to ’Frisco as we want to get.
Why did Jason seem so connected with that place—a place Hedgesaid was evil, full of bad magic and old enemies? What if Jason came from here? Everybody kept hinting Jason was an enemy, that his arrival at CampHalf-Blood was a dangerous mistake.
Ridiculous.
Jason was their friend.
“Let’s keep moving.
He popped his hooves free from his shoes, then handed the shoes to Leo.
“Keep those for me, Valdez.
“Yes, sir, Coach.
Would you like them polished?”“That’s varsity thinking, Valdez.
“But first, we’d better hike up this mountain while we still can.
Drifting across the summit was a plume of smoke.
From a distance, Leo had thought it was a cloud, but it wasn’t.
“We’d better hurry.
He thought he was in good shape.
But climbing a mountain when the earth was tryingto swallow his feet was like jogging on a flypaper treadmill.
He wished Aphrodite had given himwalking shorts and some more comfortable shoes, but he was grateful for the Ray-Bans that kept the sun out of his eyes.
He slipped his hands into histool belt and started summoning supplies—gears, a tiny wrench, some strips of bronze.
As he walked, he built—not really thinking about it, just fiddlingwith pieces.
His hands were covered inmachine grease.
He wasn’t sure what it could do, but heslipped it into his tool belt.
Even more than that, he missed Festus.
He could use a fire-breathing bronze dragon right now.
But Leoknew Festus would not be coming back—at least, not in his old form.
Heremembered Tía Callida singing as he worked, and how upset he’d been when the winds had snatched the picture away.
It isn’t time yet, little hero, TíaCallida had told him.
Someday, yes.
You’ll have your quest.
You will find your destiny, and your hard journey will finally make sense.
Leo knew that meant his destiny was getting close; but the journey was as frustrating as this stupid mountain.
Survive today.
Figure out crayon drawing of destiny later.
He gestured for the others to do the same.
Leo crawled up next to him.
Piper had to pull Coach Hedgedown.
The outer rim of the clearing was littered with extra logs and construction equipment—an earthmover; a big crane thing with rotating blades at the end like an electric shaver—must be a tree harvester, Leo thought—and a long metalcolumn with an ax blade, like a sideways guillotine—a hydraulic ax.
He didn’t see how the creature in front of him could even fit in the driver’s seat.
Thegiant Enceladus was so large, so horrible, Leo didn’t want to look at him.
Leo was sure the giant could’ve seen them behind their ridge, but he seemed intenton the weird purple bonfire, circling it and chanting under his breath.
From the waist up, the giant appeared humanoid, his muscular chest clad in bronzearmor, decorated with flame designs.
His arms were completely ripped.
Each of his biceps was bigger than Leo.
His skin was bronze but sooty with ash.
His legs were scaly green, with claws instead of feet—like the forelegs of a dragon.
In his hand,Enceladus held a spear the size of a flagpole.
Every so often he dipped its tip in the fire, turning the metal molten red.
“Here’s the plan—”Leo elbowed him.
“You’re not charging him alone!”“Aw, c’mon.
“Look.
His head slumped like he was unconscious, so Leo couldn’t make out his face,but Piper didn’t seem to have any doubts.
He wished this were a Tristan McLean movie.
Then Piper’s dad would be faking unconsciousness.
He’d untie his bonds and knockout the giant with some cleverly hidden anti-giant gas.
Heroic music would start to play, and Tristan McLean would make his amazing escape, runningaway in slow motion while the mountainside exploded behind him.
Tristan McLean was half dead and about to be eaten.
The only people who could stop it—three fashionably dressedteenaged demigods and a megalomaniac goat.
“And only one of him.
“So you, me, and Jason distract him.
Piper sneaks around and frees her dad.
“I’m not the leader.
“You are.
Coming this far had been a team effort, but when it came to a life-anddeathdecision, Leo knew Jason was the one to ask.
Even if he had no memory, Jason had a kind of balance to him.
You could just tell he’d been inbattles before, and he knew how to keep his cool.
Leo wasn’t exactly the trusting type, but he trusted Jason with his life.
A distraction is Piper’s best chance.
Not even a survivable chance.
Just their best chance.
It had to be close to noon—the giant’s deadline—and the ground was still trying to pull themdown.
Leo’s knees had already sunk two inches into the dirt.
He brought out the little toy he’d made on the climb, and he realized what it could do—if he was lucky, which he almost never was.
“Before I come to my senses.
He brandished it over his head and yelled, “Giant!” Which sounded pretty good, and a lot more confident thanLeo could’ve managed.
He was thinking more along the lines of, “We are pathetic ants! Don’t kill us!”Enceladus stopped chanting at the flames.
He turned toward them and grinned, revealing fangs like a saber-toothed tiger’s.
“What a nice surprise.
His hand closed on his windup gadget.
He stepped sideways, edging his way toward the bulldozer.
“Shut up.
“I’ve forgotten how funny satyrs are.
When we rule the world, I think I’ll keep your kind around.
You can entertain mewhile I eat all the other mortals.
“I don’t think that was a compliment.
Leo dodged behind thebulldozer, wound up his homemade device, and dropped it into the driver’s seat.
Then he ran to the right, heading for the tree harvester.
Coach Hedge ripped off his canary yellow jacket, which was now on fire, andbleated angrily.
“I liked that outfit!” Then he raised his club and charged, too.
The entire mountain shook.
He blinked, momentarily stunned.
Through a haze of grassfire and bitter smoke, he saw Jason staggering to hisfeet on the other side of the clearing.
Coach Hedge was knocked out cold.
He’d fallen forward and hit his head on a log.
His furry hindquarters weresticking straight up, with his canary yellow pants around his knees—a view Leo really didn’t need.
Piper ran into the clearing like a flushedquail, the underbrush burning behind her.
“I’m happy you’ve arrived.
And you brought me my prizes!”Leo’s gut twisted.
This was the moment Piper had warned them about.
They’d played right into Enceladus’s hands.
“That’s right, son of Hephaestus.
I didn’t expect you all to stay alive thislong, but it doesn’t matter.
By bringing you here, Piper McLean has sealed the deal.
If she betrays you, I’m as good as my word.
She can take her fatherand go.
What do I care about a movie star?”Leo could see Piper’s dad more clearly now.
He wore a ragged dress shirt and torn slacks.
His bare feet were caked with mud.
He wasn’tcompletely unconscious, because he lifted his head and groaned—yep, Tristan McLean all right.
Leo had seen that face in enough movies.
But he had anasty cut down the side of his face, and he looked thin and sickly—not heroic at all.
McLean blinked, trying to focus.
“Pipes … ? Where …”Piper drew her dagger and faced Enceladus.
“Let him go!”“Of course, dear,” the giant rumbled.
“Swear your loyalty to me, and we have no problem.
Only these others must die.
“Don’t trust him!”“Oh, come now,” Enceladus bellowed.
“You know I was born to fight Athena herself? Mother Gaea made each of us giants with a specific purpose,designed to fight and destroy a particular god.
I was Athena’s nemesis, the anti-Athena, you might say.
Compared to some of my brethren—I am small!But I am clever.
And I keep my bargain with you, Piper McLean.
It’s part of my plan!”Jason was on his feet now, lance ready; but before he could act, Enceladus roared—a call so loud it echoed down the valley and was probablyheard all the way to San Francisco.
Leo realized with nauseating certainty that they hadn’t simply been hiding there.
They were small compared to Enceladus, about seven feet tall.
Each one of them had six arms—one pair in the regularspot, then an extra pair sprouting out the top of their shoulders, and another set shooting from the sides of their rib cages.
They wore only ragged leatherloincloths, and even across the clearing, Leo could smell them.
Six guys who never bathed, with six armpits each.
Leo decided if he survived this day,he’d have to take a three-hour shower just to forget the stench.
“What—what are those?”Her blade reflected the purple light of the bonfire.
“Gegenees.
“Six-armed giants who fought Jason—the first Jason.
“They used to live on a miserable place in Greece called Bear Mountain.
Mount Diablo is muchnicer! They are lesser children of Mother Earth, but they serve their purpose.
They’re good with construction equipment—”“Vroom, vroom!” one of the Earthborn bellowed, and the others took up the chant, each moving his six hands as though driving a car, as if it weresome kind of weird religious ritual.
“Vroom, vroom!”“Yes, thank you, boys,” Encedalus said.
“They also have a score to settle with heroes.
Especially anyone named Jason.
They all picked up clumps of earth, which solidified in their hands, turning to nasty pointed stones.
“Where Yayson?Kill Yay-son!”Enceladus smiled.
“You see, Piper, you have a choice.
Save your father, or ah, try to save your friends and face certain death.
Her eyes blazed with such rage, even the Earthborn backed away.
She radiated power and beauty, but it had nothing to dowith her clothes or her makeup.
“None of them.
Okay, sorry,” and began to retreat.
He snarled at Piper.
“This is why we wanted you alive, my dear.
You could have been so useful to us.
Earth-born! I will show you Jason.
But the giant didn’t point to Jason.
He pointed to the other side of the bonfire, where Tristan McLean hung helpless and halfconscious.
“Tear him apart!”Leo’s biggest surprise: One look from Jason, and all three of them knew the game plan.
When had that happened, that they could read each other sowell?Jason charged Enceladus, while Piper rushed to her father, and Leo dashed for the tree harvester, which stood between Mr.
McLean and theEarthborn.
He leaped toward the harvester from five feet away and slammed into the driver’s seat.
Hishands flew across the controls, and the machine responded with unnatural speed—coming to life as if it knew how important this was.
Twogiants went down under a fiery avalanche and melted back into the earth—hopefully to stay for a while.
He smashed a button, and on the end ofthe crane arm the wicked rotating blades began to whir.
On the other side of the clearing, Jason fought the giant,somehow managing to dodge his massive spear and blasts of fire breath.
Coach Hedge was still heroically passed out with his goat tail sticking up inthe air.
The fire wouldn’t bother Leo, but if his friends got trapped up here—No.
He had to act quickly.
As soonas the blades touched the ogre, he dissolved like wet clay and splattered all over the clearing.
Most of him flew into Leo’s face.
“You want some bad vroom-vroom? Come on!”Unfortunately, they did.
Three ogres with six arms, each throwing large, hard rocks at super speed—and Leo knew it was over.
Somehow, helaunched himself in a backward somersault off the harvester half a second before a boulder demolished the driver’s seat.
Rocks slammed into metal.
Bythe time Leo stumbled to his feet, the harvester looked like a crushed soda can, sinking in the mud.
Leo’s makeshift gadget had done its job, burrowing into the earthmover’s controls and giving it atemporary life of its own.
It roared toward the enemy.
The dozer swiveled in the mud,skidding to intercept, and most of the rocks slammed into its shovel.
The force was so great it pushed the dozer back.
Two rocks ricocheted and strucktheir throwers.
Two more Earthborn melted into clay.
Unfortunately, one rock hit the dozer’s engine, sending up a cloud of oily smoke, and the dozergroaned to a stop.
Another great toy broken.
The last Earth-born charged after her.
He ran forward, straight through the flames, and grabbed something—anything—from his tool belt.
The screwdriver sank hilt-deep into the Earthborn’s forehead like he was made of Play-Doh.
He pulled out the screwdriver, turned and glared at Leo.
Sadly, this last ogre looked like thebiggest and nastiest of the bunch.
Gaea had really gone all out creating him—with extra muscle upgrades, deluxe ugly face, the whole package.
I’ve made a friend.
“Friend of Yay-son dies!”The ogre scooped up handfuls of dirt, which immediately hardened into rock cannonballs.
He reached into his tool belt, but he couldn’t think of anything that would help.
He was supposed to be clever—but he couldn’tcraft or build or tinker his way out of this one.
I’ll go out blaze-of-glory style.
A gleaming bronze blade sliced up one side of the Earthborn and down the other.
The Earthborn looked down, very surprised.
He mumbled, “Armsgo bye-bye.
Her dad sat at the ridge, dazed and wounded, but still alive.
Leo was glad she was on his side.
Then she yelled, “Come on!”Leo saw that the battle wasn’t over.
Jason was still fighting the giant Enceladus—and it wasn’t going well.
Jason’s instincts kicked in, and his gut told him he’d dueled opponents almost this big before.
Size and strengthequaled slowness, so Jason just had to be quicker—pace himself, wear out his opponent, and avoid getting smashed or flame-broiled.
Jason’s javelin managed to pierce the thick dragon hide, andgolden ichor—the blood of immortals—trickled down the giant’s clawed foot.
Jason scrambled away, rolling behind the giant, and struck again behind his knee.
Jason heard combat across the clearing—construction equipment grinding, fireroaring, monsters shouting, and rocks smashing into metal.
He heard Leo and Piper yelling defiantly, which meant they were still alive.
Jason tried not tothink about it.
He couldn’t afford to get distracted.
Jason kept dodging, but the ground stuck to his feet.
Gaea was getting stronger, and the giant wasgetting faster.
Enceladus might be slow, but he wasn’t dumb.
He began anticipating Jason’s moves, and Jason’s attacks were only annoying him,making him more enraged.
“I am a giant, born to destroy gods! Your little gold toothpick can’t kill me, boy.
He was already tired.
The ground clung to his feet, making him feel like he weighed an extra hundred pounds.
Fires roared around him, stoked by the winds, and the temperature was approaching the heat of an oven.
Don’t fight force with force, a voice chided him—the wolf Lupa, who’d toldhim that long ago.
He managed to deflect the spear, but it grazed his shoulder, and his arm went numb.
He couldn’t fail.
Enceladus could sense his weariness.
The giant smiled, baring his fangs.
“Yes, we know about you, son of Jupiter.
The one who led the assault on Mount Othrys.
The one who singlehandedlyslew the Titan Krios and toppled the black throne.
He didn’t know these names, yet they made his skin tingle, as if his body remembered the pain his mind didn’t.
He realized his mistake when Enceladus breathed fire.
The blast missed him, but heat blistered his back.
He slammed into the ground, his clothes smoldering.
He wasblinded from ash and smoke, choking as he tried to breathe.
He didn’t even knowif electricity would harm the giant.
At the last second, Jason faked a strike and rolled between the giant’s legs.
He came upquickly, thrusting with all his might, ready to stab the giant in the small of his back, but Enceladus anticipated the trick.
He stepped aside with too muchspeed and agility for a giant, as if the earth were helping him move.
The force knocked him off his feet and squeezed the breath out ofhim.
Enceladus stood at the other side, staggering and confused.
The javelin’sdestruction had released so much energy, it had blasted a perfect cone-shaped pit thirty feet deep, fusing the dirt and rock into a slick glassy substance.
He was out of energy.
He had no weapon.
And Enceladus was still very much alive.
Enceladus blinked at the destruction, then laughed.
“Impressive! Unfortunately, that was your lasttrick, demigod.
The giant raised his spear, its tip hovering six feet overJason’s chest.
He felt himself sinking into the earth like the ground was awaterbed—comfortable, urging him to relax and give up.
He wondered if the stories of the Underworld were true.
Would he end up in the Fields ofPunishment or Elysium? If he couldn’t remember any of his deeds, would they still count? He wondered if the judges would take that into consideration,or if his dad, Zeus, would write him a note: “Please excuse Jason from eternal damnation.
He has had amnesia.
He could see the tip of the spear coming toward his chest in slow motion.
He knew he should move, but he couldn’tseem to do it.
Funny, he thought.
All that effort to stay alive, and then, boom.
You just lie there helplessly while a fire-breathing giant impales you.
Her voice energized him, shook him out of his stupor.
He sat up, his head groggy, while Piper grabbed him under hisarms and hauled him to his feet.
“You are not dying on me.
Her hair was smoldering.
Her face was smudged withsoot.
She had a cut on her arm, her dress was torn, and she was missing a boot.
Beautiful.
Enceladus was struggling to rise, an ax blade thesize of a washing machine stuck in his breastplate.
He yelled in pain and the mountain trembled.
Golden ichor soaked the front of his armor, butEnceladus stood.
“But I cannot be beaten.
Even the cuts on his dragon-scale legs, which Jason had workedso hard to make, were now just pale scars.
“What is it with this guy? Die, already!”“My fate is preordained,” Enceladus said.
“Giants cannot be killed by gods or heroes.
The giant’s smile faltered, and Jason saw in his eyes something like fear.
“It’s true, isn’t it? Gods and demigods have towork together to kill you.
He looked at the giant below them, struggling to get out of the pit, and he knew what had to happen.
“Look behind you!”It was an obvious trick, but her voice was so compelling, even Jason bought it.
The giant said, “What?” and turned like there was an enormousspider on his back.
The giant lost his balance.
Enceladus slammed into the crater and slid to the bottom.
While he triedto rise, Jason put his arms around the giant’s neck.
When Enceladus struggled to his feet, Jason was riding his shoulders.
He tried to grab Jason’s legs, but Jason scrabbled around, squirming and climbing over the giant’s hair.
If I’ve ever done anything good, anything you approved of, help me now.
I offer my own life—just save my friends.
Darkness swallowed the sun.
The giant froze, sensing it too.
The giant’s back stiffened, and Jason was thrown clear.
The lightning bolt had split the mountainitself.
The earth rumbled and tore apart, and Enceladus’s legs slid into the chasm.
He clawed helplessly at the glassy sides of the pit, and just for amoment managed to hold on to the edge, his hands trembling.
“You’ve won nothing, boy.
My brothers are rising, and they are ten times as strong as I. We will destroy the godsat their roots! You will die, and Olympus will die with—”The giant lost his grip and fell into the crevice.
Jason fell toward the rift.
The ground stopped pulling at their feet.
Smoke billowed hundreds of feet into the air.
Jason spotted a helicopter—maybe firefighters or reporters—comingtoward them.
The Earthborn had melted into piles of clay, leaving behind only their rock missiles and some nasty bits of loincloth,but Jason figured they would re-form soon enough.
Construction equipment lay in ruins.
The ground was scarred and blackened.
He sat up with a groan and rubbed his head.
His canary yellow pants were now the color of Dijon mustard mixed withmud.
“Did I do this?”Before Jason could reply, Hedge picked up his club and got shakily to his feet.
“Yeah, you wanted some hoof? I gave you some hoof, cupcakes!Who’s the goat, huh?”He did a little dance, kicking rocks and making what were probably rude satyr gestures at the piles of clay.
It probably sounded a little hysterical, but it was such a relief to be alive, hedidn’t care.
Tristan McLean staggered forward.
His eyes were hollow, shell-shocked, like someone who’d just walkedthrough a nuclear wasteland.
His voice cracked.
“Pipes, what—what is—”He couldn’t complete the thought.
Piper ran over to him and hugged him tightly, but he almost didn’t seem to know her.
But Mr.
McLean had the opposite problem.
He hadtoo many memories, too much trauma his mind just couldn’t handle.
He was coming apart.
“He’s in no shape to walk.
“Can you make us a bullhorn or something?” he asked Leo.
“Piper hassome talking to do.
Getting her dad on board was not.
The Park Service copter was bigenough for medical evacuations or search and rescue, and when Piper told the very nice ranger pilot lady that it would be a great idea to fly them to theOakland Airport, she readily agreed.
“Piper, what—there were monsters—there were monsters—”She needed both Leo’s and Jason’s help to hold him, while Coach Hedge gathered their supplies.
Fortunately Hedge had put his pants and shoesback on, so Piper didn’t have to explain the goat legs.
She didn’t know what the giant had done tohim exactly, how the monsters had shattered his spirit, but she didn’t think she could stand to find out.
She didn’t want to charmspeak her own father, but it seemed the only way.
We’re going to help you.
You’re safe now.
“Blades.
They had a machine with so many blades.
They had six arms …”When they got him to the bay doors, the pilot came over to help.
“What’s wrong with him?” she asked.
“Or heat exhaustion.
“The airport is good.
Then she frowned, as if uncertain why she’d changed her mind.
“Isn’t he Tristan McLean,the movie star?”“No,” Piper said.
“He only looks like him.
Forget it.
“Only looks like him.
I—” She blinked, confused.
“I forgot what I was saying.
Let’s get going.
She didn’t want to twist people’s minds, convince them of thingsthey didn’t believe.
It felt so bossy, so wrong—like something Drew would do back at camp, or Medea in her evil department store.
And how would it helpher father? She couldn’t convince him he would be okay, or that nothing had happened.
His trauma was just too deep.
The pilot kept getting questions over her radio, asking her where she was going, but sheignored them.
They veered away from the burning mountain and headed toward the Berkeley Hills.
“It’s you? They told me—they told me you would die.
They said … horriblethings would happen.
She had to be strong for him.
“Everything’s going to be okay.
“Real monsters.
Earth spirits, right out of Grandpa Tom’s stories—and the Earth Mother was angry with me.
And thegiant, Tsul’kälû, breathing fire—” He focused on Piper again, his eyes like broken glass, reflecting a crazy kind of light.
“They said you were a demigod.
“Goddess of love.
Leo fiddled with a lug nut from his tool belt.
Jason gazed at the valley below—the roads backing up asmortals stopped their cars and gawked at the burning mountain.
Gleeson chewed on the stub of his carnation, and for once the satyr didn’t look in themood to yell or boast.
He was a star.
He was confident, stylish, suave—always in control.
That was the public imagehe projected.
Piper had seen the image falter before.
But this was different.
Now it was broken, gone.
“Not until you were taken.
When we found out where you were, we came right away.
My friends helped me.
“You’re heroes—you and your friends.
I can’t believe it.
You’re a real hero, not like me.
Not playing a part.
I’m soproud of you, Pipes.
“Your mother never told me.
But she didn’t tell her dad whatAphrodite had really worried about: If he has to spend the rest of his life with those memories, knowing that gods and spirits walk the earth, it willshatter him.
The vial was still there, warm to her touch.
He was proud of her, and for once she was his hero, not the other wayaround.
He would never send her away now.
They shared a secret.
She told him how CoachHedge ate carnations and got knocked on his butt on Mount Diablo, how Leo had tamed a dragon, and how Jason had made wolves back down bytalking in Latin.
Her friends smiled reluctantly as she recounted their adventures.
Her dad seemed to relax as she talked, but he didn’t smile.
Piper wasn’teven sure he heard her.
He leaned so far out the doorway Piper was afraid he’d fall.
“What is that?”Piper looked down, but she didn’t see anything interesting—just hills, woods, houses, little roads snaking through the canyons.
A highway cut througha tunnel in the hills, connecting the East Bay with the inland towns.
“The one that goes through the hills.
The answer wasn’t very exciting.
“That’s the Caldecott Tunnel.
Why?”Jason stared intently at the tunnel entrance, but he said nothing.
It disappeared from view as they flew over downtown Oakland, but Jason still staredinto the distance, his expression almost as unsettled as Piper’s dad’s.
“I live in a world of monsters.
Then it turned out to be noproblem.
She didn’t want to be in charge, but for her dad’s sake, she had to appear confident.
She had no plan.
She’d justremembered that he’d flown into Oakland, which meant his private plane would still be here.
But today was the solstice.
They had to save Hera.
They hadno idea where to go or if they were even too late.
And how could she leave her dad in this condition?“First thing,” she said.
“I—I have to get my dad home.
I’m sorry, guys.
“I mean, absolutely.
He needs you right now.
We can take it from here.
But he stumbled to his feet.
“You have a mission.
Aquest.
I can’t—”“I’ll take care of him,” said Coach Hedge.
The satyr was the last person she’d expected to offer.
“You?” she asked.
“That’s my job, not fighting.
In his ownway, maybe the satyr was as sensitive as her dad.
“Of course, I’m good at fighting, too.
“But I’m a protector, and I can do this.
Your dad’s right, Piper.
You need to carry on with the quest.
“Dad …”He held out his arms, and she hugged him.
He felt frail.
He was trembling so much, it scared her.
“I failed you.
“Aphrodite gave me this, for you.
It takes away your recent memories.
It’ll make it like none of thisever happened.
“But you’re a hero.
I would forget that?”“Yes,” Piper whispered.
She forced an assuring tone into her voice.
“Yes, you would.
It’ll be like—like before.
“I love you, Piper.
I always have.
I—I sent you away because I didn’t want you exposed to my life.
Not theway I grew up—the poverty, the hopelessness.
Not the Hollywood insanity either.
I thought—I thought I was protecting you.
She’d heard him talk about protecting her before, but she’d never believed it.
She’d always thought he was just rationalizing.
How could he claim she needed protecting from that?Finally Piper understood he’d been acting for her benefit, trying not to show how scared and insecure he was.
He really had been trying to protecther.
And now his ability to cope had been destroyed.
“Take it.
Maybe someday we’ll be ready to talk about this again.
When you’re ready.
“You make it sound like—like I’m the one growing up.
I’m supposed to be the parent.
His eyesglimmered with a small desperate hope.
“I love you, Pipes.
His eyes rolled up into his head, and he slumped forward.
Piper caught him, and her friends ran up to help.
The satyr stumbled, but he was strong enough to hold Tristan McLean upright.
“I already asked our ranger friend to call up hisplane.
It’s on the way now.
Home address?”Piper was about to tell him.
Then a thought occurred to her.
She checked her dad’s pocket, and his BlackBerry was still there.
It seemed bizarre thathe’d still have something so normal after all he’d been through, but she guessed Enceladus hadn’t seen any reason to take it.
“Address, his chauffeur’s number.
Just watch out for Jane.
“Who’s Jane?”By the time Piper explained, her dad’s sleek white Gulf-stream had taxied next to the helicopter.
Then Hedge came down one last time to say his good-byes.
He gave Piper a hug andglared at Jason and Leo.
“You cupcakes take care of this girl, you hear? Or I’m gonna make you do push-ups.
“Thank you, Gleeson.
Take care of him, please.
“They got root beer and veggie enchiladas on this flight, and one hundred percent linen napkins—yum! I couldget used to this.
The flight attendant’s eyes widened, but she looked away andpretended nothing was wrong.
Piper figured she’d probably seen stranger things, working for Tristan McLean.
She’d been holding it in too long and she just couldn’t anymore.
Before sheknew it, Jason was hugging her, and Leo stood uncomfortably nearby, pulling Kleenex out of his tool belt.
“You did amazing.
She allowed herself to be held for six deep breaths.
Seven.
Then she couldn’t indulge herself anymore.
They needed her.
“I—”She wanted to tell them how much they meant to her.
They’d sacrificed everything, maybe even their quest, to help her.
She couldn’t repay them,couldn’t even put her gratitude into words.
But her friends’ expressions told her they understood.
At first Piper thought it was heat off the tarmac, or maybe gas fumes from the helicopter, butshe’d seen something like this before in Medea’s fountain.
It was an Iris message.
An image appeared in the air—a dark-haired girl in silver wintercamouflage, holding a bow.
“Thalia!”“Thank the gods,” said the Hunter.
The scene behind her was hard to make out, but Piper heard yelling, metal clashing on metal, and explosions.
“Where are you?”“Oakland,” he said.
“Where are you?”“The Wolf House! Oakland is good; you’re not too far.
We’re holding off the giant’s minions, but we can’t hold them forever.
Get here before sunset,or it’s all over.
Hope surged through her, but Thalia’s expression quickly dampened it.
“But Jason—it’s worse than I realized.
Porphyrion is rising.
Hurry.
“The park.
Jack London.
Remember?”This made no sense to Piper, but Jason looked like he’d been shot.
He tottered, his face pale, and the Iris message disappeared.
“You know where she is?”“Yes,” Jason said.
“Sonoma Valley.
Not far.
Not by air.
“You don’t mind helping us one more time, do you?”“I don’t mind,” the pilot agreed.
“It’s too dangerous.
“Do you think you could fly this thing?”“Um …” Leo’s expression didn’t exactly reassure Piper.
But then he put his hand on the side of the helicopter, concentrating hard, as if listening tothe machine.
“Composite four-blade main rotor, cruising speed twenty-two knots, service ceiling twenty-thousand feet.
Sure, I can fly it.
“You don’t have a problem with an under-aged unlicensed kid borrowing your copter, do you? We’ll return it.
“Hop in, kids.
Uncle Leo’s gonna take you for a ride.
Once again, nothinglike ADHD and a good fight to the death to make time fly.
If he didn’t think about it, he found himself automatically flipping the rightswitches, checking the altimeter, easing back on the stick, and flying straight.
If he allowed himself to consider what he was doing, he started freakingout.
He imagined his Aunt Rosa yelling at him in Spanish, telling him he was a delinquent lunatic who was going to crash and burn.
Part of him suspectedshe was right.
She sounded more nervous than he was, so Leo put on a brave face.
“So what’s the Wolf House?”Jason knelt between their seats.
“An abandoned mansion in the Sonoma Valley.
A demigod built it—Jack London.
“He an actor?”“Writer,” Piper said.
“Adventure stuff, right? Call of the Wild ? White Fang?”“Yeah,” Jason said.
“He was a son of Mercury—I mean, Hermes.
He was an adventurer, traveled the world.
He was even a hobo for a while.
Then hemade a fortune writing.
He bought a big ranch in the country and decided to build this huge mansion—the Wolf House.
“But the site, and the reason he wrote about wolves—he was dropping hints about his personal experience.
There’re a lot ofholes in his life story—how he was born, who his dad was, why he wandered around so much—stuff you can only explain if you know he was a demigod.
Ahead of them, yellow hills rolled out as far as Leo could see.
“No, he didn’t.
Are you remembering your past or not?”“Pieces,” Jason said.
“Only pieces.
None of it good.
The Wolf House is on sacred ground.
It’s where London started his journey as a child—wherehe found out he was a demigod.
That’s why he returned there.
He thought he could live there, claim that land, but it wasn’t meant for him.
The Wolf Housewas cursed.
It burned in a fire a week before he and his wife were supposed to move in.
A few years later, London died, and his ashes were buried onthe site.
Probably just a cloud, but Leo could swear the shape looked like an eagle.
“It’s a powerful place for demigods, a dangerous place.
If Gaea can claim it, use its power to entombHera on the solstice and raise Porphyrion—that might be enough to awaken the earth goddess fully.
He could see some weather ahead—a spot ofdarkness like a cloudbank or a storm, right where they were going.
And Leo couldn’t believe some of the things he’d done—smacking around Cyclopes, disarming explodingdoorbells, battling six-armed ogres with construction equipment.
They seemed like they had happened to another person.
He was just Leo Valdez, anorphaned kid from Houston.
He’d spent his life running away, and part of him still wanted to run.
What was he thinking, flying toward a cursed mansion tofight more evil monsters?His mom’s voice echoed in his head: Nothing is unfixable.
Even if Leo survived this quest and saved Hera, Leo wouldn’t have any happyreunions.
He wouldn’t be going back to a loving family.
He wouldn’t see his mom.
Metal creaked, and Leo could almost imagine the tapping was Morse code: Not the end.
Not the end.
He was just hearing things.
He couldn’t dwell on his mom, or the idea that kept bugging him—that Gaea was bringing souls back from the Underworld—so why couldn’t he make some good come out of it? Thinking like that would drive him crazy.
If he thought about the quest too much, or what might happen afterward, he’d panic.
Thetrick was not to think—just get through it.
“If you want to get some rest, now’s a good time.
Piper and Leo stayed wide-awake.
Nobody’s gonna mess with him with that crazy goat around.
Not just physically.
Her presence was stronger.
She seemed more … here.
AtWilderness School she’d spent the semester trying not to be seen, hiding out in the back row of the classroom, the back of the bus, the corner of thelunchroom as far as possible from the loud kids.
Now she would be impossible to miss.
It didn’t matter what she was wearing —you’d have to look ather.
“Yeah, I know.
I was thinking about Jason.
I’m worried about him.
The closer they got to that bank of dark clouds, the more Leo worried, too.
“He’s starting to remember.
That’s got to make him a littleedgy.
If the Mist could affect their memories, could Jason’s whole personality be an illusion, too? If their friend wasn’t theirfriend, and they were heading into a cursed mansion—a dangerous place for demigods—what would happen if Jason’s full memory came back in themiddle of a battle?“Nah,” Leo decided.
“After all we’ve been through? I can’t see it.
We’re a team.
Jason can handle it.
“I hope you’re right.
I need him …” She cleared herthroat.
“I mean I need to trust him…”“I know,” Leo said.
After seeing her dad break down, Leo understood Piper couldn’t afford to lose Jason as well.
She’d just watched Tristan McLean,her cool suave movie star dad, reduced to near insanity.
Leo could barely stand to watch that, but for Piper—Wow, Leo couldn’t even imagine.
Hefigured that would make her insecure about herself, too.
If weakness was inherited, she’d be wondering, could she break down the same way her daddid?“Hey, don’t worry,” Leo said.
“Piper, you’re the strongest, most powerful beauty queen I’ve ever met.
You can trust yourself.
For what it’s worth, youcan trust me too.
He cursed and righted the chopper.
“Trust you, huh?”“Ah, shut up, already.
Then he realized it was sleet.
Frost built up around the edges of the glass, and slushy waves ofice blotted out his view.
“Is it supposed to be this cold in Sonoma?”Leo wasn’t sure, but something about this storm seemed conscious, malevolent—like it was intentionally slamming them.
He crawled forward, grabbing their seats for balance.
“We’ve got to be getting close.
Suddenly it wasn’t so easy to drive the chopper.
Its movements turned sluggish and jerky.
Thewhole machine shuddered in the icy wind.
The helicopter probably hadn’t been prepped for cold-weather flying.
The controls refused to respond, and theystarted to lose altitude.
The ridge of a hill loomed in front of them and Leo yanked the stick, just clearing thetreetops.
Leo aimed the helicopter straight for it.
All around them wereflashes of light that reminded Leo of the tracer fire at Midas’s compound.
Trees cracked and exploded at the edges of the clearing.
Shapes movedthrough the mist.
Combat seemed to be everywhere.
He was about to relax when he heard a whistlingsound and saw a dark shape hurtling toward them out of the mist.
They both looked fine except for being speckled with snow and mud.
“Guess we owe that ranger lady a new helicopter.
“Fighting’s over there.
“No … it’s all around us.
The sounds of combat rang across the valley.
The snow and mist made it hard to tell for sure, but there seemed to be a circle offighting all around the Wolf House.
Leo could imagine how ithad looked before it burned down—a combination log cabin and castle, like a billionaire lumberjack might build.
But in the mist and sleet, the place hada lonely, haunted feel.
Leo could totally believe the ruins were cursed.
Her bow was in her hand, and her quiver was almost empty.
She ran toward them, butmade it only a few steps before a six-armed ogre—one of the Earthborn—burst out of the storm behind her, a raised club in each hand.
They rushed to help, but Thalia had it under control.
She launched herself into a flip, notching an arrow as she pivoted like agymnast and landed in a kneeling position.
The ogre got a silver arrow right between the eyes and melted into a pile of clay.
“That was my last one.
“Stupid ogre.
She hugged Jason and nodded to Piper.
“Just in time.
MyHunters are holding a perimeter around the mansion, but we’ll be overrun any minute.
“Also storm spirits—”“But we gave them to Aeolus!” Piper protested.
“Maybe he’s helping Gaea again.
“But the monsters keep re-forming almost as fast as we can kill them.
We took the Wolf House with no problem: surprisedthe guards and sent them straight to Tartarus.
But then this freak snowstorm blew in.
Wave after wave of monsters started attacking.
Now we’resurrounded.
I don’t know who or what is leading the assault, but I think they planned this.
It was a trap to kill anyone who tried to rescue Hera.
“We tried to free her, but we can’t figure out how to break the cage.
It’s only a few minutes until the sun goes down.
Hera thinksthat’s the moment when Porphyrion will be reborn.
Plus, most monsters are stronger at night.
If we don’t free Hera soon—”She didn’t need to finish the thought.
“None of that, man.
What’s wrong?”“This place …” Jason shook his head.
“Sorry … It came rushing back to me.
Her expression was grim, like she was reliving someone’s death.
“This is where my mom took us when Jason was achild.
She left him here, told me he was dead.
He just disappeared.
“At Hera’s insistence.
She gave me to Lupa.
“Who is Lupa?”“That part I didn’t know.
“Who is Lupa?”An explosion shook the building.
Just outside, a blue mushroom cloud billowed up, raining snowflakes and ice like a nuclear blast made of coldinstead of heat.
“Show us the goddess.
The house was built in a giant U, and Jason led them between the two wings to an outsidecourtyard with an empty reflecting pool.
At the bottom of the pool, just as Jason had described from his dream, two spires of rock and root tendrils hadcracked through the foundation.
Underneath the mass offused tendrils he could make out the shape of a head, wide shoulders, a massive chest and arms, like the creature was stuck waist deep in the earth.
Each tendril was as thick as a telephone pole, with so littlespace between them that Leo doubted he could’ve gotten his arm through.
Still, he could see inside.
And in the center of the cage stood Tía Callida.
She looked like a regular mortal woman, his good old psychotic babysitter.
“Hola, Tía.
Little bit of trouble?”She crossed her arms and sighed in exasperation.
“Don’t inspect me like I’m one of your machines, Leo Valdez.
Get me out of here!”Thalia stepped next to him and looked at the cage with distaste—or maybe she was looking at the goddess.
“We tried everything we could think of,Leo, but maybe my heart wasn’t in it.
If it was up to me, I’d just leave her in there.
“When I get out of here, you’ll be sorry you were ever born.
“You’ve been nothing but a curse to every child of Zeus for ages.
You sent a bunch of intestinally challenged cows after myfriend Annabeth—”“She was disrespectful!”“You dropped a statue on my legs.
“Here—on this spot.
You ruined our lives.
We should leave you to Gaea!”“Hey,” Jason intervened.
“Thalia—Sis—I know.
But this isn’t the time.
You should help your Hunters.
“Fine.
For you, Jason.
But if you ask me, she isn’t worth it.
“Intestinally challenged cows?”“Focus on the cage, Leo,” she grumbled.
“And Jason—you are wiser than your sister.
I chose my champion well.
“I’m only helping you because you stole my memories and you’re better than the alternative.
Speaking ofwhich, what’s going on with that?”He nodded to the other spire that looked like the king-size granite body bag.
Was Leo imagining it, or had it grown taller since they’d gotten here?“That, Jason,” Hera said, “is the king of the giants being reborn.
“Porphyrion, the strongest of his kind.
Gaea needed a great deal of power to raise him again — my power.
For weeks I’vegrown weaker as my essence was used to grow him a new form.
“Or fertilizer.
This old lady had been making his life miserable since he was a baby.
He totally had rights to rag onher.
“But at sundown, it will be too late.
The giant will awake.
He will offer me a choice: marry him, or beconsumed by the earth.
And I cannot marry him.
We will all be destroyed.
And as we die, Gaea will awaken.
“Can’t we blow it up or something?”“Without me, you do not have the power,” Hera said.
“You might as well try to destroy a mountain.
“Leo, can you do it?”“I don’t know.
“Besides, if she’s a goddess, why hasn’t she busted herself out?”Hera paced furiously around her cage, cursing in Ancient Greek.
“Use your brain, Leo Valdez.
I picked you because you’re intelligent.
Once trapped,a god’s power is useless.
Your own father trapped me once in a golden chair.
It was humiliating! I had to beg—beg him for my freedom and apologize forthrowing him off Olympus.
“I’ve watched you since you were a child, son of Hephaestus, because I knew you could aid me at this moment.
Ifanyone can find a way to destroy this abomination, it is you.
It’s like Gaea thrust her hand out of the ground and …” Leo felt dizzy.
The line of their prophecy came back to him: The forgeand dove shall break the cage.
I do have an idea.
Piper, I’m going to need your help.
And we’re going to need time.
The temperature dropped so fast, Leo’s lips cracked and his breath changed to mist.
Frost coated the walls of theWolf House.
Venti rushed in —but instead of winged men, these were shaped like horses, with dark storm-cloud bodies and manes that crackled withlightning.
Some had silver arrows sticking out of their flanks.
Behind them came red-eyed wolves and the six-armed Earthborn.
Jason grabbed an ice-covered plank off the pool floor.
Leo reached into his tool belt, but he was so shaken up, all heproduced was a tin of breath mints.
He shoved them back in, hoping nobody had noticed, and drew a hammer instead.
It was dragging a human-size statue by the leg.
At the edge of the pool, the wolf opened its maw and droppedthe statue for them to see—an ice sculpture of a girl, an archer with short spiky hair and a surprised look on her face.
The ground around Thalia’s statue was already webbed with ice.
Leo feared ifJason touched her, he might freeze too.
His body crackled with electricity.
“I’ll kill you myself!”From somewhere behind the monsters, Leo heard a girl’s laughter, clear and cold.
She stepped out of the mist in her snowy white dress, a silvercrown atop her long black hair.
She regarded them with those deep brown eyes Leo had thought were so beautiful in Quebec.
She gave Leo a frosty smile.
“Alas, son of Hephaestus, you say you need time? I’m afraidtime is one tool you do not have.
He was surrounded by monsters.
He’d broken his golden sword and replaced it with a piece of wood.
He hadapproximately five minutes until the king of the giants busted out and destroyed them.
Jason had already pulled his biggest ace, calling down Zeus’slightning when he’d fought Enceladus, and he doubted he’d have the strength or the cooperation from above to do it again.
Which meant his only assetswere one whiny imprisoned goddess, one sort-of girlfriend with a dagger, and Leo, who apparently thought he could defeat the armies of darkness withbreath mints.
He knew for certain he’d done many dangerous things in his life, but he’d never beencloser to death than he was right now.
Khione smiled, her dark eyes glittering, as a dagger of ice grew in her hand.
“Your sister’s not dead, if that’s what you mean.
She and her Hunters will make fine toys for ourwolves.
I thought we’d defrost them one at a time and hunt them down for amusement.
Let them be the prey for once.
“Your sister almost killed their king, you know.
Lycaon’s off in a cave somewhere, no doubt lickinghis wounds, but his minions have joined us to take revenge for their master.
And soon Porphyrion will arise, and we shall rule the world.
“You meddlesome, D-list goddess! You aren’t worthy to pour my wine, much less rule the world.
“Tiresome as ever, Queen Hera.
I’ve been wanting to shut you up for millennia.
“Now, demigods, about your death—”“You’re the one who tricked Hera into coming here,” Jason said.
“You gave Zeus the idea of closing Olympus.
“Patience, my loves.
If he wants to talk, whatmatter? The sun is setting, and time is on our side.
Of course, Jason Grace.
Like snow, my voice is quiet and gentle, and very cold.
It’s easy for me towhisper to the other gods, especially when I am only confirming their own deepest fears.
I also whispered in Aeolus’s ear that he should issue an order tokill demigods.
It is a small service for Gaea, but I’m sure I will be well rewarded when her sons the giants come to power.
“Why let us live?”Khione wrinkled her nose.
“Messy business, killing you in my father’s house, especially when he insists on meeting all visitors.
I did try, youremember.
It would’ve been lovely if he’d agreed to turn you to ice.
But once he’d given you guarantee of safe passage, I couldn’t openly disobey him.
Myfather is an old fool.
He lives in fear of Zeus and Aeolus, but he’s still powerful.
Soon enough, when my new masters have awakened, I will deposeBoreas and take the throne of the North Wind, but not just yet.
Besides, my father did have a point.
Your quest was suicidal.
I fully expected you to fail.
Those frozen wires in his head—that was your fault.
You’regonna pay for that.
“We’ve been plagued by snowstorms the whole trip.
“Once you made it past Omaha, I decided to asked Lycaon to track you down so Jason could diehere, at the Wolf House.
“You see, Jason, your blood spilled on this sacred ground will taint it for generations.
Your demigodbrethren will be outraged, especially when they find the bodies of these two from Camp Half-Blood.
They’ll believe the Greeks have conspired withgiants.
It will be … delicious.
But Jason knew.
His memories were returning enough for him to realize howdangerously effective Khione’s plan could be.
“As I told you, I only encourage what you would do anyway.
“Khione, you’ll tear the world apart.
The giants will destroy everything.
You don’t want that.
Call off your monsters.
“Your persuasive powers are improving, girl.
But I am a goddess.
You can’t charm-speak me.
We wind gods arecreatures of chaos! I’ll overthrow Aeolus and let the storms run free.
If we destroy the mortal world, all the better! They never honored me, even in Greektimes.
Humans and their talk of global warming.
Pah! I’ll cool them down quickly enough.
When we retake the ancient places, I will cover the Acropolis insnow.
“That’s what Enceladus meant about destroy the roots of the gods.
He meant Greece.
“I know you find me beautiful.
It would be enough for my plan if these other two were to die.
Live and be my champion, instead.
Your skills would be quite useful.
He glanced behind him, like Khione might be talking to somebody else.
For a second Jason was worried.
He figured Leo didn’thave beautiful goddesses make him offers like this every day.
“Yeah, join you.
Right.
Until you get bored of me and turn me into a Leosicle? Lady, nobody messes withmy dragon and gets away with it.
I can’t believe I thought you were hot.
“Hot? You dare insult me? I am cold, Leo Valdez.
Very, very cold.
A wall of fire roared to life in front of them, and the snow dissolved in asteamy cloud.
“See, lady, that’s what happens to snow in Texas.
It—freaking—melts.
“Enough of this.
Hera is failing.
Porphyrion is rising.
Kill the demigods.
Let them be our king’s first meal!”Jason hefted his icy wooden plank—a stupid weapon to die fighting with—and the monsters charged.
Maybe only silver could kill it,but a good old-fashioned board could still give it a Tylenol headache.
Jason concentrated and summoned the wind.
Just beforethe spirit could trample him, Jason launched himself into the air, grabbed the horse’s smoky neck, and pirouetted onto its back.
It tried to shake Jason, then tried to dissolve into mist to lose him; but somehow Jason stayed on.
He willed the horse toremain in solid form, and the horse seemed unable to refuse.
Jason could feel it fighting against him.
He could sense its raging thoughts—completechaos straining to break free.
It took all Jason’s willpower to impose his own wishes and bring the horse under control.
He thought about Aeolus,overseeing thousands and thousands of spirits like this, some much worse.
No wonder the Master of the Winds had gone a little mad after centuries ofthat pressure.
But Jason had only one spirit to master, and he had to win.
Its mane flickered as it circled around the empty pool, its hooves causing miniature thunderstorms—tempests—whenever they touched.
“Is that your name?”The horse spirit shook its mane, evidently pleased to be recognized.
“Now, let’s fight.
Tempest was a strong spirit,and every time he plowed through one of his brethren, he discharged so much electricity, the other spirit vaporized into a harmless cloud of mist.
Piper was surrounded by Earthborn, but she seemed to be holding her own.
She was soimpressive-looking as she fought, almost glowing with beauty, that the Earthborn stared at her in awe, forgetting that they were supposed to kill her.
They’d smile back—until she sliced them apart with her dagger, andthey melted into mounds of mud.
While fighting a goddess should’ve been suicide, Leo was the right man for the job.
She kept summoning icedaggers to throw at him, blasts of winter air, tornadoes of snow.
Leo burned through all of it.
His whole body flickered with red tongues of flame like he’dbeen doused with gasoline.
He advanced on the goddess, using two silver-tipped ball-peen hammers to smash any monsters that got in his way.
His fiery aura was heating up the whole courtyard, countering Khione’s wintermagic.
Without him, they would’ve been frozen like the Hunters long ago.
Wherever Leo went, ice melted off the stones.
Even Thalia started to defrost alittle when Leo stepped near her.
Her expression went from enraged to shocked to slightly panicked as Leo got closer.
Wolves lay in dazed heaps.
Some slunk away into the ruins, yelping from their wounds.
Piper stabbed the lastEarthborn, who toppled to the ground in a pile of sludge.
Jason rode Tempest through the last ventus, breaking it into vapor.
Then he wheeled aroundand saw Leo bearing down on the goddess of snow.
“He’s awake! And don’t think you’ve won anything here, demigods.
Hera’s plan will never work.
You’ll be at eachother’s throats before you can ever stop us.
Leo’s hammers slammedinto the snow woman, breaking it into a steaming mound of mush.
“Nice horse.
A complete show-off.
The melting ice on Hera’s cage sloughed off in a curtain of slush, and the goddess called, “Oh,don’t mind me! Just the queen of the heavens, dying over here!”Jason dismounted and told Tempest to stay put.
The three demigods jumped into the pool and ran to the spire.
“Uh, Tía Callida, are you getting shorter?”“No, you dolt! The earth is claiming me.
Hurry!”As much as Jason disliked Hera, what he saw inside the cage alarmed him.
Not only was Hera sinking, the ground was rising around her like waterin a tank.
Liquid rock had already covered her shins.
“The giant wakes!” Hera warned.
“You only have seconds!”“On it,” Leo said.
“Piper, I need your help.
Talk to the cage.
Use everything you’ve got.
Convince Gaea to sleep.
Lull her into a daze.
Just slow her down, try to get the tendrils to loosen while I—”“Right!” Piper cleared her throat and said, “Hey, Gaea.
Nice night, huh? Boy, I’m tired.
How about you? Ready for some sleep?”The more she talked, the more confident she sounded.
Jason felt his own eyes getting heavy, and he had to force himself not to focus on her words.
The mud was rising more slowly.
The tendrils seemed to soften just a little—becoming more like tree rootthan rock.
Leo pulled a circular saw out of his tool belt.
How it fit in there, Jason had no idea.
Then Leo looked at the cord and grunted in frustration.
“Idon’t have anywhere to plug it in!”The spirit horse Tempest jumped into the pit and whinnied.
Leo looked dubious, but he held up the plug, and a breeze whisked it into the horse’s flank.
“Your horse comes with AC outlets!”Their good mood didn’t last long.
On the other side of the pool, the giant’s spire crumbled with a sound like a tree snapping in half.
Its outer sheath oftendrils exploded from the top down, raining stone and wood shards as the giant shook himself free and climbed out of the earth.
He didn’t radiate heat, or show any signs of breathing fire, but there was something more terribleabout him—a kind of strength, even magnetism, as if the giant were so huge and dense he had his own gravitational field.
His hair was green as summer leaves, braided in long locks and decorated with weapons—daggers, axes, and fullsizeswords, some of them bent and bloody—maybe trophies taken from demigods eons before.
When the giant opened his eyes, they were blankwhite, like polished marble.
He took a deep breath.
“Praise to Gaea!”Jason made a heroic little whimpering sound he hoped his friends couldn’t hear.
He was very sure no demigod could solo this guy.
Porphyrion couldlift mountains.
He could crush Jason with one finger.
Even Piper seemed dazed.
“Get Hera free!”“What are you going to do?” Piper asked.
“You can’t seriously—”“Entertain a giant?” Jason said.
“I’ve got no choice.
“An appetizer! Who are you—Hermes? Ares?”Jason thought about going with that idea, but something told him not to.
“Son of Jupiter.
Behind him, Leo’s circular saw whirred, and Piper talked to the cage in soothing tones, trying to keep the fear outof her voice.
“Outstanding!” He looked up at the cloudy night sky.
“So, Zeus, you sacrifice a son to me? The gestureis appreciated, but it will not save you.
No help from above.
Jason was on his own.
His hands were covered in splinters, but that didn’t matter now.
He had to buy Leo and Piper some time, and hecouldn’t do that without a proper weapon.
I hope you enjoyed your two and a half minutes ofrebirth, giant, because I’m going to send you right back to Tartarus.
He planted one foot outside the pool and crouched to get a better look at his opponent.
“So … we’ll start by boasting, willwe? Just like old times! Very well, demigod.
I am Porphryion, king of the giants, son of Gaea.
In olden times, I rose from Tatarus, the abyss of my father,to challenge the gods.
To start the war, I stole Zeus’s queen.
“Hello, Hera.
“He’ll do it again!”“But he didn’t, my dear! Zeus wasn’t powerful enough to kill me.
He had to rely on a puny demigod to help, and even then, we almost won.
This time,we will complete what we started.
Gaea is waking.
She has provisioned us with many fine servants.
Our armies will shake the earth—and we will destroyyou at the roots.
Jason could hear it in her voice.
Piper kept whispering to the cage, and Leo kept sawing,but the earth was still rising inside Hera’s prison, covering her up to her waist.
“The Titans sought to attack your new home in New York.
Bold, but ineffective.
Gaea is wiser and more patient.
And we, hergreatest children, are much, much stronger than Kronos.
We know how to kill you Olympians once and for all.
You must be dug up completely like rottentrees—your eldest roots torn out and burned.
Jason stepped forward and yelled to get back Porphyrion’sattention.
“How, if we’re so puny?”“Ha! You think I would explain it to you? I was created to be Zeus’s replacement, born to destroy the lord of the sky.
I shall take his throne.
I shall takehis wife—or, if she will not have me, I will let the earth consume her life force.
What you see before you, child, is only my weakened form.
I will growstronger by the hour, until I am invincible.
But I am already quite capable of smashing you to a grease spot!”He rose to his full height and held out his hand.
A twenty-foot spear shot from the earth.
He grasped it, then stomped the ground with his dragon’sfeet.
The ruins shook.
All around the courtyard, monsters started to regather—storm spirits, wolves, and Earthborn, all answering the giant king’s call.
“We needed more enemies.
“Nice, sleepy cage.
Yes, I’m talking to a bunch of earthen tendrils.
This isn’t weird at all.
“So, child of Zeus! Ihave finished my boasting.
Now it’s your turn.
What were you saying about destroying me?”Jason looked at the ring of monsters, waiting impatiently for their master’s order to tear them to shreds.
Leo’s circular saw kept whirring, and Piperkept talking, but it seemed hopeless.
Hera’s cage was almost completely filled with earth.
“I’m a child of Rome, consul todemigods, praetor of the First Legion.
“I toppled the black throne of Kronos, and destroyed the Titan Krios with my own hands.
And nowI’m going to destroy you, Porphyrion, and feed you to your own wolves.
“You been eating red meat?”Jason launched himself at the giant, determined to tear him apart.
Half flying, half leaping, Jason landed onthe giant’s scaly reptilian knee and climbed up the giant’s arm before Porphyrion even realized what had happened.
He yelled, “For Rome!” and drove the sword into thenearest convenient target—the giant’s massive ear.
He rolled when he hit the ground.
When he looked up, the giant wasstaggering.
His hair was on fire, and the side of his face was blackened from lightning.
The sword had splintered in his ear.
Golden ichor ran down hisjaw.
The other weapons were sparking and smoldering in his braids.
The circle of monsters let out a collective growl and moved forward—wolves and ogres fixing their eyes on Jason.
He regained his balance and glared at the demigod.
“I will kill him myself.
“You want to play with lightning, boy? You forget.
I am the bane of Zeus.
I was created to destroy yourfather, which means I know exactly what will kill you.
The three of them had done amazing things.
Yeah, even heroic things.
But as the giant raised his spear,Jason knew there was no way he could deflect this strike.
Leo had sawed through the base of the thickest tendril and apparently cut off the cage’s connection to Gaea.
The mud around Hera disintegrated.
The goddess grew in size, glowing with power.
She threw off her black robes to reveal a white gown, her arms bedecked with golden jewelry.
Her face was both terribleand beautiful, and a golden crown glowed in her long black hair.
“Now I shall have my revenge!”The giant Porphyrion backed away.
He said nothing, but he gave Jason one last look of hatred.
His message was clear: Another time.
Then heslammed his spear against the earth, and the giant disappeared into the ground like he’d dropped down a chute.
She shouted, “Cover your eyes, my heroes!”But Jason was too much in shock.
He understood too late.
Jason fell, light searing into hismind, and his last thought was that his body was burning.
He’d been unconscious for two minutes now.
His body was steaming,his eyes rolled back in his head.
She couldn’t tell if he was even breathing.
Thankfully she’d closed her eyes, but she could see the aftereffects.
Every vestige of winter was gonefrom the valley.
No signs of battle, either.
The monsters had been vaporized.
The ruins had been restored to what they were before—still ruins, but with noevidence that they’d been overrun by a horde of wolves, storm spirits, and six-armed ogres.
Most waited at a respectful distance in the meadow, but Thalia knelt by Piper’s side, her hand on Jason’sforehead.
“This is your fault.
Do something!”“Do not address me that way, girl.
I am the queen—”“Fix him!”Hera’s eyes flickered with power.
“I did warn him.
I would never intentionally hurt the boy.
He was to be my champion.
I told them to close their eyesbefore I revealed my true form.
“True form is bad, right? So why did you do it?”“I unleashed my power to help you, fool!” Hera cried.
“I became pure energy so I could disintegrate the monsters, restore this place, and even savethese miserable Hunters from the ice.
“You’ve killed him!”Leo shook his head in dismay.
“That’s what our prophecy meant.
Death unleash, through Hera’s rage.
Come on, lady.
You’re a goddess.
Do somevoodoo magic on him! Bring him back.
“He’s breathing!” she announced.
“I wish it were true, child, but no mortal has ever—”“Jason,” Piper called, putting every bit of her willpower into his name.
She could not lose him.
“Listen to me.
You can do this.
Come back.
You’regoing to be fine.
Had she imagined his breath stirring?“Healing is not a power of Aphrodite,” Hera said regretfully.
“Even I cannot fix this, girl.
His mortal spirit—”“Jason,” Piper said again, and she imagined her voice resonating through the earth, all the way down to the Underworld.
“Wake up.
For a moment they were full of light—glowing pure gold.
Then the light faded and his eyes were normal again.
“How do you feel?”“Hot,” he muttered.
“Mouth is dry.
And I saw something… really terrible.
“Her Majesty, the Loose Cannon.
“I will turn you into an aardvark, so help me—”“Stop it, you two,” Piper said.
Amazingly, they both shut up.
“Hera—Your Majesty—we couldn’t have rescued you without the Hunters.
And Thalia, you never would’veseen Jason again—I wouldn’t have met him—if it weren’t for Hera.
You two make nice, because we’ve got bigger problems.
“You’ve got spirit, Piper.
We could use you.
“Fortunately for this Hunter, you have a point, daughter of Aphrodite.
“You wondered, Piper, why I chose you for this quest, why I didn’t reveal your secret in the beginning, even when I knew Enceladus was using you.
Imust admit, until this moment I was not sure.
Something told me you would be vital to the quest.
Now I see I was right.
You’re even stronger than I realized.
We must work together.
She wasn’t sure how to respond to Hera’s compliment, but Leo stepped in.
“By saving me, and saving this place, you prevented Gaea from waking.
You have bought us some time.
But Porphyrion hasrisen.
He simply knew better than to stay here, especially since he has not yet regained his full power.
Giants can only be killed by a combination of godand demigod, working together.
Once you freed me—”“He ran away,” Jason said.
“But to where?”Hera didn’t answer, but a sense of dread washed over Piper.
She remembered what Porphyrion had said about killing the Olympians by pulling uptheir roots.
Greece.
She looked at Thalia’s grim expression, and guessed the Hunter had come to the same conclusion.
“She has to know what’s happened here.
“We never got to talk about this place, or—”“I know.
“I lost you here once.
I don’t want to leave you again.
But we’ll meet soon.
I’ll rendezvous with you back at CampHalf-Blood.
“You’ll see them there safely? It’s the least you can do.
“Fine.
Yes.
Just off with you, Hunter!”Thalia gave Jason a hug and said her good-byes.
When the Hunters were gone, the courtyard seemed strangely quiet.
The dry reflecting poolshowed no sign of the earthen tendrils that had brought back the giant king or imprisoned Hera.
The night sky was clear and starry.
The wind rustled inthe redwoods.
Piper thought about that night in Oklahoma when she and her dad had slept in Grandpa Tom’s front yard.
She thought about the night onthe Wilderness School dorm roof, when Jason had kissed her—in her Mist-altered memories, anyway.
“I mean—I know your mom abandoned you here.
But you said it was sacred ground for demigods.
“It’s still murky.
The wolves …”“You were given a destiny,” Hera said.
“You were given into my service.
“Because you forced my mom to do that.
You couldn’t stand knowing Zeus had two children with my mom.
Knowing that he’d fallenfor her twice.
I was the price you demanded for leaving the rest of my family alone.
”“It was the right choice for you as well, Jason,” Hera insisted.
“The second time your mother managed to snare Zeus’s affections, it was because sheimagined him in a different aspect—the aspect of Jupiter.
Never before had this happened—two children, Greek and Roman, born into the same family.
This is where all demigods of your kind start their journey.
“Demigods are left here.
We meet the she-wolf goddess, Lupa, the same immortal wolf that raised Romulus andRemus.
“And if you are strong enough, you live.
“What happened after that? I mean, Jason never made it to camp.
“You went somewhere else.
That’s where you’ve been all these years.
Somewhereelse for demigods—but where?”Jason turned to the goddess.
“The memories are coming back, but not the location.
You’re not going to tell me, are you?”“No,” Hera said.
“That is part of your destiny, Jason.
You must find your own way back.
But when you do … you will unite two great powers.
You willgive us hope against the giants, and more importantly—against Gaea herself.
“That is the way of the Fates.
You must forge your own path for it to meananything.
Already, you three have surprised me.
I would not have thought it possible …”The goddess shook her head.
“Suffice to say, you have performed well, demigods.
But this is only the beginning.
Now you must return to Camp Half-Blood, where you will begin planning for the next phase.
“And I suppose you destroyed my nice storm spirit horse, so we’ll have to walk home?”Hera waved aside the question.
“Storm spirits are creatures of chaos.
I did not destroy that one, though I have no idea where he went, or whetheryou’ll see him again.
But there is an easier way home for you.
As you have done me a great service, so I can help you—at least this once.
Farewell,demigods, for now.
They were standing on the Aphrodite cabin’stable, and Piper had one foot in Drew’s pizza.
Sixty campers rose at once, gawking at them in astonishment.
She could barely control her nausea.
Leo wasn’t solucky.
He jumped off the table, ran to the nearest bronze brazier, and threw up in it—which was probably not a great burnt offering for the gods.
No doubt the old centaur had seen thousands of years’ worth of weird stuff, but even he looked totallyflabbergasted.
“What—How—?”The Aphrodite campers stared up at Piper with their mouths open.
Piper figured she must look awful.
“We’re back.
They told their story and answered a million questions from the other campers, but finally Chironsaw how tired they were and ordered them to bed.
The sun came through the windows along with a pleasant breeze.
It might’ve beenspring instead of winter.
Birds sang.
Monsters howled in the woods.
Breakfast smells wafted from the dining pavilion—bacon, pancakes, and all sorts ofwonderful things.
“Beautiful day.
Now she thought about the Cyclopes in Detroit,Medea in Chicago, Midas turning her to gold in Omaha.
Looking at Drew, who used to bother her, Piper laughed.
She backed up, then remembered she was supposed to be angry.
“What are you—”“Challenging you,” Piper said.
“How about noon in the arena? You can choose the weapons.
She spotted Mitchell and Lacy, who’d helped her pack for the quest.
Theywere smiling tentatively, their eyes flitting from Piper to Drew like this might be a very interesting tennis game.
“We’re going to have a great time when I’m senior counselor.
Even her closest lieutenants looked a little nervous.
This wasn’t in their script.
“You ugly little witch! I’ve been here the longest.
You can’t just—”“Challenge you?” Piper said.
“Sure, I can.
Camp rules: I’ve been claimed by Aphrodite.
I’ve completed a quest, which is one more than you’vecompleted.
If I feel I can do a better job, I can challenge you.
Unless you just want to step down.
Did I get all that right, Mitchell?”“Just right, Piper.
Lacy was bouncing up and down like she was trying to achieve liftoff.
“You’re crazy!”Piper shrugged.
Then fast as a viper she pulled Katoptris from under her pillow, unsheathed the dagger, and thrust the point under Drew’s chin.
One guy crashed into a makeup table and sent up a plume of pink powder.
“If you don’t want to wait until noon, now is fine.
You’ve turned this cabin into a dictatorship, Drew.
SilenaBeauregard knew better than that.
Aphrodite is about love and beauty.
Being loving.
Spreadingbeauty.
Good friends.
Good times.
Good deeds.
Not justlooking good.
Silena made mistakes, but in the end she stood by her friends.
That’s why she was a hero.
I’m going to set things right, and I’ve got afeeling Mom will be on my side.
Want to find out?”Drew went cross-eyed looking down the blade of Piper’s dagger.
Then two.
Piper didn’t care.
She was absolutely happy and confident.
It must’ve shown in her smile.
“But if you think I’m ever going to forget this, McLean—”“Oh, I hope you won’t,” Piper said.
“Now, run along to the dining pavilion, and explain to Chiron why we’re late.
There’s been a change of leadership.
Even her closest lieutenants didn’t follow her.
She was about to leave when Piper said, “Oh, and Drew, honey?”The former counselor looked back reluctantly.
He may not know it yet, but he’s mine.
If youeven try to make a move, I will load you into a catapult and shoot you across Long Island Sound.
Then she was gone.
The other campers stared at Piper.
This was the part she was unsure of.
She didn’t want to rule by fear.
She wasn’t like Drew,but she didn’t know if they’d accept her.
They herded Piper out of the cabin,raised her on their shoulders, and carried her all the way to the dining pavilion—still in her pajamas, her hair still a mess, but she didn’t care.
She’d neverfelt better.
She was ready for freetime.
“Come inside, my dear.
The video conference is ready.
“Phone calls, texting, even browsing the Internet—all these things can attract monsters.
Here at camp, you’re protected.
Still … we try to be cautious.
You’ll only be able to talk for a few minutes.
“Thank you, Chiron.
Piper hesitated before clicking the call button.
Chiron’s office had a cluttered, cozy feel.
One wallwas covered with T-shirts from different conventions—party ponies ’09 vegas, party ponies ’10 honolulu, et cetera.
Piper didn’t know who the PartyPonies were, but judging from the stains, scorch marks, and weapon holes in the T-shirts, they must’ve had some pretty wild meetings.
On the shelf overChiron’s desk sat an old-fashioned boom box with cassette tapes labeled “Dean Martin” and “Frank Sinatra” and “Greatest Hits of the 40s.
One of the newer shots showed a teenage guy withdark hair and green eyes.
Since he stood arm in arm with Annabeth, Piper assumed the guy must be Percy Jackson.
In some of the older photos, sherecognized famous people: businessmen, athletes, even some actors that her dad knew.
For the first time, she felt like she was part of something bigger than herself.
Demigodshad been around for centuries.
Whatever she did, she did for all of them.
The video screen popped up.
“Seen the news?”“Kind of hard to miss,” Piper said.
“I hope you know what you’re doing.
Her dad’s mysterious return from nowhere had made the front page.
His personal assistant Jane hadbeen fired for covering up his disappearance and failing to notify the police.
A new staff had been hired and personally vetted by Tristan McLean’s “lifecoach,” Gleeson Hedge.
According to the paper, Mr.
McLean claimed to have no memory of the last week, and the media was totally eating up the story.
Whatever the truth, TristanMcLean was more famous than ever.
“But don’t worry.
We’re going to keep him out of the public eye for the next month or so until things cool down.
“You kidding? These people make Aeolus look sane.
I’ll be back as soon as I can, but your dad’s gotta get back on his feet first.
Oh, and by the way, I took care of that other little matter.
The Park Service in the Bay Area just got an anonymous gift of a newhelicopter.
And that ranger pilot who helped us? She’s got a very lucrative offer to fly for Mr.
McLean.
“For everything.
I don’t try to be awesome.
It just comes natural.
Speaking of Aeolus’s place, meet your dad’s new assistant.
“You’re working for my dad now?”“Isn’t it great?”“Does he know you’re a—you know—wind spirit?”“Oh, no.
But I love this job.
It’s—um—a breeze.
“I’m glad.
That’s awesome.
But where—”“Just a sec.
“Come on, you old goat.
Stop hogging the screen.
But Mellie steered him away and called, “Mr.
McLean? She’s on!”A second later, Piper’s dad appeared.
“Pipes!”He looked great—back to normal, with his sparkling brown eyes, his half-day beard, his confident smile, and his newly trimmed hair like he wasready to shoot a scene.
Piper was relieved, but she also felt a little sad.
Back to normal wasn’t necessarily what she’d wanted.
On a normal call like this, on a workday, she hardly ever got her dad’s attention for longer than thirty seconds.
“You feeling okay?”“Honey, I’m so sorry to worry you with this disappearance business.
I don’t know …” His smile wavered, and she could tell he was trying to remember—grasping for a memory that should have been there, but wasn’t.
“I’m not sure what happened, honestly.
But I’m fine.
Coach Hedge has been agodsend.
Funny choice of words.
“I’m sorry the Wilderness School didn’t work out, but you were right.
Jane was wrong.
I was a fool tolisten to her.
But at least her dad sounded sincere, like he really did feel remorseful.
“You do?”“I remember that I love you,” he said.
“And I’m proud of you.
Are you happy at your new school?”Piper blinked.
She wasn’t going to cry now.
After all she’d been through, that would be ridiculous.
“Yeah, Dad.
It’s more like a camp, not a school, but… Yeah, I think I’ll be happy here.
“And come home for Christmas.
And Pipes …”“Yes?”He touched the screen as if trying to reach through with his hand.
“You’re a wonderful young lady.
I don’t tell you that often enough.
You remind me somuch of your mother.
She’d be proud.
And Grandpa Tom”—he chuckled—“he always said you’d be the most powerful voice in our family.
You’re going tooutshine me some day, you know.
They’re going to remember me as Piper McLean’s father, and that’s the best legacy I can imagine.
She just touched his fingers on the screen and nodded.
“Studio calling.
I’m sorry, honey.
“Love you.
Then the video call went black.
A small improvement, but it was progress.
He was sweaty from working out, but he looked great in hisorange tank top and shorts.
His various scars and bruises from the quest were healing, thanks to some medical attention from the Apollo cabin.
His armsand legs were well muscled and tan—distracting as always.
His close-cropped blond hair caught the afternoon light so it looked like it was turning togold, Midas style.
“How did it go?”It took her a second to focus on his question.
“Hmm? Oh, yeah.
Fine.
A couple of Demeter girls were playing tricks on two of the Apollo guys—making grass grow around their ankles as they shot baskets.
Over at the camp store, the Hermes kids were putting up a sign that read: flying shoes,slightly used, 50% off today! Ares kids were lining their cabin with fresh barbed wire.
The Hypnos cabin was snoring away.
A normal day at camp.
Piper was pretty sure she saw money changehands, like they were placing bets on a kiss.
“Not much.
Dreams.
If he wanted to talk, that was fine, but she knew him better than to press the subject.
She didn’t even worry that her knowledgeof him was mostly based on three months of false memories.
You can sense possibilities, her mother had said.
And Piper was determined to makethose possibilities a reality.
“It’s not good news,” he warned.
“My memories aren’t good for—for any of us.
But shedidn’t let it bother her.
Not on a sunny winter day like this, with Jason next to her.
“Annabeth and Rachel are coming in for the meeting tonight.
I should probablywait until then to explain …”“Okay.
She knew there were dangerous things in store for both of them.
She would have to compete withJason’s past, and they might not even survive their war against the giants.
But right now, they were both alive, and she was determined to enjoy thismoment.
His forearm tattoo was faint blue in the sunlight.
“You’re in a good mood.
How can you be so sure things will work out?”“Because you’re going to lead us,” she said simply.
“I’d follow you anywhere.
Then slowly, he smiled.
“Dangerous thing to say.
He offered her a hand.
“Leo says he’s got something to show us out in the woods.
You coming?”“Wouldn’t miss it.
Jason tilted his head.
“We should get going.
“Just a sec.
She dropped itinto a nearby eternal fire and watched it burn.
There would be no breaking hearts in Aphrodite cabin from now on.
That was one rite of passage theydidn’t need.
They started cashing in their bets.
Piper was patient, and she could see lots of good possibilities.
“We’ve got adventures to plan.
When he got to the limestone cliff in the forest, he turned to the group andsmiled nervously.
“Here we go.
“You’re a fire user!”“Yeah, thanks,” he said.
“I know.
That means—it’s so rare that—”The massive stone door swung open, and everyone’s mouth dropped.
Leo’s flaming hand seemed insignificant now.
Even Piper and Jason lookedstunned, and they’d seen enough amazing things lately.
The centaur knit his bushy eyebrows and stroked his beard, as if the group was about to walk through a minefield.
His instincts told him he was meant to share this place—at least with theHephaestus cabin—and he couldn’t hide it from Chiron or his two best friends.
“C’mon in.
Everything was just as Leo had left it—giant machines, worktables, old maps and schematics.
Only onething had changed.
Festus’s head was sitting on the central table, still battered and scorched from his final crash in Omaha.
“I’m sorry, Festus.
But I won’t forget you.
“Hephaestus brought it here for you?”Leo nodded.
“But the head is going to be reused.
Festus will be going with us.
“What do you mean?”Before Leo could answer, Nyssa cried out, “Guys, look at this!”She was standing at one of the worktables, flipping through a sketchbook—diagrams for hundreds of different machines and weapons.
“There are more amazing ideas here than in Daedalus’s workshop.
It would take a century just toprototype them all.
“And why?”Chiron stayed silent, but Leo focused on the wall map he’d seen during his first visit.
It showed Camp Half-Blood with a line of triremes in the Sound,catapults mounted in the hills around the valley, and spots marked for traps, trenches, and ambush sites.
“The camp was attacked once, wasn’t it?”“In the Titan War?” Piper asked.
“No.
Besides, that map looks really old.
The date … does that say 1864?”They all turned to Chiron.
“This camp has been attacked many times,” he admitted.
“That map is from the last Civil War.
The other Hephaestus campers looked at each other and frowned.
“You mean the American Civil War, like a hundred and fifty years ago?”“Yes and no,” Chiron said.
“The two conflicts—mortal and demigod—mirrored each other, as they usually do in Western history.
Look at any civil waror revolution from the fall of Rome onward, and it marks a time when demigods also fought one another.
But that Civil War was particularly horrible.
ForAmerican mortals, it is still their bloodiest conflict of all time—worse than their casualties in the two World Wars.
For demigods, it was equallydevastating.
Even back then, this valley was Camp Half-Blood.
There was a horrible battle in these woods lasting for days, with terrible losses on bothsides.
“You mean the camp split apart?”“No,” Jason spoke up.
“He means two different groups.
Camp Half-Blood was one side in the war.
“It is something I swore upon the River Styx never to speak of.
After the American Civil War, the gods wereso horrified by the toll it took on their children, that they swore it would never happen again.
The two groups were separated.
The gods bent all their will,wove the Mist as tightly as they could, to make sure the enemies never remembered each other, never met on their quests, so that bloodshed could beavoided.
This map is from the final dark days of 1864, the last time the two groups fought.
We’ve had several close calls since then.
The nineteen sixtieswere particularly dicey.
But we’ve managed to avoid another civil war—at least so far.
Just as Leo guessed, this bunker was a command center for theHephaestus cabin.
In the last century, it has been reopened a few times, usually as a hiding place in times of great unrest.
But coming here is dangerous.
Even when the Titans threatened last year, I did not think it worth the risk to use this place.
“Hey, look, this place found me.
It was meant to happen.
It’s a good thing.
“Aeolus returned that to me.
I drew it when I was five.
That’s my destiny.
“Leo, it’s a crayon drawing of a boat.
Slowly, his cabinmates’ eyes widened asthey compared the two designs.
The number of masts and oars, even the decorations on the shields and sails were exactly the same as on Leo’sdrawing.
“That blueprint has to be a century old at least.
“It’s a diagram for a flying ship.
Look, that’s the landing gear.
Andweaponry—Holy Hephaestus: rotating ballista, mounted crossbows, Celestial bronze plating.
That thing would be one spankin’ hot war machine.
Was itever made?”“Not yet,” Leo said.
“Look at the masthead.
A very particular dragon.
Everyone turned and looked at the dragon’s head sitting on the table.
“Our good luck charm, our eyes at sea.
I’m supposed to build this ship.
“After Jason’s ship.
“Leo’s right.
That ship is just what we need for our journey.
“You just got back!”Piper ran her fingers over the old crayon drawing.
“We’ve got to confront Porphyrion, the giant king.
He said he would destroy the gods at their roots.
“Much of Rachel’s Great Prophecy is still a mystery to me, but one thing is clear.
You three—Jason, Piper, and Leo—areamong the seven demigods who must take on that quest.
You must confront the giants in their homeland, where they are strongest.
You must stop thembefore they can wake Gaea fully, before they destroy Mount Olympus.
“You don’t mean Manhattan, do you?”“No,” Leo said.
“The original Mount Olympus.
We have to sail to Greece.
Then the other Hephaestus campers started asking questions all at once.
Who were the other four demigods?How long would it take to build the boat? Why didn’t everyone get to go to Greece?“Heroes!” Chiron struck his hoof on the floor.
“All the details are not clear yet, but Leo is correct.
He will need your help to build the Argo II. It isperhaps the greatest project Cabin Nine has even undertaken, even greater than the bronze dragon.
“Do we have that much time?”“You have six months at most,” Chiron said.
“You should sail by summer solstice, when the gods’ power is strongest.
Besides, we evidently cannottrust the wind gods, and the summer winds are the least powerful and easiest to navigate.
You dare not sail any later, or you may be too late to stop thegiants.
You must avoid ground travel, using only air and sea, so this vehicle is perfect.
Jason being the son of the sky god …”His voice trailed off, but Leo figured Chiron was thinking about his missing student, Percy Jackson, the son of Poseidon.
He would’ve been good onthis voyage, too.
“Well, one thing’s for sure.
You are now senior counselor.
This is the biggest honor the cabin has ever had.
Anyoneobject?”Nobody did.
All his cabinmates smiled at him, and Leo could almost feel their cabin’s curse breaking, their sense of hopelessness melting away.
“You’re the man.
Ever since his mom died, he’d spent his life on the run.
Now he’d found a home and a family.
He’d found a job to do.
So let’s build a spankin’ hot war machine!”JASON WAITED ALONE IN CABIN ONE.Annabeth and Rachel were due any minute for the head counselors’ meeting, and Jason needed time to think.
His memory was still foggy, but bits and pieces werecoming back.
The night Lupa had tested him at the Wolf House, to decide if he would be a pup or food.
Then the long trip south to … he couldn’tremember, but he had flashes of his old life.
The day he’d gotten his tattoo.
The day he’d been raised on a shield and proclaimed a praetor.
His friends’faces: Dakota, Gwendolyn, Hazel, Bobby.
And Reyna.
Definitely there’d been a girl named Reyna.
He wasn’t sure what she’d meant to him, but thememory made him question what he felt about Piper—and wonder if he was doing something wrong.
The problem was, he liked Piper a lot.
He put Thalia’s photograph back on the wall so he didn’t feel alone.
Hestared up at the frowning statue of Zeus, mighty and proud, but the statue didn’t scare him anymore.
It just made him feel sad.
Its painted eyes seemed to stare at him.
The Roman gods don’t like to interact with mortals somuch, and—well, you’re the king.
You’ve got to set an example.
Jason had hoped for something—a bigger than usual rumble of thunder, a bright light, a smile.
No, never mind.
A smile would’ve beencreepy.
The more he talked, the less self-conscious he felt.
“I remember that it’s hard being a son of Jupiter.
Everyone isalways looking at me to be a leader, but I always feel alone.
I guess you feel the same way up on Olympus.
The other gods challenge your decisions.
And you can’t come to my aid like other gods might.
You’ve got to keep me ata distance so it doesn’t look like you’re playing favorites.
I guess I just wanted to say …”Jason took a deep breath.
“I understand all that.
It’s okay.
I’m going to try to do my best.
I’ll try to make you proud.
But I could really use someguidance, Dad.
If there’s anything you can do—help me so I can help my friends.
I’m afraid I’ll get them killed.
I don’t know how to protect them.
He realized someone was standing behind him.
He turned and found a woman in a black hooded robe, with a goatskincloak over her shoulders and a sheathed Roman sword—a gladius—in her hands.
“To you, I have always been Juno.
And your father has already sent you guidance, Jason.
He sent you Piper and Leo.
They are also your friends.
Listen to them, and you will do well.
“I am not a messenger.
Why did you send me to this camp?”“I think you know,” Juno said.
“An exchange of leaders was necessary.
It was the only way to bridge to gap.
But Zeus gave your life to me, and I am helping you fulfill your destiny.
He looked down at his orange camp shirt and the tattoos on his arm, and he knew these things should not gotogether.
He had become a contradiction—a mixture as dangerous as anything Medea could cook up.
“Even though you promised.
“But you must find your own way back.
You need these next months with your new friends, your new home.
You’regaining their trust.
By the time you sail in your ship, you will be a leader at this camp.
And you will be ready to be a peacemaker between two greatpowers.
“What if you’re doing this to cause another civil war?”Juno’s expression was impossible to read—amusement? Disdain? Affection? Possibly all three.
As much as she appeared human, Jason knew shewas not.
He could still see that blinding light—the true form of the goddess that had seared itself into his brain.
She was Juno and Hera.
She existed inmany places at once.
Her reasons for doing something were never simple.
“My family has been divided for too long.
“That seems like a pretty good reason.
The giants will rise.
Each can only be killed by a god and demigod working together.
Those demigodsmust be the seven greatest of the age.
As it stands, they are divided between two places.
If we remain divided, we cannot win.
Gaea is counting on this.
Only then will the gods be convincedto join you.
It will be the most dangerous quest, the most important voyage, ever attempted by the children of the gods.
“I could ruin everything.
“But gods need heroes.
We always have.
“I have that reputation.
But if you want the truth, Jason, I often envy other gods their mortal children.
Youdemigods can span both worlds.
I think this helps your godly parents—even Jupiter, curse him—to understand the mortal world better than I.”Juno sighed so unhappily that despite his anger, Jason almost felt sorry for her.
“It is not in my nature to be faithless.
I have only two godly children—Ares and Hephaestus—both of whomare disappointments.
I have no mortal heroes to do my bidding, which is why I am so often bitter toward demigods—Heracles, Aeneas, all of them.
But itis also why I favored the first Jason, a pure mortal, who had no godly parent to guide him.
And why I am glad Zeus gave you to me.
You will be mychampion, Jason.
You will be the greatest of heroes, and bring unity to the demigods, and thus to Olympus.
You will be the greatest of heroes, and bring unity to the demigods, and thus to Olympus.
Two days ago, he’d been terrified by the idea of leading demigods into a Great Prophecy,sailing off to battle the giants and save the world.
He no longer felt alone.
He had friends now, and a home to fight for.
He even had a patrongoddess looking out for him, which had to count for something, even if she seemed a little untrustworthy.
Sure, it seemed impossible.
Hemight die.
But his friends were counting on him.
“Fail, and there will be bloodshed like we have never seen.
Demigods will destroy one another.
Thegiants will overrun Olympus.
Gaea will wake, and the earth will shake off everything we have built over five millennia.
It will be the end of us all.
Just great.
Then she handed Jason the sheathed gladius.
“Take this for the weapon you lost.
We will speak again.
We need each other.
“Chiron has summoned the council.
For one thing, it was in the Big House rec room, around a Ping-Pong table, and one of the satyrs wasserving nachos and sodas.
Somebody had brought Seymour the leopard head in from the living room and hung him on the wall.
Every once in a while, acounselor would toss him a Snausage.
Thankfully, Leo and Piper were sitting next to him—it was their first meetingas senior counselors.
Clarisse, leader of the Ares cabin, had her boots on the table, but nobody seemed to care.
Clovis from Hypnos cabin was snoringin the corner while Butch from Iris cabin was seeing how many pencils he could fit in Clovis’s nostrils.
Travis Stoll from Hermes was holding a lighterunder a Ping-Pong ball to see if it would burn, and Will Solace from Apollo was absently wrapping and unwrapping an Ace bandage around his wrist.
Thecounselor from Hecate cabin, Lou Ellen something-or-other, was playing “got-your-nose” with Miranda Gardiner from Demeter, except that Lou Ellenreally had magically disconnected Miranda’s nose, and Miranda was trying to get it back.
She’d promised, after all—but she was nowhere to be seen.
Chiron had told him not to worry about it.
Thaliaoften got sidetracked fighting monsters or running quests for Artemis, and she would probably arrive soon.
But still, Jason worried.
She was wearing her Clarion Academy school uniform dress, which seemed abit odd, but she smiled at Jason.
She wore armor over her camp clothes, with her knife at her side and her blond hair pulled back in a ponytail.
Assoon as Jason walked in, she fixed him with an expectant look, as if she were trying to extract information out of him by sheer willpower.
“Lou Ellen, please give Miranda her nose back.
Travis, if you’d kindly extinguish the flaming Ping-Pong ball, andButch, I think twenty pencils is really too many for any human nostril.
Thank you.
Now, as you can see, Jason, Piper, and Leo have returned successfully…more or less.
Some of you have heard parts of their story, but I will let them fill you in.
He cleared his throat and began the story.
Piper and Leo chimed in from time to time, filling in the details he forgot.
The silence was heavy, and for so many ADHD demigods to sit stilllistening for that long, Jason knew the story must have sounded pretty wild.
He ended with Hera’s visit right before the meeting.
“Talking to you.
“Look, I’m not saying I trust her—”“That’s smart,” Annabeth said.
That’s where I came from.
“You expect us to believe there’s another camp with demigods, but they follow the Roman formsof the gods.
And we’ve never even heard of them.
“The gods have kept the two groups apart, because every time they see each other, they try to kill each other.
“Still, why haven’t we ever run across each other on quests?”“Oh, yes,” Chiron said sadly.
“You have, many times.
It’s always a tragedy, and always the gods do their best to wipe clean the memories of thoseinvolved.
The rivalry goes all the way back to the Trojan War, Clarisse.
The Greeks invaded Troy and burned it to the ground.
The Trojan hero Aeneasescaped, and eventually made his way to Italy, where he founded the race that would someday become Rome.
The Romans grew more and morepowerful, worshipping the same gods but under different names, and with slightly different personalities.
“More united.
More about expansion, conquest, and discipline.
“And the Romans hated the Greeks.
They took revenge when they conquered the Greek isles, and madethem part of the Roman Empire.
“The Romans admired Greek culture, and were a little jealous.
In return, the Greeks thought the Romans werebarbarians, but they respected their military power.
So during Roman times, demigods started to divide—either Greek or Roman.
“But this is crazy.
Chiron, where were the Romans during the Titan War? Didn’t they want tohelp?”Chiron tugged at his beard.
“They did help, Annabeth.
While you and Percy were leading the battle to save Manhattan, who do think conqueredMount Othrys, the Titans’ base in California?”“Hold on,” Travis said.
“You said Mount Othrys just crumbled when we beat Kronos.
He remembered flashes of the battle—a giant in starry armor and a helm mounted with ram’s horns.
He remembered his army ofdemigods scaling Mount Tam, fighting through hordes of snake monsters.
“It didn’t just fall.
We destroyed their palace.
I defeated the Titan Krios myself.
Jason could almost see her thoughts moving, putting the pieces together.
“The Bay Area.
Wedemigods were always told to stay away from it because Mount Othrys was there.
But that wasn’t the only reason, was it? The Roman camp—it’s got tobe somewhere near San Francisco.
I bet it was put there to keep watch on the Titans’ territory.
Where is it?”Chiron shifted in his wheelchair.
“I cannot say.
Honestly, even I have never been trusted with that information.
My counterpart, Lupa, is not exactly thesharing type.
Jason’s memory, too, has been burned away.
“And heavily guarded.
We could search for years and never find it.
Of all the people in the room, only she didn’t seem nervous about the conversation.
“But you’ll try, won’t you? You’llbuild Leo’s boat, the Argo II. And before you make for Greece, you’ll sail for the Roman camp.
You’ll need their help to confront the giants.
“If those Romans see a warship coming, they’ll assume we’re attacking.
“But we have to try.
I was sent here to learn about Camp Half-Blood, to try to convince you the two camps don’thave to be enemies.
A peace offering.
“Because Hera is convinced we need both camps to win the war with the giants.
Seven heroes of Olympus—some Greek,some Roman.
“Your Great Prophecy—what’s the last line?”“And foes bear arms to the Doors of Death.
“She’s letting out the worst villains of the Underworld to fight us.
Medea, Midas—there’ll bemore, I’m sure.
Maybe the line means that the Roman and Greek demigods will unite, and find the doors, and close them.
“It doesn’t say we’ll cooperate.
“Jason, when you get this ship built, let me go with you.
“You of all people —we’ll need you.
“I mean that’s cool with me and all.
But why Annabeth of all people?”Annabeth and Jason studied one another, and Jason knew she had put it together.
She saw the dangerous truth.
“A way for the two camps to learn of each other’s existence.
“So?”“An exchange goes two ways,” Jason said.
“When I got here, my memory was wiped.
I didn’t know who I was or where I belonged.
Fortunately, youguys took me in and I found a new home.
I know you’re not my enemy.
The Roman camp—they’re not so friendly.
You prove your worth quickly, or youdon’t survive.
They may not be so nice to him, and if they learn where he comes from, he’s going to be in serious trouble.
“Who are you talking about?”“My boyfriend,” Annabeth said grimly.
“He disappeared around the same time Jason appeared.
If Jason came to Camp Half-Blood—”“Exactly,” Jason agreed.
“Percy Jackson is at the other camp, and he probably doesn’t even remember who he is.
Roman form: AeolusAphrodite The Greek goddess of love and beauty.
She was marred to Hephaestus, but she loved Ares, the god of war.
Roman form: VenusApollo The Greek god of the sun, prophecy, music, and healing; the son of Zeus, and the twin of Artemis.
Roman form: ApolloAres The Greek god of war; the son of Zeus and Hera, and half brother to Athena.
Roman form: MarsArtemis The Greek goddess of the hunt and the moon; the daughter of Zeus and the twin of Apollo.
Roman form: DianaBoreas The Greek god of the north wind, one of the four directional anemoi (wind gods); the god of winter; father of Khione.
Roman form: AquilonDemeter The Greek goddess of agriculture, a daughter of the Titans Rhea and Kronos.
Roman form: CeresDionysus The Greek god of wine; the son of Zeus.
Roman form: BacchusGaea The Greek personification of Earth.
Roman form: TerraHades According to Greek mythology, ruler of the Underworld and god of the dead.
Roman form: PlutoHecate The Greek goddess of magic; the only child of the Titans Perses and Asteria.
Roman form: TriviaHephaestus The Greek god of fire and crafts and of blacksmiths; the son of Zeus and Hera, and married to Aphrodite.
Roman form: VulcanHera The Greek goddess of marriage; Zeus’s wife and sister.
Roman form: JunoHermes The Greek god of travelers, communication, and thieves; son of Zeus.
Roman form: MercuryHypnos The Greek god of sleep; the (fatherless) son of Nyx (Night) and brother of Thanatos (Death).
Roman form: SomnusIris The Greek goddess of the rainbow, and a messenger of the gods; the daughter of Thaumas and Electra.
Roman form: IrisJanus The Roman god of gates, doors, and doorways, as well as beginnings and endings.
Roman form: UranusPan The Greek god of the wild; the son of Hermes.
Roman form: FaunusPompona The Roman goddess of plentyPoseidon The Greek god of the sea; son of the Titans Kronos and Rhea, and brother of Zeus and Hades.
Roman form: NeptuneZeus The Greek god of the sky and king of the gods.
Roman form: JupiterComing Fall 2011The Heroes of Olympus, Book TwoTHE SON OF NEPTUNEPraise for The Percy Jackson Series by Rick Riordan:The Lightning Thief“Perfectly paced, with electrifying moments chasing each other like heartbeats.
Riordan mined Greek myths for thelineage of his campers at Half-Blood.
Now he drills into the depths of Egyptian history and lore for the page-turning Kane Chronicles.
Riordan has a fieldday … imparting Egyptian history as he weaves his spellbinding tale.
Plenty of humor keeps things light… Readers will be clamoring for the nextinstallment.
His previous novels for adults include the hugely popular Tres Navarre series, winner of the top three awardsin the mystery genre.
He lives in San Antonio, Texas, with his wife and two sons.
To learn more about Rick, visit his Web site at www.
rickriordan.